SUSTAINABILITY  OF 

MAINE’S  GROUNDFISH  INDUSTRY 

S.  HRG.  110–807 

FIELD  HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON OCEANS, ATMOSPHERE, 

FISHERIES, AND COAST GUARD 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

OCTOBER  14,  2008 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

46–471 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2009 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas,  Ranking 
TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  OCEANS,  ATMOSPHERE,  FISHERIES,  AND  COAST 

GUARD 

MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington,  Chairman 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine,  Ranking 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on October 14, 2008  ..........................................................................
Statement of Senator Snowe  ...................................................................................
Prepared  statement  of  Hon.  Susan  M.  Collins,  U.S.  Senator  from  Maine, 
.......................................................................

submitted by Senator Snowe 

WITNESSES 

Alexander, Terry, Fisherman and Owner  ..............................................................
Balsiger,  Ph.D.,  James  W.,  Acting  Assistant  Administrator  for  Fisheries,  Na-
tional Marine Fisheries Service, National Oceanic and Atmospheric Admin-
istration, Department of Commerce  ...................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Bradley, Edward, President and Manager, Vessel Services, Inc.  ........................
Ciocca, Angelo, President, Nova Seafoods Ltd.  .....................................................
Cunningham, Jr., Colin M. ‘‘Rip’’, Vice Chairman, New England Fishery Man-
agement Council  ...................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Dority, Aaron, Project Director, Downeast Initiative, Penobscot East Resource 
Center  ....................................................................................................................
Gerencer,  Bill,  Member,  Groundfish  Advisory  Panel,  New  England  Fishery 
Management Council; Member, Atlantic Highly Migratory Species Advisory 
Panel; Commercial Fish Buyer, M.F. Foley Company, Inc.  ..............................
Hamlin, Cyrus, Author, Preliminary Design of Boats and Ships  ........................
Holland,  Ph.D.,  Daniel  S.,  Resource  Economist,  Gulf  of  Maine  Research 
Institute  ................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Jongerden, Bert, General Manager, Portland Fish Exchange  .............................
Libby,  Glen,  Chairman,  Midcoast  Fishermen’s  Association  and  President, 
Midcoast Fishermen’s Cooperative  .....................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Linnell, Captain Bill, Lobsterman  ..........................................................................
Litteral, Jennifer, Director of Marine Programs, Island Institute  ......................
Mahoney,  Sean,  Vice  President  and  Director,  Maine  Advocacy  Center,  Con-
servation Law Foundation  ...................................................................................
McGee, Sally, New England Fisheries Policy Director, Oceans Program, Envi-
ronmental  Defense  Fund;  Member,  New  England  Fishery  Management 
Council  ..................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Odlin, Amanda, Co-Owner, F/V LYDIA AND MAYA, F/V BETHANY JEAN  ....
Odlin, James A., Vessel Owner, Atlantic Trawlers Fishing, Inc.  ........................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Letter, dated September 16, 2008, from Paul Howard, Executive Director, 
New  England  Fishery  Management  Council  to  Patricia  Kurkul,  Re-
gional Administrator, National Marine Fisheries Service  .........................
Letter,  dated  October  3,  2008,  from  Patricia  Kurkul,  Regional  Adminis-
trator  and  Nancy  Thompson,  Ph.D.,  Science  and  Research  Director, 
National Marine Fisheries Service to Paul Howard, Executive Director, 
New England Fishery Management Council  ..............................................
Odlin,  Captain  Robert  M.,  Commercial  Fisherman  and  Owner,  F/V  MAINE 
LADY III  ...............................................................................................................
Pendleton,  Craig,  Former  Coordinating  Director,  Northwest  Atlantic  Marine 
................................................
Raymond, Maggie, Executive Director, Associated Fisheries of Maine  ...............

Alliance (NAMA); Owner, F/V OCEAN SPRAY 

Page 
1 
1 

2 

61 

7 
9 
54 
70 

17 
18 

74 

49 
57 

34 
36 
78 

30 
32 
85 
60 

64 

37 
38 
82 
21 
23 

26 

28 

79 

59 
68 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

IV 

Stockwell,  Terry,  Director  of  External  Affairs,  Department  of  Marine  Re-
sources,  State  of  Maine;  Member,  New  England  Fishery  Management 
Council  ..................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Thompson, Matthew, Commercial Fisherman and Lobsterman, F/V STRIKER 
Viola, Willard H., Commercial Fisherman; President, Black Beauty, Inc.  .........
Viola III, Sam, Commercial Fisherman  .................................................................
Williamson,  John,  Manager,  Fish  Conservation,  New  England,  Ocean 
Conservancy  ..........................................................................................................

Page

11 
14 
69 
76 
66 

62 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SUSTAINABILITY  OF 

MAINE’S  GROUNDFISH  INDUSTRY 

TUESDAY,  OCTOBER  14,  2008 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON OCEANS, ATMOSPHERE, FISHERIES, 
AND COAST GUARD, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  1:06  p.m.  in  City 
Hall  Council  Chambers,  Portland,  Maine,  Hon.  Olympia  J.  Snowe, 
presiding. 

Portland, ME. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MAINE 

Senator  SNOWE.  Good  afternoon.  Thank  you  all  for  being  here— 

and I appreciate it—on a critical issue, obviously, to Maine. 

And  I  want  to  invite  this  to  be  a  conversation.  I  would  like  to 
read  my  opening  statement  because  I  do  think  it  is  an  important 
issue  and  will  invite  the  panelists  to  do  so  as  well.  And  I  will  ex-
plain the procedures, but first of all, I just want to welcome every-
body here today. 

I now call this hearing to order, as we gather to examine the sus-
tainability  of  Maine’s  historic  groundfishery.  As  Ranking  Member 
of the Senate Subcommittee on Oceans, Atmosphere, Fisheries, and 
Coast  Guard,  I  am,  like  all  of  you,  deeply  troubled  by  the  trends 
that I have witnessed in this industry. 

And  it  is  unmistakable.  If  we  remain  on  our  present  regulatory 
trajectory,  it  is  no  exaggeration  to  say  that  the  industry  as  a 
whole—particularly in Maine, but ultimately throughout New Eng-
land—is in terrible jeopardy. 

Before  we  begin  our  vital,  in-depth  discussion  and  analysis  of 
these  challenging  issues  confronting  all  of  us,  I  would  first  like  to 
thank  our  witnesses,  who  have  joined  us  here  today—Dr.  James 
Balsiger,  Administrator  of  the  National  Marine  Fisheries  Service; 
Terry  Stockwell,  External  Affairs  Director  of  Maine’s  Department 
of  Marine  Resources;  Rip  Cunningham,  Chair  of  the  New  England 
Fishery Management Council’s Groundfish Committee; Glen Libby, 
representing  the  Midcoast  Fisheries  Association  and  the  Midcoast 
Fishermen’s  Cooperative;  James  Odlin,  representing  Associated 
Fisheries of Maine; Sally McGee, New England Fisheries Policy Di-
rector  at  the  Environmental  Defense  Fund;  and  Dr.  Daniel  Hol-
land,  Research  Scientist  and  Resource  Economist  at  the  Gulf  of 
Maine Research Institute. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

I would also like to include in the record of this hearing a state-

ment from my colleague Senator Collins as well. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Collins follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. SUSAN M. COLLINS, U.S. SENATOR FROM MAINE 
I  want  to  thank  my  colleague,  Senator  Snowe,  Ranking  Member  of  the  Sub-
committee on Oceans, Fisheries, and Coast Guard, for holding this hearing to exam-
ine  the  condition  of  Maine’s  groundfish  fishery.  The  contribution  this  industry  has 
made to the economy of New England over the last 400 years is immeasurable. The 
proud  heritage  that  to  this  day  shapes  the  economies  and  culture  of  many  commu-
nities throughout our state is now fighting for its survival amid increasingly restric-
tive management measures and soaring operational costs. 

Today, we rely on science to strike the critical balance between sustainability and 
the harvesting of this historic natural resource. Regulations, management measures, 
and  emergency  actions  are  all  developed  using  the  best  available  science.  These 
mandates,  in  turn,  determine  whether  generations  of  fishermen  will  continue  to 
earn  their  living  at  sea.  The  discouraging  fact  is  that  over  the  past  8  years,  the 
hard-working men and women in Maine’s groundfish industry have seen their prof-
its  decline  by  over  fifty  percent.  Many  boats  have  relocated  out  of  state  and  still 
others struggle to avoid going into foreclosure. 

Making  matters  worse  are  proposed  changes  to  the  Northeast  Multispecies  Fish-
ery Management plan that would severely restrict fishing effort. Because of Amend-
ment  16,  fishermen  in  Maine  face  cuts  to  their  days-at-sea  by  as  much  as  seventy 
percent resulting from complex, and perhaps imprecise—scientific modeling. NOAA’s 
scientific  modeling  to  end  overfishing  has  yielded  results  that,  if  implemented. 
would leave most fishermen with fewer than 30 days a year to earn a living. There 
can  be  little  doubt  that  if  Amendment  16  is  implemented  as  proposed,  Maine’s 
groundfish industry would quickly disappear. 

I,  along  with  Senators  Snowe,  Kerry,  and  Kennedy,  sent  a  letter  to  Dr.  James 
Balsiger,  NOAA’s  Acting  Administrator  for  Fisheries,  on  May  16,  2008,  supporting 
a  revised  implementation  schedule  for  Amendment  16  that  would  allow  for  the  ap-
propriate consideration of the 2008 benchmark stock assessments. It is critical that 
the most accurate, up to date science be used to guide the management of an indus-
try that has already made great sacrifices to support many small, family businesses. 
As  we  note  in  the  letter,  sound  management  of  this  fishery  requires  that  NMFS 
value  scientific  data  over  adherence  to  an  arbitrary  time  line.  The  New  England 
Fisheries Management Council was right to delay implementation of Amendment 16 
to  thoroughly  consider  the  most  recent  stock  assessment  data,  as  Senator  Snowe 
and I have urged. With Secretarial Action now needed to manage the fishery in the 
intervening months, it is critical that NMFS implement interim management meas-
ures  that  are  balanced,  supported  by  sound  science,  and  not  going  to  unnecessarily 
burden the New England groundfish industry. 

With  the  hope  of  fishing  families  hanging  in  the  balance,  it  is  incumbent  on  the 
government to set realistic catch limits that are supported by accurate and reliable 
data.  After  concerns  were  raised  by  industry  stakeholders  suggesting  that  the 
science  underlying  proscribed  catch  limits  was  flawed,  I  joined  Senator  Snowe  and 
others in calling for an investigation of NMFS’s Northeast Fisheries Science Center 
(NFSC) by the Department of Commerce Inspector General. We have asked the In-
spector General to examine allegations that the Center has set catch levels that are 
not supported by historical biomass data, scientific protocol is not followed, and esti-
mates  of  biomass  and  allowable  fishing  rates  have  varied  considerably  during  fish-
ing seasons. The object of the investigation is to examine the accuracy of the science 
underlying  fisheries  management  measures  so  that  these  regulations  will  be  met, 
not  with  distrust,  but  with  the  knowledge  and  understanding  that  fish  stocks  are 
being managed sustainably and responsibly. 

As  was  expressed  to  the  Inspector  General,  there  are  several  specific  issues  that 
require  close  examination.  First,  despite  the  fact  that  fishing  effort  for  several  fish 
stocks is well below NFSC recommended levels, overfishing of these stocks is some-
how still occurring. Second, until the third Groundfish Assessment Review Meeting 
on  August  29,  2008,  the  scientific  modeling  failed  to  account  for  the  ocean  eco-
system’s  inability  to  simultaneously  support  historically  high  population  levels  for 
all  19  groundfish  stocks.  My  concern  is  that  this  has  led  to  the  mismanagement  of 
species  like  the  spiny  dogfish,  which  has  become  so  abundant  that  it  is  counter-
acting  the  rebuilding  efforts  of  our  more  valuable  groundfish  stocks.  Third,  having 
reached the midway point in the 10-year multispecies rebuilding plan, the stock as-
sessments appear to suggest that even without any fishing effort, some stocks might 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

not  rebuild  in  the  next  5  years.  This  calls  into  question  whether  fishery  rebuilding 
programs  should  be  managed  according  to  a  specific  target  date  or  according  to 
sustainably  managed  fishing  activity.  Without  the  assurance  that  nature  will  per-
form as expected, NMFS must develop a clear and practical methodology for adjust-
ing rebuilding time frames. 

I  also  want  to  call  attention  to  efforts  by  legislators  in  New  England  to  certify 
the New England groundfishery as a fisheries disaster. I, along with Senator Snowe, 
have  repeatedly  indicated  to  the  Secretary  of  Commerce,  that  a  groundfish  fishery 
disaster  has  indeed  occurred  in  the  Northeast.  On  December  4,  2007,  the  Senate 
passed a resolution that I cosponsored stating the sense of the Senate that the Sec-
retary should declare a commercial fisheries failure for the New England groundfish 
industry.  After  the  resolution  passed,  I  joined  Senators  Snowe,  Gregg,  and  Sununu 
in writing to the Secretary urging him to reconsider his denial of Federal assistance 
for  our  struggling  fishing  fleet.  Following  NMFS’s  announcement  on  September  22, 
2008,  that  it  would  certify  a  fisheries  disaster  for  the  Chesapeake  Bay  blue  crab 
commercial  fishery  due  to  a  40  percent  decrease  in  landings  value,  we  again  urged 
the  Secretary  to  find  that  a  fisheries  failure  has  occurred  in  New  England,  which 
has experienced markedly similar landings decreases. 

In denying Federal fisheries disaster assistance for Maine in October 2007, NOAA 
stated  that  while  there  has  been  significant  economic  difficulty  for  groundfish-de-
pendent  communities  in  Maine,  the  request  for  a  commercial  fisheries  failure  did 
not  meet  the  requirements  under  Magnuson-Stevens.  I  strongly  disagree  with  this 
assessment  and  will  continue  to  work  with  colleagues  to  seek  opportunities  to  pro-
vide  assistance  to  New  England’s  groundfish  industry.  One  positive  development  is 
that  the  Senate  CJS  appropriations  bill  passed  out  of  Committee  with  $75  million 
designated  for  national  fisheries  disaster  relief  that  specifically  mentions  the  New 
England  groundfish  fishery.  While  it  is  unclear  whether  this  important  provision 
will  be  signed  into  law,  I  will  seek  every  opportunity  to  provide  emergency  assist-
ance to Maine’s struggling groundfish industry. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  offer  comments  about  improving  the  manage-
ment  of  Maine’s  struggling  groundfish  industry.  Management  of  one  of  New  Eng-
land’s  oldest  and  most  significant  industries  must  be  founded,  first  and  foremost, 
on accurate and reliable science so that sensible regulations can be developed to cre-
ate  a  sustainable  fishery  both  for  fish  stocks  and  our  fishing  communities.  At  this 
critical  juncture  leading  up  to  the  implementation  of  Amendment  16,  preserving 
Maine’s  groundfish  industry  will  require  developing  equitable  capacity  reduction 
strategies, investing in ways to reduce the discard rate, and working to address the 
shortcomings of the increasingly prohibitive days-at-sea model. 

Senator  SNOWE.  I  believe  we  all  share  a  mutual  goal  here 
today—to ensure that we have self-sustaining populations of the 19 
stocks  that  comprise  the  Northeast  Multispecies  Fishery  and  that 
we  do  not  regulate  our  nation’s  first  fishery  out  of  existence.  To 
that end, I hope this will be an open dialogue among our panelists, 
allowing them to speak directly with me and one another to get to 
the  bottom  of  this  critical  issue  facing  the  fishery  as  we  approach 
two  major  regulatory  milestones—the  development  of  the  interim 
regulations  for  fishing  year  2009  and  Amendment  16  for  2010  and 
beyond. 

I  would  also  thank  all  the  members  of  the  public  for  attending 
this hearing, and I look forward to hearing from all of you directly. 
Our agenda will begin with opening statements from our panelists. 
Then I will lead a discussion with direct questions to our witnesses 
and  subsequently  facilitate  a  conversation  among  the  participants. 
We will then open the floor for your comments and questions for 
consideration  by  the  panelists.  If  you  would  like  to  address  me  or 
the panelists, you may add your name to the list of speakers at the 
back of the room, and you will be called to the microphone in that 
order. 

I apologize if there is insufficient time to hear from everyone who 
wishes to speak, but I hope that we can accommodate anyone who 
does  wish  to  do  so.  And  if  not,  you  can  also  include  your  written 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

statements  in  the  record  because  this  will  be  part  of  the  official 
proceedings of this hearing and of this Committee. 

We  are  here  today  to  discuss  the  future  of  one  of  our  Nation’s 
most  historic  industries.  It  was  the  bounty  of  Georges  Bank  and 
the Gulf of Maine that first enticed fishermen to cross the Atlantic 
Ocean  more  than  600  years  ago,  fill  their  boats  with  cod,  salt  and 
dry fish on these shores, and return to sell their wares in the mar-
kets of medieval Europe. 

Despite  the  dangers  inherent  in  this  trade,  known  all  too  well 
even to the fishermen of today, the fishing grounds were so robust 
as  to  outweigh  the  risk  to  life  and  property.  In  this  regard,  the 
groundfishery of today bears little resemblance to that encountered 
by those early European explorers. 

Now,  more  than  ever,  Maine’s  fishing  industry  relies  on  a  single 
species. And last week, largely in response to the current economic 
situation, lobster prices fell to levels not seen since the early 1980s. 
I  think  events  such  as  this  only  underscore  that  we  cannot  con-
tinue  the  trend  of  consolidating  more  and  more  of  our  eggs  in  one 
basket.  And  my  thoughts  are  with  the  industry  as  well,  as  I  know 
they are struggling through this very difficult time. 

Today,  we  are  confronted  by  a  fishery  trying  desperately  to  sur-
vive  increasing  regulatory  restrictions  that  have  reduced  the  num-
ber  of  days  fishermen  are  permitted  to  go  to  sea  from  an  average 
of 116 in 1996 to a mere 48 in 2008. Particularly here, in the State 
of Maine, we have lost much of our fishing heritage in recent years. 
In  the  1990s,  there  were  more  than  350  active  groundfishing 
boats  in  Maine.  Today,  the  Department  of  Marine  Resources  esti-
mates perhaps as few as 70 still land their catch here in the State. 
And there is only one active groundfishing permit east of Penobscot 
Bay. 

Since  2000,  the  Portland  Fish  Exchange,  right  here,  has  wit-
nessed  its  volume  of  fish  drop  by  more  than  60  percent.  And  from 
2000  to  2004,  jobs  in  fish  processing  and  wholesaling  in  the  State 
fell by more than 40 percent. 

As we focus on the short-term impact of regulations, both in 2009 
and  2010,  we  must  also  consider  the  long-term  viability  of  this  in-
dustry  in  this  State,  home  to  America’s  first  fishing  settlements. 
And regrettably, the horizon before us is ominous. 

Current  regulations  require  at  least  an  18  percent  reduction  in 
days  at  sea  for  next  year,  and  proposals  put  forward  by  the  Na-
tional  Marine  Fisheries  Service  have  suggested  that  as  much  as  a 
70 percent cut could be forthcoming. As I asserted in my statement 
before  the  New  England  Fishery  Management  Council  in  June, 
that  kind  of  drastic  reduction  in  fishing  effort  would  be  a  death 
knell for this historic industry. 

While  the  future  of  our  fishing  industry  depends  on  healthy  fish 
stocks,  we  cannot  allow  well-intentioned  efforts  to  rebuild  those 
stocks  to  bankrupt  the  industry  now,  or  they  will  be  left  with  no 
one to capitalize on the sacrifices of tomorrow. 

I recognize the challenges before us as we attempt to rebuild our 
stocks  to  healthy  levels  that  can  sustain  our  fishing  communities. 
And evidence has shown that, in some cases, the efforts of our fish-
ermen  are  paying  dividends.  The  haddock  population  has  experi-
enced  a  resurgence  in  recent  years,  for  example.  But  our  manage-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

ment  measures  have  not  adapted  in  similar  fashion,  preventing 
fishermen from taking advantage of this wealth of fish. 

In fishing year 2006, the total allowable catch of haddock was ap-
proximately  36,500  pounds,  yet  fishermen  landed  less  than  8  per-
cent  of  that  figure  due  to  regulatory  restrictions  aimed  at  pro-
tecting less abundant species. This kind of lowest common denomi-
nated management is clearly not viable. 

As  required  by  Amendment  13,  the  New  England  Fishery  Man-
agement  Council  has  been  striving  to  develop  Amendment  16,  the 
next major management action for the industry. Unfortunately, due 
to a funding shortfall and a delay in the release of the report from 
the Groundfish Assessment Review Meetings, or GARM, the Coun-
cil  could  not  act  on  Amendment  16  in  time  to  develop  regulations 
for  fishing  year  2009,  as  required  by  the  previous  management 
measure, Amendment 13. 

As  such,  the  agency  now  must  take  responsibility  upon  itself  to 
issue  interim  regulations  for  the  upcoming  fishing  season.  I  re-
ceived  assurances  from  Dr.  Balsiger,  who  will  testify  before  the 
Committee today, that his office would work closely with the Coun-
cil to develop these interim regulations. But last month, the Coun-
cil passed a recommendation for interim measures, which included 
the mandated 18 percent cut to days at sea. 

The  Council’s  vote  in  favor  of  this  measure  was  15–1,  with  the 
lone dissenting vote cast by the National Marine Fisheries Service’s 
regional  administrator,  who  subsequently  dismissed  the  Council’s 
recommendation entirely and announced that she would develop in-
terim regulations without regard for the Council’s near unanimous 
decision. This is not the way the process is designed to operate. 

To  get  at  the  core  issue  of  scientific  uncertainty  preventing  pro-
ductive management, we must address the science upon which our 
regulations are based. The Northeast Fisheries Science Center has 
recently  completed  its  comprehensive  review  of  all  19  stocks  that 
comprise the Northeast Multispecies Fishery. While the GARM re-
port  does  contain  some  positive  results  on  the  status  of  certain 
commercially  valuable  fish  populations,  it  also  finds  that  many  of 
the other stocks remain in an overfished state. 

And I am concerned by allegations of mismanagement of the data 
contained  in  the  GARM.  Many  members  of  the  fishing  industry 
have  approached  me  and  my  staff  in  recent  months  to  point  out 
perceived  inaccuracies  in  the  science  underlying  this  report.  Their 
arguments  have  been  persuasive.  And  in  order  to  give  them  the 
thorough, independent examination that they deserve, I, along with 
Senator Collins and our colleagues from Massachusetts—both Sen-
ator  Kennedy  and  Senator  Kerry—have  asked  the  Department  of 
Commerce inspector general to investigate these claims. 

Review  by  this  impartial  third  party  will  either  confirm  or  dis-
prove  these  assertions.  And  in  the  end,  management  based  on  the 
sound  analysis  of  sound  science  will  be  the  foundation  on  which 
this groundfish industry will be rebuilt. 

From  some  of  our  witnesses  testifying  today,  you  will  hear  calls 
for  an  industry-funded  buyback  to  reduce  capacity  within  the  fish-
ery. Fishermen from small ports like Stonington and Port Clyde op-
pose  the  current  buyback  proposal  because  it  may  increase  their 
costs  immediately  but  provide  them  no  appreciable  benefit  in  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

short  term.  This  may  hasten  the  demise  of  the  industry  in  those 
communities where it is already struggling to survive, but the con-
cept may have value to other portions of the fishery. 

While I believe that buyouts can be an effective tool, anything we 
pursue  must  ensure  that  we  are  not  simply  facilitating  consolida-
tion  of  the  fishery  in  a  few  ports,  particularly  ports  outside  the 
State  of  Maine,  and  provide  a  means  to  bring  our  traditional  fish-
ing  communities  back  into  the  industry  once  stocks  have  rebuilt 
sufficiently. 

I  also  continue  to  pursue  vigorously  a  secretarial  declaration  of 
a  fishery  failure  for  the  groundfish  industry  in  this  State.  Such  a 
declaration would make the industry eligible for Federal funding to 
alleviate  some  of  the  economic  impacts  of  past  and  soon-to-be 
present regulations. 

When Congress reauthorized the Magnuson-Stevens Act in 2006, 
we included language to allow such a declaration due to regulatory 
effects. Still, as you know, the Secretary denied such a request that 
was  made  by  the  Governors  of  several  states,  including  Governor 
Baldacci, in 2007. 

But I simply cannot and will not accept that more than a 50 per-
cent decline in landing values here in the State does not constitute 
a disaster or a failure. This designation is now more vital than ever 
as  in  a  spending  bill  signed  into  law  just  a  week  ago  in  Congress, 
where we set aside $75 million in funding for fisheries in which the 
Secretary has declared a disaster. 

Well,  along  with  my  colleagues  in  the  Senate—Senator  Collins, 
Senator Gregg, and Senator Sununu of New Hampshire—we asked 
the  Secretary  for  reconsideration  of  this  denial,  along  with  Gov-
ernor  Baldacci.  And  we  will  continue  to  pursue  such  a  declaration 
and  the  funding  that  accompanies  it  until  Maine’s  fishermen  re-
ceive  the  Federal  financial  assistance  to  which  you  should  be  enti-
tled to under the law. 

Whatever form the final solution takes, this rule-making process 
is far from over. We all share the goal of giving our fish stocks the 
best  possible  opportunity  to  recover.  For  without  viable,  sustain-
able populations, there will be no fishery at all. 

But at the same time, we must ensure that while that rebuilding 
is taking place, we do not inadvertently bankrupt an industry that 
has  played  such  a  vital  role  in  our  State’s  economy  and  our  herit-
age for centuries. I, for one, am not ready to capitulate on the pos-
sibility of achieving that goal. 

So, at this time, I would like to begin hearing testimony from our 
panel  of  witnesses.  I  will  include  your  entire  statements  in  the 
record, however you choose to proceed, because I do think it is im-
portant to hear from all of you. 

And  then  we  will  have  questions,  and  we  will  open  it  up  to  the 
audience  to  ask  questions  of  panelists  or  me  and  to  make  com-
ments.  Because  I  think  it  is  important  to  have  that  interaction  so 
that  we  all  have  a  complete  understanding  of  what  the  issues  are, 
what  is  at  stake,  and  what  do  we  hope  to  accomplish  in  the  final 
analysis  to  save  this  most  critical  industry  to  our  State  and  to  the 
entire New England region. So, thank you. 

Dr. Balsiger, would you begin, please? Thank you. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

you. 

STATEMENT OF JAMES W. BALSIGER, PH.D., ACTING ASSISTANT 
ADMINISTRATOR,  NATIONAL  MARINE  FISHERIES  SERVICE, 
NATIONAL  OCEANIC  AND  ATMOSPHERIC  ADMINISTRATION, 
U.S. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 
Dr. BALSIGER. Thank you, Senator Snowe. 
Senator SNOWE. Thank you. And thank you for being here today. 
And  I  thank  all  of  you  for  being  here  today,  everybody.  Thank 

Dr.  BALSIGER.  I  appreciate  the  invitation  to  travel  to  Portland, 
Maine.  I  never  turn  down  invitations  to  get  out  to  the  coast.  So, 
thank you. 

I am Jim Balsiger. I am the director of NOAA Fisheries Service. 
Thanks for inviting me to testify at this important hearing on New 
England groundfish and thank you for your outstanding leadership 
on the ocean and fisheries issues in Maine and in the Nation’s cap-
ital. 

The red light is on. Am I too far away? 
I am well aware that commercial fishing for cod, haddock, floun-
der,  and  other  species  has  been  a  long  tradition  in  New  England, 
and  this  fishing  history  is  tied  tightly  to  the  culture  and  the  eco-
nomics  of  the  region.  Before  serving  in  this  current  job,  I  was  the 
Regional  Administrator  for  Fisheries  in  Alaska,  where  fishing  is 
also of paramount importance. 

So my ultimate goal as the head of the Fisheries Service is to see 
healthy  stocks  supporting  productive  fishing  livelihoods  in  coastal 
communities around the Nation. We have some work to do here to 
reach that goal in New England and elsewhere, but we are making 
progress.  And  I  am  confident  that  we  will  reach  that  point  in  the 
not-too-distant future. 

The  Magnuson-Stevens  Act  is  the  key  legislative  directive  under 
which NOAA manages the Nation’s fisheries. This important legis-
lation  requires  us  to  end  overfishing  and  rebuild  stocks.  We  work 
with  the  New  England  Fishery  Management  Council  to  manage 
New England’s groundfish as part of a 19-stock complex called the 
Northeast Multispecies Fishery. 

In  recent  years,  we  have  had  to  sharply  reduce  fishing  levels  in 
an  effort  to  rebuild  stocks  to  stay  in  compliance  with  the  Magnu-
son-Stevens  Act.  In  2004,  we  implemented  Amendment  13,  which 
substantially  decreased  the  fishing  effort  on  several  stocks.  This 
amendment also set up further reductions beginning in 2009 to end 
overfishing  on  the  remaining  stocks  and  to  keep  us  on  track  to  re-
build all of the stocks by 2014. 

In an attempt to reduce the economic harm to fishermen, Amend-
ment 13’s fishing reductions were set at the bare minimum bar. It 
was acknowledged they only had a 50 percent chance of success. In-
herent in that was a 50 percent chance of failure. Now we are fac-
ing  the  next  big  change  to  the  Fishery  Management  Plan,  which 
is Amendment 16. 

To  prepare  for  this  amendment,  we  recently  completed  the  com-
prehensive midpoint evaluation assessing the status of the ground-
fish  stocks.  This  2008  groundfish  assessment,  which  we  call  the 
GARM,  represents  the  work  of  more  than  70  scientists  from 
throughout  the  New  England  region—including  NOAA  fishery  sci-
entists—from  the  States,  from  academia,  from  industry,  from  con-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

sultants  and  independent  reviewers.  This  assessment  comprises 
hundreds of thousands of observations, records, and measurements 
from 13 different sources, including from the fishing industry itself. 
Results of these stock assessments are mixed but not entirely un-
expected,  given  the  probability  of  success  set  forth  in  Amendment 
13.  Results  show  that  while  there  have  been  large  reductions  in 
fishing mortality, overfishing is still occurring in 13 stocks. This is 
5 more stocks than in 2004. 

The assessments also documented a decline in productivity in av-
erage weight for several species, indicating slower than anticipated 
growth  for  these  stocks.  A  number  of  these  stocks  are  not  increas-
ing  at  the  rate  necessary  to  meet  the  rebuilding  deadlines  identi-
fied by the Council in the Fishery Management Plan. 

There  is  some  good  news,  though.  Some  stocks  that  were  the 
focus  of  concern  when  Amendment  13  was  developed  have  experi-
enced  major  recoveries.  For  instance,  Georges  Bank  haddock  has 
exceeded its rebuilding target. Gulf of Maine haddock is nearly re-
built.  We  also  have  seen  major  proportional  increases  in  some 
flounder stocks. 

I want to briefly identify where things stand in terms of manage-
ment and what we need to do to meet the requirements of the man-
dates  of  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Act.  We  must  put  in  place  meas-
ures  to  continue  rebuilding  groundfish  stocks.  Amendment  16  is 
the  tool  for  this.  Council  action  has  been  delayed  on  this  amend-
ment,  so  we  need  to  consider  other  options  for  the  2009  fishing 
year. 

The  most  likely  option  for  this  is  an  interim  rule  that  would  be 
in  place  until  Amendment  16  is  finalized.  I  don’t  know  yet  what 
will be in that interim rule. At present, it is clear that some reduc-
tions,  additional  reductions  in  fishing  mortality  are  probably  un-
avoidable.  But  we  will  work  with  the  Council  and  the  industry  to 
put those in place. 

In  terms  of  the  overarching  management  strategy  for  the  New 
England  groundfish,  it  is  worth  noting  that  the  existing  manage-
ment strategy of relying primarily on effort controls, as opposed to 
catch controls, has had mixed success and has not entirely achieved 
the  desired  results.  To  reach  our  ultimate  goal  of  healthy  fish 
stocks and a productive fishing industry, I think it is important to 
think beyond the historic management tools, and I am pleased that 
the Council is considering sector management as an alternative. 

Unfortunately,  there  is  no  silver  bullet  that  will  solve  all  the 
problems  in  the  fisheries.  I  think  we  will  need  to  use  a  variety  of 
traditional  and  new  management  tools,  probably  including  catch 
limits,  effort  controls,  and  maybe  market  approaches.  We  look  for-
ward to ideas that may come from this forum to help us solve some 
of these issues. 

I also wanted to point out that fishing is not the only factor that 
can  affect  fish  populations.  Our  recent  stock  assessments  showed 
a decline in average weight for several species, which means slower 
than  anticipated  growth  of  these  resources.  We  consider  these  fac-
tors when we set the rebuilding targets. And as our understanding 
of marine ecosystems improves, we will continue to incorporate this 
information  into  our  models  and,  ultimately,  improve  management 
of the fishery. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

In  conclusion,  I  want  to  reiterate  that  our  goal  is  the  same  as 
your goal. It is to have healthy stocks supporting productive fishing 
livelihoods  in  coastal  communities.  I  want  this  for  New  England, 
and I want it for other coastal communities around the country. 

Rebuilding fish stocks is not easy. No one knows this better than 
the men and the women fishing the waters of New England. Never-
theless, we need to achieve this goal so we can revive those commu-
nities  dependent  on  groundfish  and  can  continue  the  fishing  tradi-
tions that are a foundation of this region’s culture and economy. 

Thank  you,  Senator  Snowe,  for  holding  this  hearing.  I  welcome 
any  questions.  Most  of  all,  I  look  forward  to  any  ideas  that  may 
come out of this panel or this audience. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Balsiger follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JAMES W.  BALSIGER,  PH.D.  ACTING ASSISTANT 
ADMINISTRATOR,  NATIONAL MARINE FISHERIES SERVICE,  NATIONAL OCEANIC AND 
ATMOSPHERIC ADMINISTRATION, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 
Good  afternoon,  Senator  Snowe.  I  am  Dr.  James  Balsiger,  the  Acting  Assistant 
Administrator of the National Marine Fisheries Service (NMFS) within the National 
Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA)  under  the  Department  of  Com-
merce. Thank you for inviting me to testify at this important hearing on New Eng-
land groundfish. 
Background 

Commercial  fishing  for  cod,  haddock,  flounder,  and  other  fish  species  has  been  a 
long tradition in New England, and this fishing history is tied tightly to the culture 
and  economics  of  the  region.  Before  serving  in  my  current  job,  I  was  the  Regional 
Administrator  for  Fisheries  in  Alaska  where  fishing  is  also  of  paramount  impor-
tance. My ultimate goal as the head of Fisheries for NOAA is to see healthy stocks 
supporting productive fishing livelihoods in coastal communities around the Nation. 
We  have  some  work  to  do  to  reach  that  goal  in  New  England,  but  we  are  making 
progress  and  I  am  confident  we  will  reach  that  point  in  the  not  too  distant  future. 
NOAA  bases  its  fishery  management  decisions  for  New  England  groundfish  on 
key  legislative  directives,  management  plans,  and  scientific  assessments.  The  Mag-
nuson-Stevens Fishery Conservation and Management Reauthorization Act (Magnu-
son-Stevens  Act)  is  the  key  legislative  directive  under  which  NOAA  manages  the 
Nation’s  fisheries.  This  important  legislation  requires  us  to  end  overfishing  and  re-
build stocks, among other things. The new Magnuson-Stevens Act, which was signed 
by the President in January 2007, also requires us to implement annual catch limits 
and  accountability  measures  which  create  an  even  more  conservative  management 
system. 

NOAA,  together  with  the  New  England  Fishery  Management  Council  (Council), 
manages  New  England  groundfish  as  part  of  a  19-stock  complex  called  the  North-
east Multispecies Fishery. Atlantic cod, haddock, pollock, and various flounders are 
a  few  of  the  species  that  make  up  the  Fishery  which  has  been  heavily  overfished 
for  several  decades.  In  recent  years,  we  have  had  to  sharply  reduce  fishing  levels 
in an effort to rebuild stocks in compliance with the law. 
Amendment 13 

In 2004, the Northeast Multispecies Fishery Management Plan (Plan) was amend-
ed  to  strengthen  the  work  that  NOAA  and  the  Council  were  doing  to  manage  the 
Fishery.  Amendment  13  of  the  Plan  instituted  major  changes  in  the  Northeast 
Multispecies  Fishery.  These  changes  substantially  decreased  fishing  effort  on  sev-
eral stocks and planned for further reductions beginning in 2009 to end overfishing 
on  the  remaining  stocks  and  keep  us  on  track  to  rebuild  all  of  the  stocks  by  2014 
as  required  by  the  current  Plan.  In  an  attempt  to  reduce  economic  harm  to  fisher-
men,  Amendment  13’s  fishing  reductions  were  the  bare  minimum,  and  only  had  a 
50  percent  probability  of  success.  In  addition,  Amendment  13  called  for  regular  ad-
justments to the Plan (such as Framework Adjustment 42 that further reduced fish-
ing effort) and a comprehensive mid-point evaluation in 2008 to re-assess the status 
of  the  groundfish  stocks  given  the  2004  fishing  reductions.  This  evaluation  was 
meant to provide the data necessary to make any needed changes to the rebuilding 
programs for the beginning of the 2009 fishing year. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

GARM 

10 

NOAA’s work to manage the Nation’s fisheries, including groundfish in the North-
east  Multispecies  Fishery,  is  based  on  sound  science.  Most  recently,  regional  sci-
entists completed the Groundfish Assessment Review Meeting, or GARM. This 2008 
groundfish assessment represents the work of more than 70 scientists from through-
out  the  New  England  region,  including  those  from  NOAA,  the  states,  academia,  in-
dustry, consultants, and independent reviewers. The process used to develop the as-
sessment was fully documented, open, and public during 4 week-long meetings over 
a year’s time. The meeting’s results were peer reviewed, drawing on the services of 
22 scientists unaffiliated with the NMFS Northeast Fisheries Science Center, many 
from  outside  the  United  States.  The  assessments  comprise  hundreds  of  thousands 
of observations, records, and measurements from 13 different sources, including the 
fishermen. 

The GARM process was exceptionally rigorous, and the results are consistent with 
NOAA’s  obligations  under  national  standard  2  in  § 301(a)(2)  of  the  Magnuson-Ste-
vens Act, which mandates that management measures be ‘‘based upon the best sci-
entific  information  available.’’  Northeast  region  stock  assessments  are  among  the 
most scrutinized of any in the world, and the methodologies have been reviewed by 
the National Academy of Sciences. By any measure these assessments set a reliable 
benchmark for the management of New England groundfish. 

Results  of  these  stock  assessments  are  mixed  but  not  entirely  unexpected  given 
the probability of success set forth in Amendment 13. Results show that while there 
have been large reductions in fishing mortality since 2004, overfishing is still occur-
ring in 13 stocks, five more than in 2004. The assessments also document a decline 
in productivity and average weight for several species, indicating slower-than-antici-
pated  growth  for  these  stocks.  A  number  of  these  stocks  are  not  increasing  at  the 
rate necessary to meet the rebuilding deadlines identified by the Council in the fish-
ery management plan. 

There is some good news though. Some stocks that were the focus of concern when 
Amendment  13  was  developed  have  experienced  major  recoveries.  For  instance, 
Georges  Bank  haddock  has  exceeded  its  rebuilding  target,  and  Gulf  of  Maine  had-
dock  is  nearly  rebuilt.  We  have  also  seen  major  proportional  increases  in  two 
yellowtail flounder stocks and southern windowpane flounder. 
Amendment 16 

Now  I  want  to  review  briefly  where  things  stand  in  terms  of  management  and 

what we must do next to meet our statutory requirements. 

The  next  major  amendment  to  the  Northeast  Multispecies  Fishery  Management 
Plan  is  Amendment  16,  which  was  scheduled  to  be  implemented  in  May  2009.  Be-
cause of a desire to more thoroughly consider the new stock assessment results, the 
Council delayed action on Amendment 16. Final implementation of this amendment 
is not anticipated until September or October 2009 at the earliest. At its September 
meeting, the Council asked the Secretary of Commerce to take interim action while 
it  continues  to  develop  the  amendment.  At  this  meeting,  the  Council  also  rec-
ommended interim measures for NOAA to put in place during the fishing year start-
ing  in  May  2009.  As  we  look  at  our  options,  we  are  considering  the  Council’s  rec-
ommendations but ultimately, we need to ensure that we continue to rebuild stocks 
and  comply  with  the  law  and  it  doesn’t  appear  that  the  Council’s  recommendations 
will get us to where we need to be. At present, it is clear that additional reductions 
in fishing mortality for some of these stocks will be unavoidable. 
Next Steps 

In  terms  of  the  overarching  management  strategy  for  New  England  groundfish, 
it is worth noting that the existing management strategy of relying primarily on ef-
fort controls as opposed to catch controls has had mixed success and has not entirely 
achieved  the  desired  results.  To  reach  our  ultimate  goal  of  healthy  fish  stocks  and 
a  productive  fishing  industry,  I  think  it  is  important  to  think  beyond  the  historic 
management  tools  and  I’m  pleased  that  the  Council  is  considering  sector  manage-
ment  as  an  alternative.  Unfortunately,  there  is  no  silver  bullet  that  will  solve  all 
of  the  problems  in  this  Fishery.  We’ll  need  to  use  a  variety  of  traditional  and  new 
management tools including catch limits, effort controls, and market approaches. 

Our  position  on  these  basic  management  issues  is  clear.  We  will  support  any 
number  of  conservation  and  management  measures  but  they  need  to  demonstrate 
a  high  probability  of  meeting  the  fundamental  Magnuson-Stevens  Act  mandates  to 
end overfishing and rebuild stocks in a timely manner. 

I also want to point out that fishing is not the only factor that can affect fish pop-
ulations.  Our  recent  stock  assessments  showed  a  decline  in  average  weight  for  sev-
eral species, which means slower-than-anticipated growth. We consider these factors 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

when we set the rebuilding targets and as our understanding of marine ecosystems 
improves,  we  will  continue  to  incorporate  this  information  to  improve  our  models 
and ultimately improve our management of the Fishery. 
Conclusion 

In conclusion, I want to reiterate that NOAA’s goal is to have healthy stocks sup-
porting  productive  fishing  livelihoods.  I  want  this  for  New  England,  and  I  want  it 
for other coastal communities around the country. Rebuilding fish stocks isn’t easy. 
No one knows this better than the men and women fishing the waters off New Eng-
land. Nevertheless, we need to achieve this goal so that we can revive those commu-
nities  dependent  on  groundfish  and  continue  the  fishing  traditions  that  are  a  foun-
dation of this region’s culture and economy. Thank you, Senator Snowe, for holding 
this  hearing.  I  welcome  any  questions  you  may  have  and  I  look  forward  to  con-
tinuing to work with you on this important issue. 

Senator SNOWE. I appreciate that, Dr. Balsiger. Thank you. 
Mr. Stockwell? 

STATEMENT OF TERRY STOCKWELL, DIRECTOR OF EXTERNAL 
AFFAIRS,  DEPARTMENT  OF  MARINE  RESOURCES,  STATE  OF 
MAINE;  MEMBER,  NEW  ENGLAND  FISHERY  MANAGEMENT 
COUNCIL 
Mr. STOCKWELL. Thank you, Senator Snowe. 
My  name  is  Terry  Stockwell.  I  am  the  Director  of  External  Af-
fairs for the Maine Department of Marine Resources and the Com-
missioner’s  designee  on  the  New  England  Fishery  Management 
Council. 

I  am  speaking  today  in  my  role  as  the  Director  of  External  Af-

fairs, and I would like—— 

Senator SNOWE. Could you just speak more into the mike? 
Mr. STOCKWELL. I sure will. 
Senator SNOWE. Thank you. 
Mr.  STOCKWELL.  And  I  guess  it  is  appropriate  I  would  like  to 
begin by thanking you, Senator Snowe, for this hearing on the sta-
tus and future of the groundfishery in the State of Maine. 

Maine’s  groundfishing  industry  is  on  the  verge  of  collapse.  The 
cumulative impact of multiple amendments and framework adjust-
ments  have  eliminated  over  three-quarters  of  Maine’s  active 
groundfish fleet since the early 1990s. Currently, there are roughly 
70  active  vessels,  as  compared  to  nearly  350  in  1990.  Over  the 
same  time  period,  the  overall  landings  have  dropped  from  a  high 
of  about  45  million  pounds  to  a  little  less  than  10  million  pounds 
in 2007. 

Consequently  and  concurrently,  the  shoreside  infrastructure  as-
sociated with the fishery has also greatly declined. There are many 
small  ports  coast-wide  where  groundfish  vessels  no  longer  moor  or 
where  groundfish  vessels  are  no  longer  unloaded.  The  once  preva-
lent  local  gear  shops  and  icehouses  have  closed,  and  many  vessel 
owners are reducing their maintenance and safety schedules to the 
point where there are clear concerns for human safety. 

For a number of reasons, the exodus of large boats from Portland 
to  Massachusetts  continues.  Portland  Fish  Exchange  groundfish 
volume fell from 23 million pounds in 2003 to just under 9 million 
pounds  in  2007.  The  Exchange  is  forecasting  8  million  pounds  for 
this calendar year, barely their break-even point. 

I  am  very  concerned  that  the  majority  of  Maine’s  offshore  boats 
will  eventually  relocate  and  that  all  the  historic  groundfish  ports 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

and  related  communities  will  soon  cease  to  exist.  Maine  has  been 
committed to aggressively rebuilding the groundfish stocks in order 
to sustain the future of our fishery and coastal communities. 

However, the overall news from the final GARM III report is ex-
tremely grim. With the exception of haddock, plaice, and redfish in 
the Gulf of Maine, the report concludes that 11 of the multispecies 
stocks  are  now  both  overfished  and  experience  overfishing  as  com-
pared to 7 in 2004. 

In  the  Gulf  of  Maine,  pollock,  witch  flounder,  winter  flounder, 
and  northern  windowpane  have  seriously  deteriorated  in  status. 
The  mortality  reductions  needed  for  the  Gulf  of  Maine  are  in  the 
40 percent range. 

The  combination  of  two-vessel  permit  buybacks,  severe  cuts  in 
the  days  at  sea,  large  area  and  rolling  closures,  increased  mesh 
sizes,  and  trip  limits  have  greatly  reduced  the  fishing  effort.  But 
with  the  exception  of  haddock,  they  have  not  successfully  rebuilt 
the Gulf of Maine stocks. 

Maine’s  strong  support  for  the  development  and  implementation 
of  sector  management  in  Amendment  16  clearly  underscores  the 
need  for  measures  that  sustain  the  fishing  industry  while  rebuild-
ing  the  groundfish  stocks.  But  the  implementation  of  sectors  has 
been  delayed  until  2010.  Guidelines  on  revisions  to  the  National 
Standard 1 are not yet available, and the devil in the details of the 
costly  reporting  and  monitoring  program  are  still  not  yet  deter-
mined. 

At the September council meeting in Providence, the regional ad-
ministrator  stated  that  the  upcoming  need  for  an  interim  action 
was a result of the failure of the Council to do its work. But there 
are a number of reasons, including the delay of GARM III and the 
lack of adequate agency resources, that contributed to the need for 
this interim action. 

And while the Council voted to request that the National Marine 
Fisheries Service initiate an interim action in order to remain com-
pliant  with  the  court-ordered  rebuilding  goals,  the  proposed  meas-
ures will have a significant impact on the fishing fleet and industry 
that is already under huge pressure. 

My  sense  is  that  Maine’s  groundfish  industry  is  on  the  edge  of 
changes  that  they  can’t  recover  from  and  that  many  in  the  fleet 
have  already  crossed  that  threshold.  Next  year’s  interim  manage-
ment  measures  may  push  many  others  to  a  similar  point.  And 
while we continue to reduce fishing mortality and to make progress 
toward  accomplishing  the  biomass  targets,  the  question  to  ask  is 
‘‘at what cost?’’ 

In  Maine,  we  have  already  lost  a  significant  portion  of  our  fleet. 
The  interim  regulations  will  further  exacerbate  this  trend,  weak-
ening  the  position  of  the  industry  in  coastal  communities  to  sur-
vive.  Maine  obviously  isn’t  alone  in  this  situation.  The  entire 
groundfish fishery is in grave condition. 

Some individuals in two-permit banks have had the foresight and 
ability  to  acquire  additional  permits  and  days  at  sea  to  help  them 
through this very difficult time. But they are also in the same posi-
tion  of  less  fish  available  to  land,  significantly  increased  operating 
expenses,  and  fish  prices  that  haven’t  significantly  increased  over 
the last 5 years. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

The State of Maine and Maine’s groundfishery cannot survive an-
other  round  of  days-at-sea  reductions.  Amendment  16  and  the  up-
coming Amendment 17 must implement output control-based man-
agement  to  enable  the  stocks  to  recover  without  requiring  the  de-
mise  of  Maine’s  remaining  groundfish  industry.  The  movement  to-
ward  sector  management  should  increase  fishermen’s  profitability 
while  greatly  reducing  discards  and  ensuring  that  TACs * are  not 
exceeded. 

However,  the  high  costs  associated  with  the  necessary  moni-
toring requirement are jeopardizing its implementation. Fishermen 
who  are  barely  breaking  even  can’t  be  expected  to  pay  costs  esti-
mated at $1,200 a day to meet the sector monitoring requirements. 
While  some  early  sectors  have  been  successful  in  getting  grant 
funding for implementation and monitoring, I don’t think that this 
strategy can be relied on for future sectors. 

NMFS  must  follow  through  on  their  commitment  to  provide  the 
staff  and  resources  necessary  to  implement  sector  management  in 
a  timely  manner.  With  additional  measures,  Maine,  the  Council, 
and  the  National  Marine  Fisheries  Service  can  come  up  with  a  so-
lution  to  this  problem.  While  sector  management  assigns  responsi-
bility  to  the  sectors  for  the  development  and  implementation  of 
their operations plans, given the continued decline of the multispe-
cies  resources,  a  centuries-old  way  of  life  cannot  disappear  for  the 
lack of administrative resources. 

New England’s groundfish stocks will eventually recover and will 
provide viable economic rewards for the fishing industry’s substan-
tial sacrifices. But to achieve this goal, we need a renewed commit-
ment  to  New  England’s  entire  groundfishery.  That  means  paying 
attention to Maine, New Hampshire, Massachusetts, Rhode Island, 
and Connecticut. 

It  means  we  need  to  think  about  and  discuss  new  management 
ideas and be able to act in a much more timely way than we have 
been able to do in the past. To be honest, the management system 
that  we  have  all  had  a  hand  in  creating  and  implementing  hasn’t 
served  us  well  in  this  regard.  As  I  mentioned  before,  we  need 
thoughtful  development  and  consideration  of  new  sector  proposals. 
In addition to sector management, there are other options, which 
will help ensure Maine’s future and that of the entire New England 
fleet  in  the  groundfishery.  This  should  include,  but  not  be  limited 
to,  consideration  of  an  industry-funded  buyout,  thoughtful  discus-
sion  and  deliberation  on  whether  individual  fishing  quotas  would 
better  serve  industry  in  the  future,  and  a  workable  area  manage-
ment concept. 

An  industry  buyout  would  help  reduce  overcapacity,  increase 
profitability  for  those  who  remain,  and  provide  an  opportunity  for 
future  community-based  actions  through  an  associated  permit- 
banking  component.  But  there  are  concerns  about  how  already 
cash-starved vessels would pay the tax on landings when everybody 
in the fishery would be subject to the current drafts of the idea. 

Additionally, there are concerns that an industry-funded buyback 
may  exacerbate  the  shift  of  permits  and  vessels  out  of  Maine.  So 
we have got much work to do with this idea, but it certainly merits 

* Total Allowable Catch. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

timely  consideration  as  one  part  of  assisting  the  groundfish  indus-
try through this incredibly difficult period. 

Within  Amendment  17,  individual  fishing  quotas  could  further 
increase  fishermen’s  profitability.  This  has  been  a  taboo  subject  in 
the groundfishery in the past. But again, I believe that this concept 
may help some industry sectors to survive in the future. 

Making  it  work  might  mean  having  an  in-shore  and  offshore 
component  that  allows  the  folks  in  these  areas  to  choose  whether 
or  not  to  move  toward  an  IFQ * system.  This  would  recognize  that 
different  solutions  would  likely  be  tailored  for  the  unique  cir-
cumstances  facing  different  parts  of  the  groundfishery.  This  is  a 
huge shift in position for Maine and for New England, but it must 
be  considered  to  see  what  will  help  us  do  a  better  job  for  the 
groundfish industry and the resource. 

Within  Amendment  17,  area  management  could  help  revitalize 
and preserve Maine’s small fishing communities, particularly in the 
Midcoast  and  Down  East  areas.  The  recovery  of  multispecies  com-
plex should not be dependent upon the sacrifice of an entire State’s 
fishing  industry.  Area  management  holds  promise  in  providing  a 
future  for  small-scale,  locally  based  components  of  the  groundfish 
fishery, but there are issues of how areas under area management 
fit within an entire fishery, how to share among subdivisions avail-
able  stock,  how  to  pay  for  the  management  costs  associated  with 
area  management.  But  nonetheless,  like  these  other  ideas,  area 
management must be part of the deliberations on how to revitalize 
the New England groundfish fishery. 

As I mentioned earlier in my statement, we are in danger of los-
ing much of Maine and New England’s groundfish fishery. If man-
agement  continues  on  the  traditional  path,  I  suspect  that  will  be 
the result. Maine is committed to working with you, the other New 
England  States,  the  New  England  Fishery  Management  Council, 
the Fisheries Service to make sure that this doesn’t happen. 

I ask that you continue your great work with the Maine fisheries 
to  do  whatever  is  necessary  to  secure  long-term  funding  to  ensure 
that  sector  management  is  fully  implemented  as  soon  as  possible 
to promote an industry buyout for those who wish to get out of the 
fishery,  to  enable  a  viable  monitoring  system  for  those  who  wish 
to  remain,  and  to  make  sure  the  management  process  works  for 
stock rebuilding in a vibrant New England groundfish fleet. 

Thank you for this opportunity to testify. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Stockwell follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF TERRY STOCKWELL,  DIRECTOR OF EXTERNAL AFFAIRS, 
DEPARTMENT OF MARINE RESOURCES,  STATE OF MAINE;  MEMBER,  NEW ENGLAND 
FISHERY MANAGEMENT COUNCIL 
My  name  is  Terry  Stockwell;  I  am  the  Director  of  External  Affairs  for  the  Maine 
Department  of  Marine  Resources,  and  I  am  the  Commissioner’s  designee  on  the 
New  England  Fishery  Management  Council.  I  speak  today  in  my  role  as  the  Direc-
tor of External Affairs. I’d like to begin by thanking Senator Snowe for this hearing 
on the status and future of the groundfish fishery in Maine. 

Maine’s groundfishing industry is on the verge of collapse. The cumulative impact 
of  multiple  Amendments  and  Framework  Adjustments  has  eliminated  over  three- 
quarters  of  Maine’s  active  groundfish  fleet  since  the  early  1990s.  Currently,  there 
are roughly 70 active vessels as compared to nearly 350 active vessels in 1990. Over 

* Individual Fishing Quota. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

the  same  time  period,  the  overall  landings  have  also  dropped  from  a  high  of  44.8 
million  pounds  (worth  approximately  $33  million)  in  1991  to  9.7  million  pounds 
(worth  approximately  $10.3  million)  in  2007.  Consequently  and  concurrently,  the 
shore-side infrastructure associated with the fishery has also greatly declined. There 
are many small ports, coast-wide, where groundfish vessels no longer moor or where 
groundfish vessels are no longer unloaded. The once prevalent, local gear shops and 
ice houses have closed, and many vessel owners are reducing their maintenance and 
safety schedules to the point where there are clear concerns for human safety. 

For  a  number  of  reasons,  the  exodus  of  large  boats  from  Portland  to  Massachu-
setts  continues.  The  Portland  Fish  Exchange’s  groundfish  volume  fell  from  23  mil-
lion  pounds  in  2003  to  just  under  9  million  pounds  in  2007.  The  Exchange  is  fore-
casting 8 million pounds for this calendar year—barely their break-even point. I am 
very concerned that the majority of Maine’s off-shore boats will eventually re-locate 
and  that  all  the  historic  groundfish  ports  and  related  communities  will  soon  cease 
to exist. 

Maine  has  been  committed  to  aggressively  rebuilding  the  groundfish  stocks  in 
order  to  sustain  the  future  of  our  fishery  and  coastal  communities.  However,  the 
overall news from the final GARM III report is extremely grim. With the exception 
of haddock, plaice and redfish in the Gulf of Maine (GOM), the report concludes that 
11  of  the  multispecies  stocks  are  now  both  overfished  and  experiencing  overfishing 
compared  to  7  in  2004.  In  the  GOM,  pollock,  witch  flounder,  winter  flounder  and 
northern  windowpane  flounder  have  seriously  deteriorated  in  status.  The  mortality 
reductions needed for the GOM are in the 40 percent range. The combination of two 
vessel/permit  buybacks,  severe  cuts  in  days  at  sea,  large  area  and  rolling  closures, 
increased  mesh  sizes  and  trip  limits  have  greatly  reduced  the  fishing  effort,  but 
with  the  exception  of  haddock  they  have  not  successfully  rebuilt  the  GOM  stocks. 
Our  strong  support  for  the  development  and  implementation  of  sector  manage-
ment in Amendment 16 clearly underscores the need for measures that sustain fish-
ing  industry  components  while  rebuilding  groundfish  stocks.  But  the  implementa-
tion  of  sectors  has  been  delayed  until  2010,  guidance  on  the  revisions  to  National 
Standard  1  is  not  yet  available,  and  the  devil  in  the  details  of  the  costly  reporting/ 
monitoring  programs  are  still  not  yet  determined.  At  the  September  Council  meet-
ing in Providence, Rhode Island; the Regional Administrator stated that the upcom-
ing  need  for  an  interim  action  was  the  result  of  the  failure  of  the  Council  to  do  its 
work.  There  are  a  number  of  reasons,  including  the  delay  of  GARM  III  and  lack  of 
adequate agency resources that have contributed to the need for this interim action. 
While the Council voted to request that NMFS initiate an interim action in order 
to  remain  compliant  with  the  court  ordered  rebuilding  goals  of  Amendment  13,  the 
proposed  measures  will  have  a  significant  impact  on  a  fishing  fleet  and  industry 
that  is  already  under  huge  pressure.  My  sense  is  that  Maine’s  groundfish  industry 
is on the edge of changes that they cannot recover from, and that many in the fleet 
have already crossed that threshold. Next year’s interim management measures will 
likely push many others to a similar point. 

While  we  continue  to  reduce  fishing  mortality  and  to  make  progress  toward  ac-
complishing  the  biomass  targets  the  question  to  ask  is  ‘‘at  what  cost’’?  In  Maine, 
we’ve already lost a significant portion of our fleet. The interim regulations will fur-
ther  exacerbate  this  trend  weakening  the  position  of  the  industry  and  coastal  com-
munities to survive. Maine obviously isn’t alone in this situation; the entire ground-
fish fishery is in grave condition. Some individuals and two permit banks have had 
the  foresight  and  ability  to  acquire  additional  permits  and  DAS  to  help  them 
through  this  very  difficult  time.  But,  they’re  also  in  the  same  position  of  less  fish 
available  to  land,  significantly  increased  operating  expenses,  and  fish  prices  that 
haven’t significantly increased over the last 5 years. 

The  State  of  Maine  and  Maine’s  groundfishery  cannot  survive  another  round  of 
days-at-sea  effort  reductions.  Amendments  16  and  the  upcoming  Amendment  17 
must  implement  output  control  based  management  to  enable  the  stocks  to  recover 
without  requiring  the  demise  of  Maine’s  remaining  groundfish  industry.  The  move-
ment  toward  sector  management  should  increase  fishermen’s  profitability  while 
greatly  reducing  discards  and  ensuring  that  TACs  are  not  exceeded.  However,  the 
high  costs  associated  with  the  necessary  monitoring  requirements  are  jeopardizing 
its implementation. Fishermen who are barely breaking even cannot be expected to 
pay  costs  estimated  at  $1200  a  day  to  meet  the  sector  monitoring  requirements. 
While some early sectors have been successful in getting grant funds for implemen-
tation and monitoring, I don’t think that this strategy can be relied upon for future 
sectors.  NMFS  must  follow  through  on  their  commitment  to  provide  the  staff  and 
resources necessary to implement sector management in a timely manner. With ad-
ditional  resources;  Maine,  the  NEFMC  and  NMFS  can  come  up  with  a  solution  to 
this problem. While sector management assigns responsibility to the sectors for the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

development  and  implementation  of  their  operations  plans,  given  the  continued  de-
cline of the multispecies resources, a centuries-old way of life can not disappear for 
lack of administrative resources. 

New  England’s  groundfish  stocks  will  eventually  recover,  and  will  provide  viable 
economic  rewards  for  the  fishing  industry’s  substantial  sacrifices.  To  achieve  this 
goal,  we  need  a  renewed  commitment  to  New  England’s  entire  groundfish  fishery. 
This  means  paying  attention  to  Maine,  New  Hampshire,  Massachusetts,  Rhode  Is-
land, and Connecticut. It means that we need to think about and discuss new man-
agement  ideas  and  be  able  to  act  in  a  much  more  timely  way  than  we’ve  been  able 
to  do  in  the  past.  To  be  honest,  the  management  system  that  we’ve  all  had  a  hand 
in creating and implementing hasn’t served us well in this regard. 

As  I’d  mentioned  before,  we  need  thoughtful  development  and  consideration  of 
new  sector  proposals.  In  addition  to  Sector  Management,  there  are  other  options 
which  will  help  ensure  Maine’s  future,  and  that  of  the  entire  New  England  fleet, 
in the groundfishery. This should include, but not be limited to, consideration of an 
industry  funded  buy  out,  thoughtful  discussion  and  deliberation  on  whether  indi-
vidual fishing quota (IFQ) systems would better serve the fishery in the future, and 
a workable area management concept. 

An  Industry  Buyout  would  help  reduce  overcapacity,  increase  profitability  for 
those  who  remain,  and  provide  an  opportunity  for  future  community  based  access 
through  an  associated  Permit  Banking  component.  But,  there  also  concerns  about 
how  already  cash  starved  vessels  will  pay  for  the  tax  on  landings  that  everybody 
in  the  fishery  would  be  subject  to  in  the  current  drafts  of  this  idea.  Additionally, 
there are concerns that an industry funded buyback may exacerbate the shift of per-
mits  and  vessels  out  of  Maine.  So,  we’ve  got  much  work  to  do  with  this  idea  but 
it  certainly  merits  timely  consideration  as  one  part  of  assisting  the  groundfish  in-
dustry through this incredibly difficult period. 

Within  Amendment  17,  individual  fishing  quotas  could  further  increase  fisher-
men’s  profitability.  This  has  been  a  taboo  subject  in  the  groundfishery  in  the  past 
but,  again,  I  believe  that  the  concept  may  help  some  industry  sectors  to  survive  in 
the  future.  Making  it  work  might  mean  having  an  inshore  and  offshore  component 
that  allows  the  folks  in  these  areas  to  choose  whether  to  move  toward  an  IFQ  sys-
tem.  This  would  recognize  that  different  solutions  will  likely  be  tailored  for  the 
unique  circumstances  facing  different  parts  of  the  groundfishery.  This  is  a  huge 
shift in position for Maine and for New England but I believe it must be considered 
to  see  if  it  will  help  us  do  better  than  we’ve  done  for  the  groundfish  industry  and 
resource. 

Within  Amendment  17,  Area  Management  could  help  revitalize  and  preserve 
Maine’s small fishing communities—particularly in Midcoast and Down East areas. 
The  recovery  of  the  multispecies  complex  should  not  be  dependent  on  the  sacrifice 
of  an  entire  state’s  fishing  industry.  Area  management  holds  promise  in  providing 
a  future  for  small  scale,  locally  based  components  of  the  groundfish  fishery.  There 
are issues of how areas under area management fit within the entire fishery, of how 
to  share  among  subdivisions  of  available  stock  components,  e.g.,  how  do  you  parse 
out  Gulf  of  Maine  cod  to  areas,  sectors,  etc.;  and  how  to  pay  for  the  management 
costs  associated  with  area  management.  None  the  less,  like  these  other  ideas,  I  be-
lieve  area  management  must  be  part  of  the  deliberations  on  how  to  revitalize  the 
New England groundfish fishery. 

As  I  mentioned  earlier  in  my  statement,  we  are  in  danger  of  losing  much  of 
Maine, and New England’s, groundfish fishery. If management continues on the tra-
ditional path, I suspect that will be the result. Maine is committed to working with 
you, the other New England States, the New England Fishery Management Council, 
and  NMFS  to  make  sure  that  this  doesn’t  happen.  I  ask  that  you  continue  your 
great  work  with  Maine’s  fisheries  to  do  whatever  is  necessary  to  secure  long-term 
funding to ensure that Sector Management is fully implemented as soon as possible, 
to  promote  an  industry  buyout  for  those  who  wish  to  get  out  of  the  fishery  and  to 
enable  a  viable  monitoring  system  for  those  who  with  to  remain,  and  to  make  sure 
the  management  process  works  for  stock  rebuilding  and  a  vibrant  New  England 
groundfish fleet. 

Thank you for this opportunity to testify. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you very much, Mr. Stockwell. Hopefully, 

we can work together on that goal. 

Mr. Cunningham? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

STATEMENT OF COLIN M. ‘‘KIP’’ CUNNINGHAM, JR., VICE 

17 

CHAIRMAN, NEW ENGLAND FISHERY MANAGEMENT COUNCIL 
Mr.  CUNNINGHAM.  Good  afternoon,  Senator  Snowe.  On  behalf  of 
the New England Fishery Management Council, I am both pleased 
and honored to be here. 

I  have  served  for  5  years  on  the  Council  and  3  terms  as  Vice 
Chairman.  I  currently  serve  as  the  Chairman  of  the  Groundfish 
Committee.  My  comments  represent  my  opinion,  not  the  official 
council  position.  But  I  will  try  to  convey  the  sense  of  the  Council. 
The  Council  is  currently  preparing  Amendment  16  to  the 
Groundfish  Management  Plan  to  continue  the  rebuilding  adopted 
in 2004 with Amendment 13 to meet time lines mandated in Mag-
nuson.  Planning  for  Amendment  16  began  in  the  spring  of  2006. 
The Council, the Northeast Regional Office, and the Science Center 
met  a  number  of  times  to  coordinate.  It  became  obvious  that  com-
pleting  Amendment  16  in  time  to  implement  new  regulations  in 
May 2009 would be difficult. 

Further,  the  Science  Center  was  being  asked  to  do  something 
never  before  attempted—to  conduct  complete  benchmark  assess-
ments for 19 stocks at the same time through the GARM. This was 
a  Herculean  task,  and  the  Center  and  the  staff  deserve  a  lot  of 
credit  for  accomplishing  it.  However,  in  June,  it  became  apparent 
that the Service would need to implement an interim action in May 
2009, and Amendment 16 would be implemented in May 2010. 

With  all  the  amendments,  the  Council,  the  Regional  Office,  and 
the  Science  Center  coordinate  their  efforts.  The  Council  would  be 
at a loss if not for the expertise of the Service’s assessment and so-
cial  scientists  that  perform  the  majority  of  the  technical  analysis 
for  our  actions.  However,  this  cooperative  spirit  tends  to  take  a 
backseat once the Service begins preparation on an interim action, 
as is currently the case. 

We expect the combination of the interim action and Amendment 
16 to continue the groundfish building. And in spite of all we hear, 
in  spite  of  all  of  the  gloom  and  doom,  real  progress  is  being  made. 
Georges  Bank  haddock  and  Gulf  of  Maine  haddock  are  rebuilt  5 
years  before  the  plan  deadline.  Redfish  is  nearly  rebuilt  40  years 
before  the  deadline.  Gulf  of  Maine  cod  is  no  longer  overfished  and 
is at a stock size that has not been seen in 30 years. 

Many  of  the  stocks  that  are  still  overfished  are  seeing  increases 
in stock size for the first time in nearly a decade. Fishing mortality 
has  been  reduced.  Groundfish  landings  increased  in  2007  for  the 
first  time  in  6  years.  The  take-home  message  is  that  groundfish 
stocks are being rebuilt. 

Progress  has  been  difficult  at  times  because  stock  status  has 
been dramatically revised. The confidence of fishermen in the man-
agement  system  suffers  each  time  this  happens.  But  as  discour-
aging as that may be for all of us, more and better science is essen-
tial to crafting effective management measures. 

Looking  at  the  future,  groundfish  stocks,  when  rebuilt,  should 
produce  nearly  triple  the  current  catches.  But  managing  a  rebuilt 
fishery  will  have  its  own  set  of  problems.  There  are  a  number  of 
ideas  circulating  to  accomplish  this,  such  as  rights-based  manage-
ment  and  output  management  regimes.  It  is  safe  to  say  that  the 
industry  and  the  Council  believe  that  input  management  controls 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

need to be replaced. The inefficiencies required with input controls 
no longer work. 

Looking  down  the  road  to  recovery,  it  has  to  be  recognized  that 
the industry is not likely to be the same. There may be fewer land-
ing ports. There may be fewer boats. They will land where it is ad-
vantageous  to  do  so.  The  recent  experience  of  the  State  of  Maine 
may be illustrative. 

Groundfish landings for vessels that claim Maine home ports de-
clined  by  27  percent  between  the  fishing  year  2001  and  2007,  less 
than  for  other  groundfish  states.  But  boats  are  often  landing  their 
catches outside the State. So groundfish landings in Maine declined 
63  percent  over  the  same  period.  Yet  Maine  vessels  have  actually 
seen their share of groundfish landings increase. 

At least two organizations with strong ties to Maine communities 
are  acquiring  permits  to  preserve  future  access.  This  is  a  model 
that  can  be  used  without  changes  in  the  current  management  sys-
tem.  Programs  such  as  groundfish  sectors  and  other  rights-based 
systems  provide  current  participants  the  opportunity  to  preserve 
future access. 

Despite  the  revised  timetable,  I  personally  feel  that  Amendment 
16  must  go  forward  to  continue  the  important  stock  rebuilding  we 
have  achieved  to  date.  I  also  feel  that  the  Council  and  fishermen 
are  developing  innovative  management  strategies  scheduled  for 
consideration  in  Amendment  17  that  will  adjust  to  changing  re-
source and economic conditions. 

Senator  Snowe,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  today, 
and we look forward to working with you to continue the rebuilding 
of these important resources. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Cunningham follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF C. M. ‘‘RIP’’ CUNNINGHAM JR., VICE CHAIRMAN, 

NEW ENGLAND FISHERY MANAGEMENT COUNCIL 

Good  morning  Senator  Snowe.  On  behalf  of  the  New  England  Fishery  Manage-
ment Council, I am both pleased and honored to respond to your invitation and hope 
that I can be helpful to you as well as those members of the fishing community who 
are here today. 
Background 

Before  I  begin,  I  would  like  to  offer  a  few  details  about  my  background.  I  have 
served  for  5  years  on  the  Council  and  3  terms  as  its  Vice  Chair.  I  am  currently 
Chairman  of  the  Council’s  Northeast  Multispecies  or  Groundfish  Committee  and 
have  served  in  that  position  for  4  years.  Prior  to  my  appointment  to  the  Council, 
I was the owner, Publisher and Editor-In-Chief of Salt Water Sportsman, the world’s 
largest sport fishing magazine, with approximately four million readers. I am privi-
leged to have made a living by working with and for our valuable marine resources. 
With  18  voting  New  England  Fishery  Council  members,  there  often  are  18  dif-
ferent opinions about the problems we face and their solutions. As a result, my com-
ments  may  not  represent  the  opinion  of  any  individual  member  or  the  official  posi-
tion  of  the  Council,  but  I  will  try  to  convey  the  sense  of  the  Council  as  a  body.  I 
will address three broad topics: the relationship between the National Marine Fish-
eries  Service  and  the  Council  during  the  development  of  Amendment  16  and  the 
pending interim action, the long-term future of the groundfish fishery and how com-
munities can ensure future access to the fishery. 
The  National  Marine  Fisheries  Service  and 

the  Development  of 

Amendment 16 

The  Council  is  currently  preparing  Amendment  16  the  Groundfish  Plan.  As  a 
quick  review,  the  amendment  was  designed  to  continue  the  formal  rebuilding  pro-
grams  first  adopted  in  2004  as  part  of  Amendment  13.  These  programs  were  de-
signed  to  meet  the  strict  rebuilding  time  lines  called  for  in  the  Magnuson-Stevens 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

Fishery  Conservation  and  Management  Act.  Also  included  in  Amendment  13  was 
a  mid-term  review  to  assess  the  progress  of  the  programs  following  several  years 
of  implementation.  The  National  Marine  Fisheries  Service  recently  completed  this 
multi-year  effort  by  assessing  each  of  the  19  groundfish  stocks  at  a  series  of  meet-
ings called the Groundfish Assessment Review Meeting III, or GARM III. (Interest-
ingly, in Norse mythology GARM is the dog that guards the land of the dead, a coin-
cidence that did not go unnoticed.) 

Planning for Amendment 16 began in the spring of 2006. The leaders of the Coun-
cil,  the  Northeast  Regional  Office  of  the  National  Marine  Fisheries  Service  and  the 
Service’s  Northeast  Fisheries  Science  Center  met  several  times  to  coordinate  time 
lines  for  development  of  the  amendment.  It  was  immediately  obvious  that  com-
pleting  Amendment  16  in  time  to  implement  new  regulations  by  May  2009  would 
be nearly impossible. Further, the Science Center was being asked to do something 
never before attempted—to conduct complete ‘‘benchmark’’ assessments for 19 stocks 
at the same time. This was a herculean task, and the NEFSC deserves a lot of cred-
it for that accomplishment. 

Simultaneously, the Council and its staff were asked to digest the assessment in-
formation  and  develop  revised  management  measures  in  an  unrealistically  short 
time frame. To facilitate this process, the Council had to begin its work before know-
ing what the new mortality objectives would be. With the receipt of preliminary in-
formation  from  the  GARM  in  June  2008,  it  became  obvious  that  there  would  have 
to be a change in strategy. In response, the Council and the Regional Office agreed 
to  delay  developing  the  amendment  until  after  all  the  assessment  information  was 
final  and  released  in  September  2008.  At  that  point,  it  also  became  apparent  that 
the Service would need to prepare an interim action by May 2009, and Amendment 
16  would  be  implemented  at  a  later  date.  We  now  expect  the  amendment  to  be  in 
place by May 2010. 

Throughout  the  development  of  Amendment  16,  as  with  all  amendments,  the 
Council,  the  Regional  Office  and  the  Science  Center  coordinated  their  efforts.  The 
Council  would  be  at  a  loss  if  not  for  the  expertise  of  the  Service’s  assessment  and 
social  scientists  that  perform  the  majority  of  the  technical  analyses  that  form  the 
basis of our actions. At times our different perspectives required a healthy exchange 
on  the  issues  and  compromise  by  each  party.  This  cooperative  spirit  tends  to  take 
a backseat once the Service begins preparation of an interim action, as is currently 
the  case.  While  the  Council  discussed  and  provided  suggestions  for  measures  that 
the  Service  might  adopt,  the  Service’s  need  to  complete  the  action  has  resulted  in 
a  loss  of  technical  support  for  the  Council’s  amendment  until  work  on  the  interim 
action is completed. In addition, the need to maintain the Secretary’s independence 
means  that  almost  no  dialogue  occurs  between  the  Council  and  the  Regional  Office 
concerning the design of measures for the interim action. 

We expect the combination of the interim action and Amendment 16 will continue 
the  groundfish  rebuilding  that  has  been  documented.  Make  no  mistake,  in  spite  of 
all  the  rhetoric,  in  spite  of  all  the  gloom  and  doom,  real  progress  is  being  made. 
Let  me  cite  some  examples.  Georges  Bank  haddock  and  Gulf  of  Maine  haddock  are 
rebuilt,  5  years  before  the  planned  deadline.  Redfish  is  nearly  rebuilt,  forty  years 
before the deadline. Gulf of Maine cod is no longer overfished and is at a stock size 
that  has  not  been  seen  in  thirty  years.  Many  of  the  stocks  that  are  still  overfished 
are  seeing  increases  in  stock  size  for  the  first  time  in  nearly  a  decade,  and  fishing 
mortality has been reduced. 

Now, in many instances stocks are not growing rapidly enough to comply with the 
law, or fishing mortality is still too high, but we are in a much better position now 
than  in  the  past.  Progress  also  has  been  difficult  at  times  because  reports  of  stock 
status  have  had  to  be  dramatically  revised,  even  over  relatively  brief  time  periods. 
The confidence of fishermen in the management system suffers each time this hap-
pens,  but  as  discouraging  as  that  may  be  for  all  of  us,  more  and  better  science  is 
essential to crafting effective management measures. 

It  is  equally  important  to  recognize  the  sacrifices  made  by  the  fishing  industry, 
both  commercial  and  recreational,  and  their  communities.  In  order  to  comply  with 
requirements  to  rebuild,  groundfish  landings  were  reduced  by  44  percent  between 
fishing  year  2001  and  fishing  year  2007.  Gross  revenues,  adjusted  for  inflation,  de-
clined  by  35  percent.  The  number  of  vessels  landing  groundfish  declined  from  over 
1,300 in fishing year 2001 to about 750 in fishing year 2007. I could go on, but the 
picture is clear—the requirement to rebuild overfished stocks has forced many fish-
ermen out of the groundfish fishery, and the situation has not been helped by rising 
energy  costs.  Nonetheless,  there  is  a  glimmer  of  hope.  Groundfish  landings  in-
creased in 2007 for the first time in 6 years. 

I  hope,  though,  that  there  is  a  take-home  message  here  that  is  not  lost.  I  firmly 
believe  groundfish  stocks  will  be  rebuilt,  but  we  cannot  afford  to  mismanage  them 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

again  because  of  the  unacceptably  high  price  paid  by  fishermen  and  their  families 
and the negative effects on the infrastructure that supports their activities, as well 
as the communities in which they live. 
Future of the Groundfish Fishery 

Looking at the future, groundfish stocks, when rebuilt, should produce nearly tri-
ple the current catches. Managing a rebuilt fishery will have its own set of problems 
as current legal requirements tend to force us to manage for the weakest stock, sac-
rificing  yield  from  abundant  stocks.  There  are  a  number  of  ideas  circulating  for 
ways  to  improve  management:  individual  fishing  quotas  or  other  limited  access 
privilege programs, sectors and area management are a few. The Council is explor-
ing  these  ideas,  but  it  is  premature  to  know  which  will  be  selected  in  the  future. 
It  is  safe  to  say  that  the  industry  and  the  Council  believe  that  input  management 
controls  need  to  be  replaced  with  output  controls.  The  inefficiencies  required  with 
input controls, no longer can be overcome. 

We  also  cannot  ignore  that  there  is  much  we  do  not  know  about  the  ecosystem. 
How are changing temperatures affecting fish stocks? Are there effects from declines 
in  inshore  water  quality?  Has  the  very  act  of  fishing  changed  the  genetic  composi-
tion  of  the  stocks?  These  and  other  questions  often  are  forgotten  by  the  public.  We 
may  ultimately  find  that  the  answers  to  these  and  similar  questions  contribute  as 
much to stock health as fisheries management. 
Future Access to the Fishery 

How  do  communities  cope  with  the  rebuilding  program  so  that  they  can  benefit 
in  the  future?  It  has  to  be  recognized  that  the  industry  is  unlikely  to  return  to  its 
recent  past.  There  may  be  fewer  landing  ports,  there  will  be  fewer  boats  and  they 
will land their catch where it is advantageous to do so. The recent experience of the 
state of Maine may be illustrative. Groundfish landings for vessels that claim Maine 
homeports  declined  by  27  percent  between  fishing  year  2001  and  fishing  year  2007 
(less  than  for  some  other  important  groundfish  states),  but  boats  are  often  landing 
their  catches  outside  the  state.  In  fact,  groundfish  landings  in  Maine  declined  63 
percent  over  the  same  period.  At  the  same  time,  Maine  vessels  have  actually  seen 
their share of groundfish landings increase slightly. So while the catch is not being 
landed  in  Maine,  Maine  vessels  remain  a  key  component  of  the  groundfish  fishery. 
How  do  these  vessels  remain  active?  At  least  two  organizations  with  strong  ties 
to  Maine  communities  are  acquiring  permits  to  preserve  future  access.  This  is  a 
model  that  can  be  used  even  without  changes  in  the  current  management  system. 
While  not  universally  supported  and  difficult  to  implement,  programs  such  as 
groundfish sectors or other rights-based systems provide current participants the op-
portunity  to  preserve  future  access.  A  carefully  designed  individual  quota  program 
should  be  able  to  address  concerns  over  excessive  consolidation.  Some  suggest  that 
area management, which restricts access to an area to a specific group of fishermen, 
may be another option. The details of such a system have yet to be worked out, and 
often these proposals are resisted by many other fishermen who prefer the flexibility 
to move between areas. 

I  suspect  that  until  our  capacity  to  catch  fish  more  closely  matches  the  available 
resource, all of these systems will struggle. Some of them, however, allow fishermen 
to make more rational business decisions to determine their future. The current ap-
proach to reducing capacity, a Darwinian survival of the fittest, is not the preferred 
method,  but  industry  support  for  a  capacity  reduction  program  tends  to  hinge  on 
external funding. While some Council members may disagree, I think that capacity 
reduction has to occur if we are to achieve the most benefit from the groundfish fish-
ery. 
Summary 

Simple answers are not always available to any of us within the context of a regu-
latory  framework;  and  evolving  science  is  necessary  but  often  difficult  to  under-
stand.  Despite  the  revised  timetable,  I  personally  feel  that  Amendment  16  must  go 
forward to continue the important stock rebuilding we have achieved to date. I also 
feel  that  the  Council  and  fishermen  are  developing  innovative  management  strate-
gies,  scheduled  for  consideration  in  Amendment  17,  that  will  help  them  adjust  to 
changing  resource  and  economic  conditions  and  begin  to  reap  the  benefits  of  their 
sacrifices. 

Senator  Snowe,  on  behalf  of  the  New  England  Council,  I  hope  my  comments  are 
helpful to you as you continue to engage in discussions about the groundfish fishery. 
I am available now or in the future to answer questions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

1014CUNN1.eps 

Senator  SNOWE.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Cunningham,  for 

your input. 

Mr. Odlin? 

STATEMENT OF JAMES A. ODLIN, VESSEL OWNER, 

ATLANTIC TRAWLERS FISHING, INC. 

Mr. JAMES ODLIN. Good afternoon, Senator Snowe. Thank you for 
the  opportunity  to  discuss  the  future  of  the  groundfish  industry 
here in Maine. 

My  name  is  James  Odlin.  I  am  a  second-generation  commercial 
fisherman.  I  have  40  years  experience  fishing  for  groundfish.  I  am 
Vice  President  of  the  Associated  Fisheries  of  Maine,  and  my  com-
ments  today  are  trying  to  represent  the  Associated  Fisheries  of 
Maine. 

I won’t repeat what we have all heard about the drop in ground-
fish landings and the number of boats in the State of Maine. I am 
going to move right to the interim rule. 

The  council  forwarded  to  National  Marine  Fisheries  Service  an 
interim rule that was backed by a number of industry participants 
to try and address the problem of the Amendment 16 delay. At that 
time,  it  was  clearly  stated  by  the  National  Marine  Fisheries  Serv-
ice that the proposal did not go far enough. 

The  Magnuson-Stevens  Act  states  that  the  Secretary  can  imple-
ment  interim  rules  to  reduce  or  address  overfishing.  It  does  not 
necessarily  have  to  end  overfishing,  nor  does  it  give  the  authority 
to address F-rebuilds. 

The council has requested an 18 percent cut in days at sea. And 
to  be  quite  honest,  I  do  not  think  that  the  Maine  groundfish  boats 
that  are  left  here  today  will  ever  be  able  to  handle  the  18  percent 
cut without mitigating measures, which will not be implemented in 
an interim rule. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

I actually think the way the economy is, the crisis in the banking 
system,  unemployment  rising,  low  fish  prices,  high  fuel  prices,  we 
need  a  complete  freeze  in  any  reduction  in  days  at  sea  until 
Amendment  16  can  be  implemented,  and  the  mitigating  measures, 
such  as  they  are,  put  into  place  and  a  buyback  plan  implemented. 
At  that  point,  Amendment  16  should  go  in  place,  and  that  would 
be May 2010. 

Next  I  would  like  to  talk  a  little  bit  about  the  science.  I  first 
want  to  say  that  I  am  not  critical  or  attacking  any  of  the  people 
at the Northeast Science Center. I agree that they work very hard, 
but  their  task  is  impossible.  It  is  impossible  to  have  an  absolute 
number  of  fish  in  the  ocean  and  an  absolute  number  that  can  be 
taken out. It just cannot be calculated. 

The industry has very little confidence in the science, and I, too, 
see  a  lot  of  alarming  issues.  There  was  absolutely  no  consistency 
in  the  peer  review  in  the  process  of  the  GARM  III,  and  it  is  quite 
clear  that  this  has  caused  problems.  If  we  look  at  the  19  stocks, 
we  can  see  that  the  industry  brought  in  Dr.  Butterworth,  and  he 
was  able  to  look  at  only  two  stocks,  white  hake  and  the  Gulf  of 
Maine cod. 

He  had  major  impacts  on  white  hake  assessment,  and  if  the 
Northeast  Science  Center  assessment  would  have  been  allowed  to 
stand,  it  could  have  effectively  shut  down  the  groundfish  industry 
right  away.  Dr.  Butterworth  pointed  out  an  error  in  the  assess-
ment,  and  this  was  corrected.  He  also  pointed  out  some  problems 
with the Gulf of Maine cod, and this was also corrected. To me, the 
question is how many more mistakes are there? 

We then started to look at pollock, and we found a huge mistake 
in the pollock assessment. This was after the peer review was com-
pleted.  The  assessment  used  one  data  point  to  come  up  with  its 
conclusions.  Common  practice  in  all  GARM—its  index-based  as-
sessments  is  that  they  should  use  three  data  points.  We  only  used 
one. Again, after peer review, the Council staff pointed this out. 

Now the Northeast Science Center, in my opinion, is trying to de-
fend  the  determination  that  pollock  was  overfished  by  stating  that 
even  if  we  wait  and  use  the  2008  survey  data,  it  is  still  likely  to 
be overfished. My question is how do they know the outcome of the 
2008 survey that hasn’t been done yet? And how can a mistake like 
this get by the peer review and be pointed out by the Council staff? 
Even  if  the  next  data  point  is  lower,  maybe  this  is  actually  the 
average.  The  index  that  you  use  for  this  assessment  could  be 
wrong. Indexes, to me, seem to be a best guess. 

Next  I  will  talk  a  little  bit  about  Georges  Bank  cod.  The  North-
east Science Center has done what they call ‘‘splitting the time se-
ries,’’ which back a few short years ago, they would have never con-
sidered.  One  of  their  longstanding  claims  to  fame  was  that  they 
had  the  longest  time  series  in  groundfish  management  in  the 
world. 

Now, for some reason, in 1994, the trawl surveys all of a sudden 
started  catching  more  fish.  Same  gear,  same  boat—just  started 
catching over 100 percent more fish. Then by splitting the time se-
ries,  they  are  saying  that  the  fish  changed  and  the  catchability  of 
the fish became much easier. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

As someone that has spent 20-plus years working day and night 
with fishing gear to make it as effective as possible, this has never 
happened to me. And I doubt that it has ever happened to any fish-
erman in this room, that all of a sudden, without any gear changes, 
catches  went  up  over  100  percent  and  was  sustained.  Maybe,  just 
maybe,  the  explanation  of  catchability  is  that  there  are  just  more 
fish  being  caught  in  the  survey  because  there  are  more  fish  out 
there. 

These  are  just  a  few  examples  where  I  feel  there  are  problems 
with  the  science.  Of  course,  the  scientists  will  try  to  explain  most 
of these issues away. 

Finally,  as  far  as  the  future  of  the  Maine  groundfish  industry,  I 
have  to  say  it  is  very  bleak  at  this  time.  However,  I  ask  Congress 
to  look  at  the  science.  It  is  just  not  accurate  enough  to  meet  the 
demands of the current MS—Magnuson-Stevens Act and still have 
an  industry  left.  Congress  needs  to  amend  the  Magnuson-Stevens 
Act to provide flexibility in a multispecies fishery and especially ad-
dress the arbitrary 10-year rebuilds. 

Congress  must  insist  on  a  new  stock  assessment  on  Georges 
Bank  on  pollock,  on  Gulf  of  Maine  winter  flounder,  and  witch 
flounder. I want to talk about witch flounder for a minute. 

Witch flounder, in the last assessment, was not overfished. Over-
fishing was not occurring, and the stock was fully rebuilt. We have 
a new assessment that says the stock is overfished, and overfishing 
is occurring. Yet the industry never caught more than one third of 
what the scientists said we could catch in the interim period. How 
did it become overfished? 

Next, Congress must provide for a vessel buyback to stabilize the 
industry  and  let  some  people  stay  in  and  supply  the  market  and 
the  infrastructure  on  a  steadier  basis  to  allow  us  to  get  our  mar-
kets  back  and  stabilize  the  infrastructure  in  the  industry  as  a 
whole.  Congress  must  clarify  the  intent  of  flexibility  of  stocks  that 
are  under  international  fishing  agreement  or  understanding.  Oth-
erwise,  U.S.  fishermen  are  going  to  lose  further  quota  to  Canada. 
Senator Snowe, in a time of many crises, I am extremely grateful 
for  your  attention  to  this  crisis  facing  our  groundfish  industry.  It 
seems clear that continued aggressive oversight of groundfish man-
agement is warranted. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. James Odlin follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JAMES A. ODLIN, VESSEL OWNER, 

ATLANTIC TRAWLERS FISHING, INC. 
Good morning, Senator Snowe. My name is James Odlin. 
Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  be  here  today  and  to  provide  an  industry  per-
spective  on  several  questions  you  have  raised  with  regards  to  groundfish  manage-
ment in New England. 
Interim Measures 

When the National Marine Fisheries Service (NMFS) imposed an interim rule for 
the NE groundfish fishery in 2006, they chose a broad-brush management approach 
that  was  in  complete  conflict  with  the  more  proper  approach  ultimately  chosen  by 
the New England Fishery Management Council (Council). The interim rule imposed 
differential  counting  of  days-at-sea  on  all  management  areas,  with  the  result  that 
one  management  area  (western  Gulf  of  Maine)  and  two  stocks  (Gulf  of  Maine  cod, 
and  Gulf  of  Maine  yellowtail)  were  under-protected  while  other  areas  and  stocks 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

were  overprotected.  The  Council  approach  (FW42)  ultimately  imposed  more  appro-
priate restrictions with a focus on problem areas and stocks. 

The  need  for  interim  rule  for  2006  was  repeatedly  characterized,  by  NMFS,  as  a 
failure of the Council to develop management restrictions within the necessary time 
frame.  What  is  left  out  of  the  discussion  is  the  fact  that  the  NMFS  did  not  provide 
to the Council the scientific information it needed in time to develop those manage-
ment recommendations. 

Today, the Council and the industry face the same timing conundrum. At the Sep-
tember meeting of the Council, the Regional Administrator reported that the NMFS 
is preparing an interim rule for 2009 because the Council had ‘‘failed to do its job’’. 
However, NMFS has known since 2004 that an assessment of all groundfish stocks 
(GARM  III)  was  pending  for  2008.  Still,  the  final  meeting  of  GARM  III  was  sched-
uled  for  mid-August  2008,  instead  of  an  earlier  time  frame,  which  may  have  af-
forded adequate time for the Council to develop recommendations. 

At  a  special  meeting  in  September  to  receive  the  GARM  III  advice,  the  Council 
did  develop  a  recommendation  for  interim  measures,  and  by  a  vote  of  15  to  1,  the 
Council did approve that recommendation. However, the Regional Administrator has 
unilaterally determined that the Council recommendation is not acceptable, and re-
ported  that  the  NMFS  would  begin  work  on  different,  more  ‘‘simple’’  interim  meas-
ures. 

The  industry  is  concerned  that  the  NMFS  will,  in  the  interest  of  ‘‘administrative 
simplicity’’,  impose  inappropriate  restrictions  for  2009—restrictions  that  will  once 
again cause unnecessary economic harm to the industry without providing adequate 
protection  to  appropriate  stocks  and  areas.  The  industry  supports  the  process  out-
lined  by  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Act  (MSA),  which  empowers  the  regional  Councils 
to develop fishery management recommendations, and we do not support unilateral 
action by the NMFS. 

NMFS  personnel  have  suggested  that  an  interim  rule  would  need  to  achieve  F- 
rebuild for some or all stocks. However, section 304(e)(6) of the rebuilding provisions 
of the MSA does not include any requirement for interim measures promulgated by 
NMFS  under  section  305(c)  to  achieve  F-rebuild.  In  fact,  section  304(e)(6)  plainly 
states  that  interim  measures  may  be  implemented  even  though  they  are  not  suffi-
cient by themselves to stop overfishing. 

‘‘(6)  During  the  development  of  a  fishery  management  plan,  a  plan  amendment, 
or  proposed  regulations  required  by  this  subsection,  the  Council  may  request  the 
Secretary to implement interim measures to reduce overfishing under section 305(c) 
until such measures can be replaced by such plan, amendment, or regulations. Such 
measures, if otherwise in compliance with the provisions of this Act, may be imple-
mented  even  though  they  are  not  sufficient  by  themselves  to  stop  overfishing  of  a 
fishery.’’ (16 USC 1854(e)(6)). 

Section  305(c)  clearly  states  that  the  objective  of  interim  measures  is  to  ‘‘reduce’’ 

or ‘‘address’’ overfishing; not to achieve F-rebuild or end overfishing immediately. 

NMFS personnel have also signaled a plan to use the interim rule to impose addi-
tional  restrictions  for  stocks  that  have  been  newly  declared  ‘‘overfished’’  by  the 
GARM  III  even  though  existing  and  proposed  guidelines  allow  the  Council  1  year 
to develop an appropriate rebuilding plan. Amendment 13 made it clear that status 
determination  criteria  are  not  effective  until  adopted  by  the  Council,  therefore 
NMFS is going beyond its authority if the interim rule includes restrictions for those 
stocks newly declared overfished by GARM III. 

Today,  the  industry  is  faced  with  the  overwhelming  uncertainty  of  what  kinds  of 
measures will be implemented in the interim rule, but we can be certain that there 
will be no measures to mitigate the economic impacts. 
Amendment 16 

The NMFS has been putting extreme pressure on the Council to comply with the 
provisions  of  the  recently  reauthorized  MSA,  yet  the  agency  has  failed  to  provide 
the  final  guidance  necessary  to  comply  with  those  provisions.  It  is  quite  possible 
that  the  Council  may  develop  policy  and  management  measures  that  will  need  to 
be redeveloped at a later date. The NMFS is also pressuring the Council to develop 
rebuilding plans, in Amendment 16, for those stocks newly declared ‘‘overfished’’ by 
GARM  III,  even  though  they  otherwise  would  have  1  year  to  develop  rebuilding 
plans.  This  takes  staff  and  Council  time  away  from  developing  potential  mitigation 
measures for the severe cutbacks anticipated in Amendment 16. 
Science 

The industry has no confidence in the Northeast Fisheries Science Center (Science 

Center) stock assessments for groundfish. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

This year, the industry engaged the expertise of Dr. Doug Butterworth, University 
of  Cape  Town,  South  Africa,  to  participate  in  GARM  III.  Due  to  limited  resources, 
the  industry  engaged  Dr.  Butterworth’s  attention  to  only  the  Gulf  of  Maine  cod  as-
sessment  and  the  assessment  for  white  hake.  In  both  cases,  his  intervention  pro-
duced significantly better results in terms of calculating current biomass and fishing 
mortality  levels  as  well  as  biomass  and  fishing  mortality  reference  points.  We  be-
lieve  that  had  we  the  resources  and  time  to  engage  his  attention  to  all  19  stocks 
we would have improved results for several other stocks. 

I  will  list  several  examples  of  our  concerns.  (Please  also  note  the  attached  letter 
from Council Executive Director Paul Howard to NMFS Regional Administrator Pat 
Kurkul  that  also  expresses  concerns  about  the  results  of  GARM  III,  as  well  as  a 
copy of Administrator Kurkul’s response.) 

1. According to the 2005 groundfish assessment—witch flounder—a highly valu-
able  stock  that  comprises  a  significant  part  of  groundfish  landings  by  Maine 
boats—was determined by the Science Center to be nearly rebuilt. In the inter-
vening  years,  the  industry  caught  about  1/3  of  the  ‘‘scientifically  determined’’ 
total  allowable  catch,  and  the  fishing  mortality  was  well  below  the  ‘‘scientif-
ically  determined’’  target.  However,  GARM  III  now  declares  the  stock  as  over-
fished and overfishing is occurring. 
2.  The  GARM  III  assessment  for  Georges  Bank  cod  produced  different  results 
than  those  produced  by  the  Transboundary  Resource  Assessment  Committee 
just a few short weeks prior to GARM III. 
3.  With  regards  to  the  Gulf  of  Maine  winter  flounder  assessment,  the  GARM 
III panel noted that the ‘‘analysis could not be used to provide management ad-
vice  nor  stock  projections’’,  yet  the  Science  Center  did  just  that  to  recommend 
a drastic reduction in fishing mortality. 
4.  The  pollock  assessment  is  an  index-based  assessment  meaning  it  is  depend-
ent  on  the  amount  of  fish  caught  in  the  trawl  survey.  For  that  type  of  assess-
ment,  scientists  typically  use  a  3-year  running  average  of  survey  indices.  How-
ever,  in  GARM  III  the  Science  Center  used  only  1  year  of  data  instead  of  3, 
which has resulted in a determination of overfished. As you know, once declared 
overfished,  a  rebuilding  program  is  required,  and  as  I’ve  stated  earlier,  NMFS 
is proposing to take action for this stock in the interim rule. Once the 2008 data 
is  available,  a  3-year  calculation  may  show  that  the  stock  is  not  overfished, 
which would again reverse the status of this stock. 
5.  For  the  white  hake  assessment  the  Science  Center  used  proxy  age  data  for 
the  time  period  of  the  1960s  and  1970s,  which  was  obtained  by  assuming  that 
the  average  relationship  between  age  and  length  over  the  1980s  and  1990s  ap-
plied to every year of the earlier period. However the Review Panel rejected this 
assumption  because  of  a  potential  to  introduce  errors.  Instead  the  Panel  pre-
ferred Dr. Butterworth’s assessment, which avoided the need to make this ques-
tionable assumption for the earlier years. 
6.  You  will  recall  that  in  2005  the  biomass  targets  for  several  stocks  were  dra-
matically increased—in some cases doubled—and in at least one case, the target 
was  set  higher  than  any  observed  level  of  abundance.  In  2008,  many  of  those 
same  targets  have  been  reduced;  others  have  been  increased.  As  you  know, 
these wildly divergent ‘‘estimates’’ become the determining ‘‘facts’’ on which new 
management restrictions are based. 

The  industry  cannot  continue  to  withstand  this  constant  whipsawing  of  scientific 

information. 

The  groundfish  assessment  process  itself  was  problematic.  A  panel  comprised  of 
scientists  external  to  the  Science  Center,  developed  final  recommendations  on  the 
basis of analyses presented by Center staff, at each of a series of 4 week-long meet-
ings. However of the 5-member Panel for the last meeting, which provided the final 
management advice, only the Chair (Dr. O’Boyle) and Dr. Butterworth were present 
at  all  meetings.  At  each  of  the  meetings,  as  many  as  19  different  stocks  were  dis-
cussed.  The  industry  believes  that  this  provided  insufficient  time  to  discuss  any  of 
the stocks at the level of depth required for reliable recommendations. 
Vessel Buyout 

A  buyout  is  crucial  to  lessening  the  negative  impacts  of  Amendment  16.  The  in-
dustry  has  advanced  a  proposal  to  Congress  for  an  industry-funded  buyout.  A 
buyout  would  remove  excess  capacity,  give  those  who  wish  to  leave  the  industry  a 
dignified  way  to  exit,  and  allow  those  who  wish  to  remain  the  opportunity  to  suc-
ceed.  A  West  Coast  groundfish  buyout  has  provided  increased  profitability  for  fish-
ing businesses and stability for fishing communities. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

Sectors 

The  industry  has  been  working  for  a  long  time  on  developing  groundfish  sectors. 
This has been a costly endeavor in terms of time and financial resources. Sector al-
locations  will  be  based  on  landings  histories  of  each  vessel  in  the  fleet,  yet  the  in-
dustry has had considerable difficulty retrieving landings data from the NMFS. The 
Sustainable Harvest Sector submitted a roster of vessels with a data request nearly 
2  years  ago,  and  we  have  still  not  received  the  data.  Sectors  seem  to  be  the  only 
alternative  to  massive  cuts  in  DAS  and/or  derby  style  fishing.  At  every  step  of  the 
way during the development of Amendment 16, the NMFS has thwarted the Coun-
cil’s ability to develop sectors. 

If we are to be forced to adhere to a catch based management system (as opposed 
to  DAS)  the  industry  believes  that  ITQs,  for  several  reasons  primarily  related  to 
cost,  would  be  preferable  to  sectors.  According  to  the  current  draft  of  Amendment 
16, sectors will be held responsible for the costs of dockside monitoring, at sea moni-
toring,  development  of  an  environmental  assessment  (yearly)  as  well  as  a  sector 
manager  salary.  In  addition,  NMFS  has  decided  that  sector  members  will  also  be 
held  joint  and  severably  liable  for  ANY  violation  of  the  management  restrictions, 
even though this type of liability was never recommended by the Council. However, 
it  is  unlikely  that  the  Council  would  ever  seriously  contemplate  development  of  an 
ITQ  proposal  for  groundfish  because  of  the  onerous  requirements  proposed  for  the 
referendum process. 
Recommendations 

The future of groundfishing in Maine is bleak. 
The  State  no  longer  has  very  many  medium  and  no  large  vessels  necessary  to 
maintain  a  year-round  landing  stream,  which  is  then  necessary  to  maintain  the 
shore-side infrastructure. 

However, there are some actions that Congress could take to improve the outlook. 
First  and  foremost,  Congress  must  amend  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Act  in  a  way 
that  clearly  articulates  the  flexibility  necessary  for  fisheries  managers  to  restore 
fisheries resources while preserving fishing communities. The most recent reauthor-
ization,  at  least  from  the  draft  guidelines  proposed  by  the  NMFS,  will  most  likely 
decrease the flexibility manager’s desperately need. Congress must also remove the 
requirement  for  a  referendum  for  ITQ  management  as  the  referendum  process 
serves only as a major obstacle to ITQ management. 

Congress must insist on a new benchmark assessment for Georges Bank cod, pol-

lock, and winter flounder. 

Congress  must  insist  on  a  complete  analysis  of  the  appropriate  natural  mortality 
estimate  for  each  stock,  instead  of  defaulting  to  a  natural  morality  rate  of  0.2  for 
all stocks. 

Congress  must  provide  the  funding  necessary  for  a  buyout,  or  alternatively  ad-

vance the industry-funded buyout. 

Congress  must  provide  funding  for  the  costs  of  sector  monitoring.  In  other  fish-
eries  where  dockside  and  at-sea  monitoring  are  required,  the  cost  to  industry  is 
more than 10 percent of the landings value. The NE groundfish fishery cannot sus-
tain those costs now, or anytime in the near future. 

Congress must clarify that when stocks are jointly managed by the U.S. and Can-

ada this be considered an agreement under MSA. 

Congress  must  work  more  closely  with  the  executive  and  legislative  branches  of 
Maine  government  to  encourage  the  State  to  focus  more  resources  on  improving 
groundfish science and to make involvement in groundfish management a State pri-
ority. 

Again, thank you for the opportunity to be here today. I am happy to answer any 

questions you may have. 

NEW ENGLAND FISHERY MANAGEMENT COUNCIL 

Newburyport, MA, September 16, 2008 

Ms. PATRICIA KURKUL, 
Regional Administrator, 
National Marine Fisheries Service, 
Gloucester, MA. 
Dear Pat: 

Your letter of September 2, 2008 notified the Council of the results of the Ground-
fish Assessment Review Meeting (GARM III). It also reported changes in stock sta-
tus  as  a  result  of  those  assessments.  I  have  some  concerns  that  I  want  to  bring  to 
your attention. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

According  to  the  letter,  GOM  winter  flounder  has  been  determined  to  be  over-
fished and subject to overfishing. The GARM III report does not provide any support 
for  this  conclusion.  While  it  is  true  that  the  Executive  Summary  of  the  GARM  III 
report  includes  this  listing,  the  actual  chapter  on  GOM  winter  flounder  does  not. 
In  fact,  the  Peer  Review  Panel  (Panel)  summarized  its  conclusions  in  the  following 
paragraphs (emphasis added): 

‘‘Given the problems encountered, the Panel agreed that none of the models put 
forth  gave  a  clear  picture  of  the  status  of  the  resource.  Further,  the  Panel  noted 
that  until  these  issues  were  resolved,  the  proposed  analysis  could  not  be  used  to 
provide management advice nor stock projections. 
While the Panel was unable to determine the stock’s status relative to the BRPs, 
it agreed that the current trend in the population was very troubling. The Panel 
generally  agreed  that  it  is  highly  likely  that  biomass  is  below  BMSY,  and  that 
there is a substantial probability that it is below  1⁄2 BMSY. The Panel noted that 
other stocks in the area of this mixed fishery were also at low levels.’’ 

Given the Panel’s unequivocal rejection of any of the models presented, the Execu-
tive  Summary  errs  when  it  presents  estimates  of  fishing  mortality  and  stock  bio-
mass  for  this  stock  from  an  explicitly  rejected  assessment  model.  The  report  also 
erred  by  providing  projections  results,  again  contrary  to  the  clear  language  of  the 
Panel.  The  status  of  this  stock  should  be  reported  as  unknown.  This  is  not  to  sug-
gest  there  are  no  concerns  for  this  stock,  as  noted  by  the  Panel,  which  is  clearly 
not rebuilt and may indeed be overfished. 

Your letter also reports that pollock was overfished and overfishing was occurring 
as of 2007. The biomass reference point for pollock is an index-based proxy first rec-
ommended by the Reference Point Working Group in 2002. Significantly, that docu-
ment  determined  biomass  status  by  using  a  centered  three-year  moving  average  of 
the fall survey index. As an example, status in 2005 is based on the average of the 
survey  indices  for  2004,  2005  and  2006.  This  means  that  status  cannot  be  deter-
mined  for  2007  until  the  2008  fall  trawl  survey  index  is  available.  The  2007  value 
reported in Table 2 of the report is 0.754 kg/tow. This does not appear be the aver-
age of anything—it is the same value reported for the 2007 fall survey in Table M.1. 
There  is  no  justification  in  the  report,  and  there  was  no  discussion  at  the  meeting 
suggesting that a single year of the trawl survey index should be used as a biomass 
proxy. 

This error results in an incorrect determination of status for pollock. The centered 
three-  year  average  of  the  trawl  survey  index  for  2006  is  1.42  kg/tow,  more  than 
half the GARM III recommended Bmsy-proxy of 2.0 kg/tow. As I said previously, con-
sistent with the approved reference points, the status for 2007 cannot be determined 
until  the  fall  survey  is  completed  in  2008.  The  relative  exploitation  index  is  also 
based  on  a  centered  three-year  average  of  the  trawl  survey  index.  As  a  result,  the 
2007  relative  exploitation  index  cannot  be  determined.  In  2006,  the  relative  exploi-
tation  index,  based  on  a  centered  three-year  average,  was  5.03,  less  than  the  Fmsy 
proxy of 5.66, and overfishing was not occurring. However, given the recent decline 
in  the  trawl  survey  index,  pollock  should  be  reported  as  approaching  an  overfished 
condition. 

Finally, please note that Amendment 13, approved by the Secretary of Commerce, 
made  it  clear  that  status  determination  criteria  are  not  effective  until  adopted  by 
the Council. (‘‘Over time, development of new analytic techniques or additional data 
may  result  in  scientific  advice  recommending  changes  to  the  status  determination 
criteria  parameters.  In  order  to  comply  with  M–S  Act  requirements  that  status  de-
termination  criteria  be  determined  by  the  Council,  a  Council  action  is  necessary  to 
change  the  status  determination  criteria  parameters.’’)  Further,  Amendment  13 
made  it  clear  that  any  changes  to  numerical  estimates  of  parameters  that  resulted 
from the GARM III review would only become effective when adopted by the Council 
(‘‘For this review, any updated numerical estimates will be adopted through a Coun-
cil  management  action—amendment  or  framework  adjustment.’’)  This  is  essentially 
the same stance taken by NMFS on the recent change in monkfish reference points 
that  resulted  from  an  assessment  in  August  2007.  NMFS  continued  to  report  stock 
status based on the old status determination criteria until the new reference criteria 
were formally adopted by the Council in a change to the fishery management plan. 

In conclusion, I recommend the following: 

1. That the status of GOM winter flounder be reported as unknown in the quar-
terly  status  report,  consistent  with  the  GARM  III  peer  review  Panel’s  rejection 
of all assessment models presented and the Panel’s explicit statement that they 
could not determine status with respect to the biological reference points. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

2.  That  the  status  of  pollock  be  revised  to  approaching  an  overfished  condition 
and  overfishing  not  occurring  as  of  2006,  the  last  year  that  this  determination 
can  be  made  in  a  manner  consistent  with  recommended  status  determination 
criteria. 
3. And for the quarterly status reports, that a more consistent policy be consid-
ered for when status determination criteria become effective. 

I look forward to your response. 

Sincerely, 

cc: Nancy Thompson, NEFSC 

United States Department of Commerce, 
National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, 
National Marine Fisheries Service Northeast Region, 
Gloucester, MA. 
Mr. PAUL J. HOWARD, 
Executive Director, 
New England Fishery Management Council, 
Newburyport, MA. 
Dear Paul: 

PAUL J. HOWARD, 

Executive Director. 

October 3, 2008 

Thank you for your September 16, 2008, letter in which you highlighted important 
issues with respect to the results of the recent Groundfish Assessment Review Meet-
ing  (GARM  III),  In  addition,  you  requested  consideration  of  a  consistent  policy  per-
taining to when new status determination criteria become effective. 

You  are  correct  in  pointing  out  that  there  are  inconsistent  statements  in  the 
GARM III report about whether the Gulf of Maine (GOM) winter flounder stock sta-
tus can be determined. These statements resulted from the fact that this assessment 
was very uncertain, a point that was clearly made in the GARM III Report by both 
the  assessment  scientists  and  the  GARM  III  Review  Panel  (Panel).  Because  there 
was  so  much  uncertainty,  the  Panel  had  a  difficult  time  deciding  whether  a  status 
determination  was  possible,  as  reflected  in  their  statements.  Although  the  models 
did  not  fit  well,  the  Panel  concluded  that  ‘‘it  is  highly  likely  that  biomass  is  below 
BMSY,  and  that  there  is  a  substantial  probability  that  it  is  below  1⁄2 BMSY,’’  and  of-
fered this input as guidance to managers. However, everyone agrees that the results 
are  very  uncertain.  At  this  stage,  it  is  largely  a  policy  decision  that  the  New  Eng-
land  Fishery  Management  Council  (Council)  must  make  as  to  whether  to  use  the 
results  from  the  final  model  (as  was  done  in  the  GARM  III  report),  or  to  conclude 
that the status is unknown. 

Regarding  pollock,  you  are  also  correct  in  pointing  out  that  the  GARM  III  report 
(Table 2 on page xiv) incorrectly used the single fall survey biomass index from 2007 
as  a  basis  for  making  a  status  determination  about  whether  the  pollock  stock  is 
overfished.  To  be  consistent  with  approaches  used  by  the  Plan  Development  Team 
in  the  past,  the  appropriate  method  for  determining  stock  status  should  have  been 
based  on  an  average  of  recent  fall  survey  biomass  indices.  There  are  several  ways 
to compute the average based on the recent data, and different formulas for the av-
erage (lagged vs. centered; latest 3 years vs. latest 2 years) lead to different conclu-
sions  about  whether  the  stock  is  overfished.  For  instance,  the  centered  average 
based only on the two most recent surveys (2006 and 2007) is 0.856, which indicates 
the  stock  is  overfished  (BTHRESHOLD =  1  kg/tow).  In  contrast,  the  average  biomass 
index  based  on  the  last  three  surveys  (2005,  2006,  2007)  is  1.42,  which  indicates 
the stock is not overfished. This high sensitivity to the inclusion of a particular data 
point suggests that it is uncertain whether the stock is currently overfished. 

Even though there is uncertainty about whether the stock is overfished, there are 
several signs in the recent fall survey indices and in the annual landings that indi-
cate  that  the  average  biomass  of  the  stock  will  decline  to  a  level  approaching  an 
overfished condition and that the threshold will be breached within 2 years. For ex-
ample,  the  high  2005  survey  biomass  index  value  will  be  dropped  from  the  calcula-
tion  of  average  biomass  as  soon  as  an  additional  year  of  data  from  2008  becomes 
available.  The  value  from  2005  was  the  highest  in  the  last  25  years,  and  the  value 
from  2008  is  unlikely  to  be  greater  than  the  25-year  maximum;  so  the  updated  3- 
year  average  is  likely  to  decrease  and  be  close  to,  or  less  than,  BTHRESHOLD.  Like-
wise,  landings  have  been  increasing  since  1995,  and  the  highest  value  in  the  time 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

series  (1995–2007)  occurred  in  2007.  Thus,  the  relative  fishing  mortality  rate  (F)  is 
likely  to  be  much  higher  the  next  time  it  is  calculated.  Both  of  these  factors  will 
push the stock status calculation in the direction of being overfished and overfishing 
occurring. 

In  addition,  uncertainty  exists  in  determining  the  overfishing  status  for  pollock 
because the 3-year centered average cannot be fully computed without the 2008 sur-
vey biomass index. However, two calculations can be made involving the 2007 land-
ings:  2007  landings  over  the  average  biomass  from  2005–2007  =  6.64  for  Relative 
F; and 2007 landings over the average biomass from 2006–2007 = 10.98 for Relative 
F.  Both  of  these  calculations  suggest  that  overfishing  is  occurring,  as  FMSY  proxy 
for this stock = 5.66 for Relative F. 

Much  of  the  uncertainty  over  which  formula  to  use  for  average  biomass  and  for 
Relative F for pollock is caused by not having the 2008 fall survey index yet. When 
it  becomes  available,  likely  in  January  2009,  that  value  could  be  used  to  compute 
the  centered  average  biomass  index  and  Relative  Fishing  Mortality  Index  for  2007 
based on data from 2006, 2007, and 2008. Therefore, based on the most recent infor-
mation, the pollock stock is best categorized as approaching an overfished condition 
and  overfishing  is  occurring,  as  you  suggest.  However,  this  revised  conclusion  does 
not alter the responsibility of the Council to take action to prevent overfishing from 
occurring, as required by the Magnuson-Stevens Fishery Conservation and Manage-
ment  Act  (Magnuson-Stevens  Act)  and  highlighted  in  Pat  Kurkul’s  September  2, 
2008, letter regarding the status determinations of several stocks. Should the stock 
become classified as being overfished with the addition of the 2008 fall survey index, 
the  Council  will  be  required  to  develop  management  measures  that  rebuild  the 
stock. 

Finally,  your  letter  requested  a  more  consistent  policy  regarding  when  status  de-
termination criteria become effective. As you note, Amendment 13 to the Northeast 
(NE)  Multispecies  Fishery  Management  Plan  (FMP)  clearly  states  that  changes  to 
such criteria only become effective upon the implementation of a management action 
by  the  Council.  Under  normal  circumstances,  the  preferred  approach  would  be  to 
use  existing  status  determination  criteria  until  revised  criteria  become  effective 
upon  the  implementation  of  a  Council  action.  As  you  know,  this  is  the  approach 
taken  for  recent  stock  status  changes  in  the  Monkfish  FMP  and  is  consistent  with 
the  requirements  of  other  FMPs  managed  by  the  Council.  However,  due  to  the 
length  of  time  it  will  take  before  Amendment  16  becomes  effective  (Amendment  16 
is  scheduled  to  become  effective  1.5  years  after  GARM  III  was  released),  should 
NOAA’s National Marine Fisheries Service (NMFS) implement an interim action for 
fishing  year  2009,  NMFS  intends  to  rely  on  the  new  status  determination  criteria 
and  updated  estimates  of  stock  status  outlined  in  the  GARM  III.  We  feel  this  ap-
proach  is  appropriate  in  order  to  develop  interim  management  measures  that  are 
based on the best available scientific information, as required by the Magnuson-Ste-
vens Act. 

Although  the  new  status  determination  criteria  and  numerical  estimates  of  stock 
status  may  be  included  in  an  interim  action,  it  is  still  necessary  for  the  Council  to 
formally  integrate  such  criteria  and  estimates  into  the  FMP  under  Amendment  16 
and develop measures under the amendment that end overfishing and rebuild over-
fished  stocks,  as  identified  by  the  best  available  scientific  information  from  GARM 
III, in order to maintain compliance with approved rebuilding plans and the require-
ments of the Magnuson-Stevens Act. 

Thank  you  for  bringing  these  issues  to  our  attention.  We  look,  forward  to  con-
tinuing  to  work  with  the  Council  in  developing  effective  measures  under  Amend-
ment 16 that will continue rebuilding depleted groundfish stocks. 

Sincerely, 

PATRICIA A. KURKUL, 
Regional Administrator. 

NANCY THOMPSON, Ph.D., 
Science and Research Director, 
Northeast Fisheries Science Center. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you very much for your testimony and for 

reflecting the industry. Thank you, Mr. Odlin. 

Mr. Libby? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

STATEMENT OF GLEN LIBBY, CHAIRMAN, 

MIDCOAST FISHERMEN’S ASSOCIATION AND 

PRESIDENT, MIDCOAST FISHERMEN’S COOPERATIVE 

Mr.  LIBBY.  Thank  you,  Senator  Snowe.  I  am  honored  to  have 

been invited to testify here today. 

My name is Glen Libby. I am a life-long, second-generation fish-
erman  from  Port  Clyde,  Maine.  I  am  currently  Chairman  of  the 
Midcoast  Fishermen’s  Association  and  President  of  the  Midcoast 
Fishermen’s  Cooperative.  I  additionally  serve  on  the  board  of  the 
Portland Fish Exchange and on the Maine Marine Resources Advi-
sory Council. 

From  our  point  of  view,  the  current  management  system  for 
groundfish,  days-at-sea,  is  a  dismal  failure  and  has  fallen  short  of 
its  original  intent  to  meet  requirements  of  the  Magnuson  Act. 
While there are a few successes outlined in the latest stock assess-
ment, we have seen a steady decline of fish in the near-shore areas 
of Down East Maine over the past decade. 

This landscape, coupled with fuel prices rising to historical levels 
while  the  wholesale  price  for  fish  remains  flat,  is  a  recipe  for  dis-
aster  to  an  industry  that  has  been  in  this  State  long  before  the 
country  was  founded.  I  am  always  the  first  person  to  say,  ‘‘If  it 
ain’t  broke,  don’t  fix  it.’’  Our  current  management  system  is  bro-
ken.  It  needs  to  be  fixed  before  the  last  fisherman  leaves  Maine. 
Those  of  us  with  a  vested  interest  in  healthy  resources  and  sus-
tainable fishing communities see an opportunity to attain this with 
alternatives  to  current  management  within  the  Amendment  16 
process. Two alternatives that hold great promise as a way to leave 
behind the failing days-at-sea system are area or community-based 
management and sectors. 

Sectors  are  now  being  promoted  by  the  New  England  Fishery 
Management  Council  and  are  planned  for  implementation  in  time 
for  the  2010  fishing  season.  Sectors  will  need  diligent  work  by  the 
Council  and  the  agency  over  the  next  year.  However,  they  could 
still  be  stalled  in  the  Amendment  16  process  while  we  debate  the 
science,  which  would  only  be  to  the  detriment  of  the  resource  and 
the fishermen. 

We  now  also  face  interim  action  by  the  National  Marine  Fish-
eries Service for the 2009 fishing year that will most likely lead to 
even  greater  cuts  in  days  at  sea.  This  action  will  continue  to  crip-
ple  fishermen,  which  is  why  it  is  critical  to  have  a  new  manage-
ment structure in place for 2010. 

This  turmoil  has  also  led  to  the  proposal  for  an  industry-funded 
buyout—a Federal loan to be paid back by remaining active fisher-
men.  Many  fishermen  are  struggling,  for  all  of  the  aforementioned 
reasons, and this would be a means for them to retire from the in-
dustry with financial security. 

However,  their  retirement  would  be  funded  on  the  backs  of  the 
remaining fishermen. The concept behind the industry-funded com-
ponent is that if you remove a certain number of permits from the 
fishery,  the  stocks  will  eventually  rebound,  and  a  portion  of  that 
effort can be redistributed to the remaining fishermen. 

Since  1994,  we  have  had  multiple  buybacks,  and  the  groundfish 
fleet  has  gone  from  more  than  1,000  boats  to  less  than  600.  Yet 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

stocks  have  not  rebuilt  because  the  days-at-sea  system  does  not 
work. 

While  we  are  struggling  with  an  overcapacity  issue  in  other 
areas  of  New  England  that  demands  a  capacity  reduction,  we  cer-
tainly  do  not  have  an  overcapacity  issue  in  Maine.  There  is  one 
boat left that is actively fishing between Port Clyde and the Cana-
dian border, where at one time there were hundreds. 

According  to  DMR,  only  70  boats  actually  landed  their  catch  in 
Maine  in  2007.  Already  this  year,  several  Maine  fishermen  have 
sold  out  of  the  fishery  forever.  Maine  cannot  and  should  not  lose 
access to this industry. It is essential that we keep this critical food 
source and industry here in Maine now and for future generations. 
In  spite  of  all  this,  the  fishermen  I  have  the  privilege  to  work 
with  have  found  hope.  Although  in  its  infancy,  the  initial  success 
of  this  working  model  holds  great  promise  for  the  replication  for 
fishermen  everywhere.  We  currently  have  a  fishery  whose  market 
structure is based on volume. Fishermen catch high volumes of fish 
that flood the market, resulting in lower prices. Depleted stocks do 
not allow for the industry to be economically viable. 

However, if the market structure is changed to catching low vol-
umes  of  high-quality  fish  that  are  sold  at  a  premium  price,  eco-
nomic  viability  can  be  reached.  By  increasing  profit,  this  model 
achieves conservation of the resource by reducing the fishing effort, 
thus  redefining  overcapacity  and  maintaining  access  to  the  re-
source for fishermen and the people of Maine. 

To  groundtruth  this  theory,  the  fishermen  of  the  Midcoast  Fish-
ermen’s  Cooperative  created  a  Community-Supported  Fisheries, 
CSF,  based  on  the  successful  agricultural  model  of  Community- 
Supported  Agriculture,  CSA.  By  selling  directly  to  the  people  of 
Maine using this model, we have established a way to keep Maine’s 
fishermen  fishing  as  well  as  creating  a  bond  with  our  customers. 
Our CSF customers feel a sense of ownership for the fishery and 
the fishermen. They know that they are helping to preserve one of 
Maine’s  last  remaining  traditional  fishing  communities  while  sup-
porting environmentally sustainable fishing, which will restore the 
resource and strengthen Maine’s local economy. 

We  have  altered  our  gear  to  reduce  bycatch  and  lessen  the  im-
pact  on  habitat.  By  branding  a  product  caught  in  a  sustainable 
manner off Maine waters and landed in our harbor, we are able to 
market it at a higher price than that of wholesale prices. 

This model has piqued the interest of people all over the country 
as a potential way to avoid consolidation of the fishery, to help re-
store  the  resources,  strengthen  local  economies,  and  create  a  local 
food  supply.  This  was  pioneered  in  Maine,  and  Maine  could  lead 
the way by example. 

Through our CSF program, the people of Maine have sent a clear 
message that they want ‘‘their’’ community-based fishery to remain 
and  prosper.  The  fishermen  that  I  work  with  are  determined  to 
leave this fishery in better shape than it is right now for their chil-
dren and grandchildren. 

I  would  ask  you,  Senator,  to  give  your  full  consideration  to  this 
model, along with an alternative management plan, like area man-
agement  and  sectors,  as  sound  tools  that  would  benefit  Maine  and 
New England for generations. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Libby follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF GLEN LIBBY, CHAIRMAN, MIDCOAST FISHERMEN’S 

ASSOCIATION AND PRESIDENT, MIDCOAST FISHERMEN’S COOPERATIVE 

Thank  you,  Senator  Snowe,  I  am  honored  to  have  been  invited  to  testify  here 
today.  My  name  is  Glen  Libby,  I  am  a  life  long,  second-generation  fisherman  from 
Port  Clyde  Maine.  I  am  currently  Chairman  of  the  Midcoast  Fishermen’s  Associa-
tion and President of the Midcoast Fishermen’s Cooperative. I additionally serve on 
the board of the Portland Fish Exchange and on the Maine Marine Resources Advi-
sory Council. 

There  are  many  issues  currently  confronting  the  groundfish  industry  right  here 
in  Maine.  Myself,  and  the  fishermen  I  represent  thank  you  for  providing  us  with 
this  opportunity  to  speak  about  those  concerns  as  well  as  the  positive  efforts  that 
our two organizations, the Midcoast Fishermen’s Association and the Midcoast Fish-
ermen’s Cooperative, are doing to insure that groundfishing will continue with sus-
tainable  resources  and  a  thriving  industry  along  the  coast  of  Maine  today  and  for 
future generations. 

From  our  point  of  view  the  current  regulation  system  we  are  operating  under, 
Days-at-Sea, is broken and has fallen short of its original intent to meet the require-
ments  of  the  Magnuson  Act.  While  there  are  a  few  successes  outlined  in  the  latest 
stock assessment, the reality of fishing in our area has been, to use a Maine phrase, 
tough  sledding  lately.  Over  the  past  decade,  we  have  seen  a  steady  decline  of  fish 
in the near shore areas of Down East Maine. This decline has led to a loss of fishing 
opportunity and continual cuts in Days-at-Sea that fail to restore our resource. This 
landscape  coupled  with  energy  prices  rising  to  historical  levels  while  the  wholesale 
price  for  fish  remains  flat,  is  a  recipe  for  disaster  to  an  industry  that  has  been  in 
this state long before the country was founded. 

The  current  allocation  of  Days-at-Sea  (48  days  in  most  cases)  barely  provides 
enough time to make a living fishing in the spring, summer and fall. We are fortu-
nate that our shrimp fishery carries us through the winter months. The shrimp fish-
ery,  while  well  managed,  carries  its  own  set  of  problems:  the  rising  costs  of  fuel, 
the historically low wholesale prices for shrimp and competing efforts with imported 
farm raised shrimp. 

When  you  consider  all  these  variables  it  is  remarkable  that  there  are  any  fisher-
men  left  in  Maine  who  pursue  anything  but  lobster.  The  lobster  fishery  has  been 
the one bright spot for Maine’s fishing economy but that fishery is beginning to suf-
fer  from  the  same  set  problems  that  have  plagued  other  fisheries.  The  real  danger 
to Maine’s fishing economy is that we are becoming a single species fishery depend-
ent solely on lobster. If all other fisheries fail due to depletion or market forces, that 
leaves  us  in  a  precarious  position  of  having  all  of  Maine’s  fishing  related  economy 
dependent on one resource and this is not sustainable. 

I  am  always  the  first  person  to  say  ‘‘if  it  ain’t  broke—don’t  fix  it’’,  our  current 
management  system  for  groundfish  is  broken  and  needs  to  be  fixed  before  the  last 
fisherman leaves Maine. Those of us with a vested interest in healthy resources and 
sustainable  fishing  communities  saw  an  opportunity  to  attain  this  with  new  alter-
natives to fisheries management within the Amendment 16 process. Amendment 16 
could  be  our  light  at  the  end  of  a  dark  tunnel.  Fishermen,  conservational  and  fish-
ing  advocacy  groups  aligned  to  propose  innovative  and  tried  and  true  alternatives 
to New England’s current management system. 

Two  examples  that  my  organization  has  and  still  supports,  are  Area  or  Commu-
nity Based Management and Sectors. Area Management assigns fishing opportunity 
to  fishermen  as  well  as  allocating  a  portion  of  fish  to  a  specific  area.  Each  area  is 
recognized  as  unique  and  is  managed  accordingly.  This  form  of  management  also 
advocates for changes in fishing technology that reduces bycatch and impact to habi-
tat.  These  concepts  are  radically  different  from  the  way  that  the  groundfishery  has 
been  managed  in  the  northern  Gulf  of  Maine,  but  is  strikingly  similar  to  how  our 
lobster fishery is managed. 

The  second  management  structure  that  my  organization  supports  is  Sectors.  The 
development of sectors, a tool with strong accountability measures, hold great prom-
ise  as  a  way  to  get  away  from  of  the  failing  Days-at-Sea  system.  Sector  manage-
ment,  now  being  promoted  by  the  New  England  Fishery  Management  Council,  is 
planned  for  implementation  in  time  for  the  2010  fishing  season.  Monitoring  of  the 
catch  and  the  costs  involved  are  the  biggest  hurdles  facing  the  Council,  which  may 
require  innovative  approaches  and  fast  action  within  a  process  that  is  cumbersome 
at best. Sectors will need diligent work by the Council and the agency over the next 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

year.  Although,  they  could  still  be  stalled  in  the  Amendment  16  process  while  we 
debate the science, this would only be to the detriment of the resource and the fish-
ermen. 

We  are  now  facing  a  decision  by  the  National  Marine  Fisheries  Service  that  will 
guide fishing effort for the 2009 fishing year. This interim action will most certainly 
put  additional  pressure  on  an  already  fragile  industry  with  even  greater  cuts  in 
Days-at-Sea.  The  council,  with  credit  to  those  who  serve,  has  tried  to  balance  the 
rebuilding  goals  of  our  stocks  with  the  needs  of  our  fishing  communities.  The  two 
are  directly  linked,  for  fishing  communities  to  prosper  healthy  resources  and  a 
streamlined management system that can act in a timely fashion are needed. These 
impending cuts for 2009 will continue to cripple fishermen to the point of no return, 
which  is  why  it  is  critical  to  have  a  new  management  structure  in  place  for  2010. 
This recent turmoil in the fishing industry has lead to another proposal, an Indus-
try Funded Buyout, a Federal loan to be paid back by active fishermen. The ration-
ale  supporting  this  buyout  is  two  fold:  when  Magnuson  was  enacted  the  200-mile 
limit was established and an enormous amount of money was pumped into the fish-
ing  industry  around  the  country.  The  government  played  a  large  role  in  this  by 
making funds easily available to build a domestic fleet to harvest the seemingly lim-
itless  bounty  of  fish  along  our  coast.  As  we  have  painfully  learned  the  supply  was 
not limitless. We are still struggling with an over capacity issue in some areas that 
demands  capacity  reduction.  The  other  issue  is  the  fact  that  many  fishermen  are 
struggling  for  all  of  the  reasons  that  I  have  already  mentioned  and  this  would  be 
a  means  for  them  to  retire  from  the  business  with  financial  security.  Both  of  these 
reasons  make  sense  for  a  buyout,  but  there  are  aspects  of  this  proposal  that  the 
fishermen  I  represent  feel  would  not  be  in  the  best  interest  for  the  State  of  Maine. 
The  concept  behind  the  industry  funded  component  is  that,  if  you  remove  a  cer-
tain  number  of  permits  from  the  fishery  then  a  portion  of  that  effort  can  be  redis-
tributed  to  the  remaining  fishermen.  This  is  based  on  the  assumption  that  this 
amount of effort reduction will result in a recovery of fish stocks due to the buyout. 
If  this  recovery  does  not  happen  as  quickly  as  hoped  and  no  new  reallocation  of  ef-
fort  is  possible  then  you  have  then  saddled  the  remaining  fishermen  with  an  addi-
tional  burden  of  a  tax  on  their  landings  that  could  last  for  thirty  years.  Consider 
that the average age of a fisherman in New England is 50 years of age, that fisher-
man would be well into his 80s before this loan was paid back. If profits do not in-
crease  as  hoped  and  more  fishermen  leave  the  business  during  this  time  the  debt 
may  fall  to  the  remaining  few  fishermen,  creating  a  heavier  burden  and  spinning 
the industry into a vicious cycle. These considerations seem to warrant caution and 
careful analysis of its direct impact to Maine. 

We  certainly  do  not  have  an  overcapacity  issue  in  Maine.  There  is  one  boat  left 
that  is  actively  fishing  between  Port  Clyde  and  the  Canadian  border,  where  at  one 
time  there  were  hundreds.  According  to  the  DMR,  only  70  boats  actually  landed 
their  catch  in  Maine  in  2007.  Already  this  year  several  Maine  fishermen  have  sold 
out  of  the  industry  and  with  impending  further  cuts  in  Days-at-Sea  there  may  be 
many more fishermen not far behind to sell out of this fishery forever. Maine cannot 
and should not lose access to this industry. If the remaining permits are sold to in-
terests  outside  the  state  of  Maine  or  are  simply  taken  out  of  the  fishery,  we  may 
never regain access back to the fish right off our shores. It is essential that we keep 
this critical food source and industry here in Maine now and for future generations. 
In  spite  of  all  this  the  fishermen  I  have  the  privilege  to  work  with  have  found 
hope.  By  taking  one  of  the  criteria  from  the  buyout  equation,  the  market  structure 
and changing the parameters, we have found a solution for the short and long term 
sustainability  of  this  fishery.  Although,  in  its  infancy,  the  initial  success  of  this 
working model holds great promise for replication for fishermen everywhere. 

Consider that we currently have a fishery whose market structure is based on vol-
ume.  Catch  high  volumes  of  lower  quality  fish  for  a  low  price.  We  have  a  depleted 
fish stock here in Maine that does not allow a sufficient volume to be taken for the 
industry  to  be  economically  successful.  There  are  two  ways  to  fix  this,  consolidate 
the number of fishermen, which increases the volume of fish that can be taken thus 
allowing the remaining fishermen catch more fish. This leads to a consolidated fish-
ery  putting  many  out  of  work  and  leaving  Maine’s  communities  vulnerable,  this  is 
the  Industry  Funded  Buyout  plan.  Or,  you  change  the  market  structure;  you  catch 
low volumes of high quality fish and sell it at a premium price. By increasing prof-
its,  this  model  achieves  conservation  of  the  resource  by  reducing  the  fishing  effort 
thus  redefining  overcapacity  and  maintaining  access  to  the  resource  for  fishermen 
and the people of Maine. 

To ground truth this theory, the fishermen of the Midcoast Fishermen’s Coopera-
tive  created  a  Community  Supported  Fisheries  (CSF)  based  on  the  successful  agri-
culture model a Community Supported Agriculture (CSA). By selling directly to the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

people of Maine using this model we have established a way to keep Maine’s fisher-
men  fishing  as  well  as  creating  a  bond  with  our  customers.  With  this  bond,  they 
now  feel  a  strong  sense  of  ownership  for  the  fishery  and  the  fishermen  in  the  Gulf 
of Maine. Our CSF customers are helping to preserve one of Maine’s last remaining 
traditional  fishing  communities  while  supporting  environmental  sustainable  fishing 
which  will  restore  the  resource  and  strengthen  Maine’s  local  economy.  We  have  al-
tered  our  gear  to  reduce  bycatch  and  lessen  the  impact  on  habitat.  By  branding  a 
product caught in a sustainable manner off Maine waters and landed in our harbor 
we  are  able  to  market  it  at  a  price  as  much  as  ten  times  that  of  wholesale  prices. 
This  model  has  piqued  the  interest  of  people  all  over  the  country  as  a  potential 
way  to  avoid  consolidation  of  the  fishery,  to  help  restore  the  resources,  strengthen 
local  economies  and  create  a  local  food  supply.  This  was  pioneered  in  Maine  and 
Maine can lead the way by example. 

Through  our  CSF  program  the  people  of  Maine  have  sent  a  clear  message  that 
they  want  ‘‘their’’  community-based  fishery  to  remain  and  prosper.  The  fishermen 
that I work with are determined to leave this fishery in better shape than it is right 
now for their children and grandchildren. I would ask you Senator, to give your full 
consideration  to  this  model,  along  with  alternative  management  plans  like  Area 
Management and Sectors as sound tools that would benefit Maine and New England 
for generations. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you, Mr. Libby. Great idea. Yes, very in-

novative. Thank you. 

Dr. Holland? 

STATEMENT OF DANIEL S. HOLLAND, PH.D., RESEARCH 

ECONOMIST, GULF OF MAINE RESEARCH INSTITUTE 

Dr.  HOLLAND.  Thank  you,  Senator,  for  the  opportunity  to  testify 

before this committee. It is an honor to be here. 

These  are  very  difficult  times  for  the  groundfish  fishery,  as  we 
heard,  and  I  am  grateful  that  the  Subcommittee  and  particularly 
you,  Senator  Snowe,  is  focusing  attention  on  the  needs  of  the  in-
dustry at this time. 

Please  note  that  my  statements  today  reflect  my  own  opinions 
and  research  experience.  They  don’t  represent  the  New  England 
Fishery  Management  Council’s  Groundfish  Plan  Development 
Team on which I do serve as a member. My remarks today are fo-
cused  primarily  on  Amendment  16  to  the  Multispecies  Fishery 
Management  Plan  and,  in  particular,  on  the  development  and  im-
plementation of groundfish sectors. 

Sector  management  in  New  England  and  similar  types  of  man-
agement  elsewhere  in  the  world  has  been  a  primary  focus  of  my 
work  for  several  years,  and  the  Gulf  of  Maine  Research  Institute 
is  now  deeply  involved  in  providing  technical  assistance  to  groups 
developing  sectors.  It  appears  likely  that  to  meet  mortality  reduc-
tions  required  by  law,  the  regional  administrator  will  need  to  im-
plement further and possibly deep effort reductions. 

Indications  are  that  such  cuts  will  continue  under  Amendment 
16 for those that remain under effort controls. While there may be 
limited  flexibility  to  mitigate  these  cuts  in  the  next  fishing  year, 
Amendment  16  provides  some  potential  relief  in  2010  and  beyond 
in the form of sectors. 

Sectors  offer  fishermen  an  opportunity  to  increase  profitability 
and  access  to  healthy  fish  stocks  and  to  improve  safety  at  sea. 
Community-based sectors combined with permit banks may provide 
an  opportunity  for  fishing  communities  in  smaller  ports,  such  as 
Port  Clyde,  to  maintain  their  fleets  and,  hopefully,  grow  them  as 
fish stocks rebuild. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

Although sectors may offer opportunities for fishermen, they also 
impose  new  responsibilities  and  financial  burdens  on  the  industry 
at a time when most are struggling to survive. One of the greatest 
new  costs  of  sectors  is  monitoring.  A  good  monitoring  system  is 
critical to ensure that all catch is accounted for. 

However,  a  report  commissioned  by  GMRI  found  that  an  ade-
quate  monitoring  system  will  be  expensive,  and  it  will  be  difficult 
for the industry to bear the full cost of this initially. An investment 
made  by  the  Government  now  to  support  the  implementation  of 
monitoring systems and help defray the cost in the initial few years 
should pay dividends as it will both support a more profitable fish-
ery and improve data quality for stock assessments. 

Sectors present an opportunity to fishermen, but also a potential 
threat to fishing communities and fishermen in smaller ports, such 
as  Port  Clyde  or  communities  Down  East  that  have  lost  access  to 
the  fishery.  I  say  this  for  two  reasons  and  present  some  ways  to 
mitigate this threat and to turn it into an opportunity. 

First,  the  per-vessel  cost  of  developing,  implementing,  and  oper-
ating  a  sector  may  be  higher  for  smaller  sectors  in  smaller  ports 
because  costs  will  be  shared  between  fewer  vessel  owners  and  be-
cause  monitoring  costs  may  be  higher  for  more  remote  ports  with 
fewer  landings.  If  the  public  desires  to  preserve  these  fishing  com-
munities, it may be necessary to provide them with some particular 
assistance. An example would be to defray higher monitoring costs 
for the small ports. 

I do not wish to suggest that sectors based out of larger ports do 
not  also  face  financial  difficulties.  There  is  a  need  for  assistance 
with sector implementation costs throughout this industry. 

A  second  threat  to  small  fishing  communities  and  small  inde-
pendent operators may actually result from the economic success of 
sector  management.  If  sectors  succeed  in  increasing  the  profit-
ability of members, the value of permits is likely to rise. This may 
make it an expensive proposition to maintain or gain access to the 
fishery. 

The  reason  for  the  expected  increase  in  the  value  of  permits 
under sectors would be a belief by permit buyers that the long-term 
profitability  associated  with  the  fishing  privilege  is  higher  and 
more  secure.  Those  with  access  to  capital  could  reap  the  rewards 
of a more profitable fishery, but those without access to capital are 
left on the outside. 

A  potential  solution  to  this  problem  may  be  the  creation  of  fi-
nancing  mechanisms  for  individual  fishermen  to  get  low-interest 
loans  to  buy  permits.  It  may  also  be  useful  to  create  financing 
mechanisms  that  would  allow  community  trusts  to  purchase  per-
mits  to  be  affiliated  with  community-based  sectors.  Something 
along the lines of this has been done in Alaska in the halibut fish-
ery and sablefish fishery. 

In conclusion, I would urge this committee to consider the press-
ing  needs  of  the  groundfish  industry  not  only  to  survive  the  next 
year,  but  to  thrive  in  the  coming  years.  An  investment  now  in  im-
proving monitoring systems may be critical to the success of sector 
management  and  should  pay  dividends  in  future  years.  Providing 
new financing tools to fishermen and fishing communities will also 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

be critical to the continuation of small owner-operator fishing busi-
nesses, and small fishing communities. 

Thank you, Senator. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Holland follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DANIEL S. HOLLAND, PH.D., RESOURCE ECONOMIST, 

GULF OF MAINE RESEARCH INSTITUTE 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  this  Committee.  It  is  an  honor  to 
be here. These are difficult times for the groundfish industry, and I am grateful that 
the Subcommittee and particularly the Senators present today are focusing their at-
tention  on  the  needs  of  this  industry.  Please  note  that  my  statements  today  reflect 
my  own  opinions  based  on  my  research  and  experience  and  do  not  represent  the 
New England Fishery Management Council Groundfish Plan Development Team on 
which I serve. 

My prepared remarks today are focused primarily on Amendment 16 to the Multi-
species Fishery Management Plan and, in particular, on the development and imple-
mentation  of  groundfish  sectors.  Sector  management  in  New  England,  and  similar 
types of management elsewhere in the world, has been a primary focus of my work 
for  several  years,  and  the  Gulf  of  Maine  Research  Institute  is  now  deeply  involved 
in providing technical assistance to groups developing sectors. 

It appears likely that, to meet mortality reductions required by law, the Regional 
Administrator  will  need  to  implement  further  and  possibly  deep  effort  reductions. 
Indications are that such cuts will continue under Amendment 16 for those that re-
main  under  effort  controls.  While  there  may  be  limited  flexibility  to  mitigate  these 
cuts in the next fishing year, Amendment 16 provides some potential relief in 2010 
and  beyond  in  the  form  of  sectors.  Sectors  offer  an  opportunity  to  increase  profit-
ability  and  access  to  healthy  fish  stocks,  and  to  improve  safety  at  sea.  Community- 
based  sectors  combined  with  permit  banks  may  provide  an  opportunity  for  fishing 
communities in smaller ports such as Port Clyde to maintain their fleets and hope-
fully grow them as fish stocks rebuild. 

Although  sectors  may  offer  opportunities  for  fishermen  they  also  impose  new  re-
sponsibilities and financial burdens on the industry at a time when most are strug-
gling  to  survive.  One  of  the  greatest  new  costs  for  sectors  is  monitoring.  A  good 
monitoring  system  is  critical  to  ensure  that  all  catch  is  accounted  for.  However,  a 
report  commissioned  by  GMRI  found  that  an  adequate  monitoring  system  will  be 
expensive, and it will be difficult for the industry to bear the full costs initially. An 
investment  made  by  the  government  now  to  support  the  implementation  of  moni-
toring  systems  and  help  defray  costs  in  the  initial  few  years  should  pay  dividends 
as  it  will  both  support  a  more  profitable  fishery  and  improve  data  quality  for  stock 
assessments. 

Sectors present an opportunity to fishermen but also a potential threat to fishing 
communities  and  fishermen  in  smaller  ports  such  as  Port  Clyde  or  communities 
Down  East  that  have  lost  access  to  the  fishery.  I  say  this  for  two  reasons  and 
present some ways to mitigate this threat and turn it into an opportunity. 

First, the per vessel costs of developing, implementing and operating a sector may 
be  higher  for  smaller  sectors  in  smaller  ports  because  costs  will  be  shared  between 
fewer  vessel  owners  and  because  monitoring  costs  may  be  higher  for  more  remote 
ports  with  fewer  landings.  If  the  public  desires  to  preserve  these  fishing  commu-
nities, it may be necessary to provide them with some particular assistance. An ex-
ample  would  be  to  defray  higher  monitoring  costs  for  small  ports.  I  do  not  wish  to 
suggest that sectors based out of larger ports do not also face financial difficulties— 
there  is  a  need  for  assistance  with  sector  implementation  costs  throughout  the  in-
dustry. 

A  second  threat  to  small  fishing  communities  and  small  independent  operators 
may actually result from the economic success of sector management. If sectors suc-
ceed in increasing the profitability of members, the value of permits is likely to rise. 
This may make it an expensive proposition to maintain or gain access to the fishery. 
The  reason  for  the  expected  increase  in  the  value  of  permits  under  sectors  would 
be a belief by permit buyers that the long term profitably associated with the fishing 
privilege  is  higher  and  more  secure.  Those  with  access  to  capital  can  reap  the  re-
wards  of  a  more  profitable  fishery,  but  those  without  access  to  capital  are  left  on 
the  outside.  A  potential  solution  to  this  problem  may  be  the  creation  of  financing 
mechanisms  for  individual  fishermen  to  get  low  interest  loans  to  buy  permits.  It 
may  also  be  useful  to  create  financing  mechanisms  that  would  allow  community 
trusts to purchase permits to be affiliated with community based sectors. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

In  conclusion,  I  would  urge  this  Committee  to  consider  the  pressing  needs  of  the 
groundfish  industry  not  only  to  survive  the  next  year,  but  to  thrive  in  the  coming 
years.  An  investment  now  in  improving  monitoring  systems  may  be  critical  to  the 
success  of  sector  management  and  should  pay  dividends  in  future  years.  Providing 
new financing tools to fishermen and fishing communities will also be critical to the 
continuation of the small owner-operator fishing business and small fishing commu-
nities. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you very much, Dr. Holland. 
Ms. McGee? Thank you. 

STATEMENT  OF  SALLY  MCGEE,  NEW  ENGLAND  FISHERIES 
POLICY  DIRECTOR,  OCEANS  PROGRAM,  ENVIRONMENTAL 
DEFENSE  FUND;  MEMBER,  NEW  ENGLAND  FISHERY 
MANAGEMENT COUNCIL 
Ms.  MCGEE.  Thank  you,  Senator  Snowe.  I  am  honored  to  be  in-

vited to testify today. 

My name is Sally McGee. I am the New England Policy Director 
for  Environmental  Defense  Fund’s  Oceans  Program.  I  have  also 
served for 5 years as a member of the New England Fishery Man-
agement Council. 

Environmental  Defense  Fund’s  motto  is  ‘‘finding  the  ways  that 
work.’’  We  are  committed  to  grounding  solutions  in  science  to  pro-
tect  natural  resources  and  the  communities  that  depend  on  them. 
Our  six-person  New  England  team  is  100  percent  focused  on  re-
forming  our  fishery  management  system  to  support  a  robust,  sus-
tainable fishing economy. 

There is a proven solution that can address each of the concerns 
that you have raised today. That solution is catch shares, or essen-
tially  cap  and  trade  systems  for  fish.  As  the  name  implies,  catch 
shares  dedicate  a  percentage  of  the  annual  catch  to  an  individual 
fisherman,  groups  of  fishermen,  or  to  a  community.  The  catch 
share system of greatest interest in New England is sectors, where 
quotas are allocated to groups of fishermen. 

On  the  heels  of  a  study  published  by  Environmental  Defense 
Fund in 2007, just last month, the journal Science published a sur-
vey  that  looked  at  more  than  11,000  fisheries  worldwide  of  which 
121  were  managed  using  catch  shares.  The  results  were  clear. 
Catch  share  fisheries  were  50  percent  less  likely  to  be  collapsed 
than traditionally managed fisheries. And the longer a catch share 
system is in place, the less likely it is to collapse. 

The researchers in Science concluded that the difference between 
catch share and traditional management systems was so clear that 
their  results  showed  ‘‘the  potential  for  greatly  altering  the  future 
of global fisheries.’’ 

In  New  England,  advocating  for  a  catch  share  approach  has 
meant  lending  my  strong  support  for  groundfish  sector  allocations. 
One  of  the  most  memorable  Council  meetings  for  me  was  in  New-
port, Rhode Island, last November. Fishermen from throughout the 
region packed the room. They all came to say the same thing. ‘‘We 
want sector allocations, catch shares.’’ 

In exchange for fishing under fixed quotas, they understood that 
they  would  gain  regulatory  relief  from  wasteful  and  ineffective 
rules, like trip limits, while improving the economic performance of 
their  businesses.  We  have  the  means  right  now  to  get  beyond  this 
decades-long struggle to restore the region’s fisheries. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

The  sector  approach  that  we  have  been  working  to  develop  in 
New  England  will  be  a  win-win  all  around  once  we  get  there.  The 
fishermen win. The Government wins. The public and the resource 
win because the fishery will finally be managed sustainably. 

There  are  currently  19  proposals  for  new  or  revised  sectors  in 
front  of  the  Council,  all  developed  by  fishermen.  If  implemented, 
these sectors will cover a large portion of the groundfish fleet. Oth-
ers  in  the  groundfish  fishery,  including  many  in  Maine,  are  inter-
ested in individual transferable quotas, another type of catch share. 
Either  way,  catch  shares,  designed  correctly,  address  community 
and  conservation  needs  and  hold  the  key  to  addressing  the  con-
cerns you raise today. 

I  do  not  believe  that  further  delaying  action  to  redo  what  was  a 
highly rigorous and thoroughly peer reviewed stock assessment will 
further  our  shared  goals.  We  need  to  continue  our  work  through 
Amendment  16  to  transition  away  from  the  failed  days-at-sea  sys-
tem.  Further  delays  in  corrective  action  will  only  increase  the  bal-
loon payment that fishermen will ultimately have to pay while tak-
ing  control  even  further  away  from  a  far  more  democratic  Council 
process. 

I  do  believe  the  fishery  needs  significant  Government  invest-
ment,  and  I  hope  to  work  with  your  office  on  securing  the  needed 
aid.  Specifically,  an  effective  monitoring  system  is  critical  to  suc-
cessful catch share programs. An appropriation to establish such a 
monitoring  system  is  vital  to  help  fishermen  through  this  transi-
tion  period  and  to  improve  our  understanding  of  the  status  of  fish 
stocks. 

Focusing on solutions like catch shares will let stocks rebuild, let 
fishermen  fish  knowing  their  businesses  will  be  there  for  the  long 
term. 

I thank you for your attention and look forward to any questions. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. McGee follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF SALLY MCGEE,  NEW ENGLAND FISHERIES POLICY 
DIRECTOR,  OCEANS PROGRAM,  ENVIRONMENTAL DEFENSE FUND;  MEMBER, 
NEW ENGLAND FISHERY MANAGEMENT COUNCIL 
Thank  you  Senator  Snowe.  I  am  honored  to  be  invited  to  testify  today.  My  name 
is  Sally  McGee.  I  am  the  New  England  Policy  Director  for  Environmental  Defense 
Fund’s  Oceans  Program.  I  have  also  served  for  5  years  as  a  member  of  the  New 
England Fishery Management Council. 

Environmental  Defense  Fund’s  motto  is  ‘‘finding  the  ways  that  work’’.  We  are 
committed to grounding solutions in sound science to protect natural resources and 
the  communities  which  depend  on  them.  Our  six-person  New  England  team  is  100 
percent focused on reforming our fisheries management system to support a robust, 
sustainable fishing economy. 

There is a proven solution that can address each of the concerns you have raised: 
Amendment  16,  the  future  of  the  industry  and  fishing  communities  and  scientific 
uncertainty.  That  solution  is  catch  shares,  or  essentially  cap-and-trade  systems  for 
fish.  As  the  name  implies,  catch  shares  dedicate  a  percentage  of  the  annual  catch 
to  an  individual  fisherman,  groups  of  fishermen,  or  a  community.  The  catch  share 
system of greatest interest in New England is called ‘‘sectors,’’ where quotas are al-
located to groups of fishermen. 

Just  last  month  the  journal  Science  published  a  study  that  looked  at  more  than 
11,000 fisheries worldwide, of which 121 were managed using catch shares. The re-
sults  were  clear.  Catch  share  fisheries  were  50  percent  less  likely  to  be  collapsed 
than  traditionally-managed  fisheries.  And  the  longer  a  catch  share  system  is  in 
place  the  less  likely  it  is  to  collapse.  The  researchers  concluded  that  the  difference 
between  catch  share  and  traditional  management  systems  was  so  clear  that  their 
results showed ‘‘the potential for greatly altering the future of global fisheries.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

In 2006, Environmental Defense Fund released a report called ‘‘Sustaining Amer-
ica’s Fish and Fishing Communities,’’ which studied existing catch-share systems in 
North America. The results were dramatic. 

Not only did overfishing stop, but average revenues per fishing boat increased by 
80  percent  due  to  higher  yields  and  dockside  prices.  Safety  at  sea  improved  signifi-
cantly  and  fishing  effort  dropped  by  twenty  percent,  leading  to  greater  profits  and 
lower environmental impacts. Bycatch was reduced by more than forty percent. And, 
a key point regarding the subject of this hearing, the science was greatly enhanced. 
Catch shares improve monitoring, data quality, and accuracy of allowable catch lim-
its. 

In  New  England,  advocating  for  a  catch  share  approach  has  meant  lending  my 
strong support for groundfish sector allocations. One of the most memorable council 
meetings  for  me  was  in  Newport,  Rhode  Island  last  November.  There  were  at  least 
fifty  fishermen  from  throughout  the  region  packing  the  room.  They  all  came  to  say 
the same thing—we want sector allocations—catch shares. In exchange they under-
stood that they would gain regulatory relief from wasteful and ineffective rules, like 
trip limits, while improving the economic performance of their businesses. 

We  have  the  means—right  now—to  get  beyond  this  decades-long  struggle  to  re-
store  the  region’s  fisheries.  The  sector  approach  that  we  have  been  working  to  de-
velop  in  New  England  will  be  a  win-win-win  once  we  get  there.  Fishermen  win— 
gaining  assurance  of  access  and  increased  flexibility  to  fish  when  the  economic  and 
weather  conditions  are  right.  The  government  wins—since  the  fishery  will  be  in 
compliance  with  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Act.  The  public  and  the  resource  win  be-
cause the fishery will finally be managed sustainably. 

There  are  currently  19  proposals  for  new  or  revised  groundfish  sectors  in  front 
of  the  Council,  developed  by  fishermen.  If  implemented,  these  sectors  will  cover  a 
significant portion of the groundfish fleet. Others in the groundfish fishery are inter-
ested  in  individual  transferrable  quotas,  another  type  of  catch  share.  We  believe 
that  catch  shares,  designed  correctly,  address  community  and  conservation  needs 
and hold the key to addressing the three concerns you raise today. 

I  do  not  believe  that  further  delaying  Amendment  16  or  the  interim  rule  to  redo 
what was already a highly rigorous and thoroughly peer-reviewed stock assessment 
will  further  our  shared  goals.  We  need  to  continue  our  work  through  Amendment 
16  and  to  transition  away  from  the  failed  days-at-sea  system  and  implement  catch 
shares. 

I  do  believe  the  fishery  needs  significant  government  investment,  and  I  hope  to 
work  with  your  office  on  securing  the  needed  aid.  Specifically,  an  effective  moni-
toring system is critical to successful catch share programs. An appropriation to es-
tablish  such  a  monitoring  system  is  critical  to  help  fishermen  through  this  transi-
tion period. 

The  Magnuson  Stevens  Act  mandates  that  NMFS  end  overfishing.  They  will  do 
so  in  their  interim  regulations  for  2009.  While  the  results  are  likely  to  be  severe, 
further  delays  in  corrective  action  will  only  take  control  away  from  the  far  more 
democratic Council process. And, the longer corrective action is delayed, the greater 
the economic cost fishermen will have to pay to get groundfish back on track. 

Focusing  on  solutions  like  catch  shares  will  let  stocks  rebuild  and  fishermen  fish 
knowing  their  businesses  will  be  there  for  the  long  term.  By  aligning  economic  in-
centives with the conservation goals, our fishermen become effective front-line stew-
ards in rebuilding our fisheries. 

I thank you for your attention and am glad to answer any questions. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you very much, Ms. McGee. 
Just to ask you a question on that point about appropriations for 
monitoring  such  a  system.  What  would  your  estimate  be?  Do  you 
have any idea? 

Ms.  MCGEE.  That  is  something  that  I  have  been  talking  with  a 
number  of  people,  including  those  at  this  table,  to  come  up  with  a 
number  that  makes  sense.  The  transition  period  that  a  number  of 
people  mentioned  is  critical.  The  cost  is  going  to  be  significant  at 
the beginning, in the beginning years. And then, as the fishery re-
covers,  presumably  the  fishery  will  be  able  to  take  on—industry 
will be able to take on a larger percentage of the cost. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

I  am  not  comfortable  giving  you  a  number  today  but  would  very 
much  welcome  the  chance  to  come  back  with  some  other  people  at 
this table with a firm number. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Would  peer  review  assessments—you  are  sug-
gesting  that  there  shouldn’t  be  any  additional  between  now  and 
then? That we should just proceed based on what we know? 

Ms. MCGEE. As far as the stock assessment? 
Senator SNOWE. As they appear? Yes, the stock assessment. 
Ms. MCGEE. Correct. Yes. 
Senator SNOWE. OK. Well, obviously, I think the question is get-
ting from there to here, or here to there, in terms of 2009 and then, 
obviously, to 2010. And obviously, the first major challenges are the 
interim  measures  that  are  put  in  place  before  we  can  even  get  to 
the 2010 scenario. 

Dr. Balsiger, in trying to ascertain exactly what is going to hap-
pen  with  this  interim  measure,  can  you  give  us  an  idea  in  terms 
of what you are thinking, what the agency is thinking about a time 
frame,  substance?  I  mean  beyond  the  Council’s  recommendation  of 
18—reducing  the  days  at  sea  by  18  percent,  which  is  onerous 
enough. 

And  if  you  are  saying  that  it  isn’t  sufficient,  then  that  is  obvi-
ously  raising  some  serious  concerns  about  what  that  means  and 
suggests  for  the  industry  that  is  already  struggling.  And  so,  I 
would  really  like  to  have  you  give  us  some  idea  today  of  how  the 
agency intends to proceed on this question now. 

Dr. BALSIGER. Thank you, Senator Snowe. 
We  haven’t  quite  figured  out  how  to  do  this  yet.  So  I  can’t  give 
you  concrete  responses  on  exactly  what  we  will  do.  But  of  course, 
we  will  start  with  the  Council’s  recommendations.  We  will  look  at 
that,  and  the  driving  principle  is  the  need  to  end  overfishing,  as 
the Magnuson Act requires us to do. 

So,  if  the  recommendations  from  the  Council  do  not  end  over-
fishing,  we  may  have  to  make  some  different  changes  to  it.  But  I 
will  assure  you,  we  won’t  do  those  by  ourselves.  It  won’t  surprise 
anyone.  But  we  will  develop  these,  and  there  will  be  a  proposed 
rule.  We  will  work  with  the  Council  and  others  and  take  public 
comment on this and try to do it as cooperative and coordinated as 
we can. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  I  gather  from  what  you  are  saying  is  that 
you might take some of their recommendations overall, but not nec-
essarily  the  issue  of  days  at  sea?  I  mean,  I  think  that  was  illus-
trative of the regional administrator in terms of rejecting what the 
Council had done, which is another issue unto itself. 

But  right  now,  what  can  we  expect  in  the  industry?  I  mean,  if 
this  is  not  sufficient,  what  is  left  for  the  industry  if  you  go  deeper 
in  cuts  in  terms  of  days  at  sea,  for  example?  I  mean,  how  much 
more can they bear? 

Dr.  BALSIGER.  Senator,  again,  we  will  use  the  Council’s  rec-
ommendations  as  much  as  we  can.  But  if  they  don’t  meet  the  re-
quirement  to  end  overfishing,  some  additional  changes  would  have 
to be made. 

We  haven’t  yet  worked  out  what  those  additional  measures 
might be or what they might have to be. We are working very hard 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

to make the impact as minimal as we can, of course, but driven by 
the need to end overfishing. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Mr.  Cunningham,  do  you  have  any  points,  or 
Mr.  Stockwell,  on  this  question?  Because,  obviously,  it  is  the  cen-
tral issue here now what we can expect, how severe those cuts will 
be, what approach is taken. This is for May 2009, and I know that 
the  regional  administrator  indicated,  in  rejecting  the  Council’s  as-
sessment when it was a 15–1 decision, that the Council’s approach 
was too complex. 

Well, I gather it would be if you are talking about 19 species, and 
perhaps that is part of the problem here is that there is no individ-
ualized recognition of how we should treat one versus the other. If 
the  haddock  population,  for  example,  has  been  rebuilt,  the  fishing 
industry ought to be able to take advantage of that without spilling 
over  to  the  other  species  or  having  to  achieve  the  lowest  number 
possible  because  of  the  other  fish  that  have  been—that  aren’t  in 
abundance and need to be rebuilt. 

Yes, Mr. Cunningham? 
Mr. CUNNINGHAM. Thank you, Senator. 
I  think  there  are  a  couple  of  issues  here.  First,  as  I  indicated  in 
my  testimony,  the  Council  is  not  informed  as  to  what  the  interim 
measures are going to entail. Obviously, we made our recommenda-
tions  to  the  service  what  we  thought  would  be  some  measures  to 
be included. 

I think the problem that we are faced with was also indicated by 
Sally  McGee,  and  one  is  whatever  shortfall  is  given  during  the  in-
terim measures, that is going to have to be made up unless we see 
a  change  in  Magnuson  or  a  change  in  the  flexibility  of  how  we  re-
build  these  stocks.  It  is  just  going  to  be  harder  for  the  industry  to 
actually make up those shortfalls in the fewer years that they have 
left in the rebuilding period. 

What we are faced with is a situation where, essentially, we are 
forced  to  manage  to  the  weakest  stock.  And  until  we  can  get 
around  that  or  come  up  with  another  management  strategy,  that 
really sort of handcuffs what we can do. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Ms.  McGee,  you  are  on  the  Council  and  obvi-
ously  agreed  with  the  recommendations  of  the  Council.  I  gather 
then you agreed that the assessment was sufficient for rebuilding? 
Ms. MCGEE. I agreed that it is good—I support the Council proc-
ess. And I agreed with the final vote on that measure as much be-
cause of the contents of it as because I feel like the deliberative na-
ture  and  the  very  public  process  that  the  Council  goes  through  is 
important to establishing rules that are actually going to stick and 
be abided by the industry because the industry is involved in devel-
oping them. 

Senator SNOWE. And so—yes, Mr. Stockwell? 
Mr. STOCKWELL. Importantly, too, the industry agreed, as part of 
the  deliberations  we  made  for  proposing  interim  action,  to  a  pay-
back in 2010, when sector management was implemented, when we 
had  a  workable  process.  Much  of  the  conversation  was  based  upon 
the interim action being a band-aid until we get to sector manage-
ment. 

The common issue we have all been referring to about the report-
ing  and  monitoring  issues,  we  have  a  common  pool  that  we  are 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

very concerned about incorporating into this also for reporting and 
monitoring.  So  we  are  band-aiding  our  way  also  from  Amendment 
16 into Amendment 17. 

But  there  are  a  couple  of  issues.  In  a  letter  that  the  executive 
director  of  the  Council  wrote  to  the  Fisheries  Service  that  ad-
dressed  the  status  of  the  Gulf  of  Maine  winter  flounder  and  the 
status  of  pollock  being  revised  to  overfished  condition  and  over-
fishing not occurring in 2006. And these are—it is a very—it is an 
ongoing  dialogue  between  the  Council  and  the  Fisheries  Service 
right  now,  and  I  feel  comfortable  that  we  are  going  to  be  able  to 
work our way through this. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  you  had  mentioned,  I  gather,  that  there 
are  alternatives  to  days  at  sea.  I  mean,  is  that  something  that 
could  be  possible  in  an  interim  measure  rather  than  the  drastic 
cuts of days at sea? 

Mr.  STOCKWELL.  Well,  the  Council  itself,  with  concurrence  from 
the  industry,  proposed  the  18  percent  default  reduction  just  be-
cause  we  knew  we  weren’t  in  a  position  to  be  able  to  move  ahead 
in  alternative  management  at  this  point.  We  made  collectively, 
throughout this room, great efforts to try to move ahead implemen-
tation  of  sectors  in  2009,  but  for  a  number  of  reasons,  we  weren’t 
able to do it. 

Senator SNOWE. Yes, Mr. Cunningham? 
Mr. CUNNINGHAM. Thank you. 
Just  one  comment  on  the  18  percent  reduction  in  days  at  sea. 
That  was  actually  part  of  Amendment  13.  That  was  scheduled  out 
as part of that. So it is not something that we, as the Council, just 
pulled a number out of the thin air. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Right,  right.  No,  that  is  actually  a  very  good 

point. 

How  would  the  industry  be  able  to  absorb  even  this  18  percent? 
Would it? I mean, that is the issue here. It is the real central ques-
tion  about  maintaining  the  viability  of  the  industry  in  order  to 
overcome  these  challenges  and  be  on  the  other  side  and  be  able  to 
take advantage of their efforts now. 

Mr.  JAMES ODLIN.  As  I  stated  earlier,  I  think  it  is  going  to  be 
very  difficult  because  in  an  interim  action,  you  can’t  put  any  miti-
gating  measures  in  the  action,  and  that  18  percent  reduction  is 
going to take a lot of people out of the State of Maine. 

I  would  further  like  to  comment  out  that  Magnuson-Stevens  Act 
Section  304(e)(6)  states  that  during  the  development  of  the  Fish-
eries  Management  Plan,  a  plan  amendment,  or  proposed  regula-
tions, the Council may request the Secretary to implement interim 
measures  necessary  to  reduce  overfishing  under  Section  305(c) 
until  such  measures  can  be  replaced  by  such  plan,  amendment,  or 
regulations.  Such  measures,  if  otherwise  in  compliance  with  provi-
sions of the Act, may be implemented even if they are not sufficient 
by themselves to stop overfishing of the fisheries. 

So,  for  me,  that  says  we  could  do  the  18  percent  reduction,  even 
if  it  is  not  enough  to  completely  end  overfishing.  It  will  reduce  it, 
and then that would let you get to Amendment 16. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  Dr.  Balsiger,  do  you  read  it  that  way?  I 
mean, is that a point here that the ultimate objective at this point, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

this interim measure would not be, according to the Magnuson-Ste-
vens  Act,  to  address  the  overfishing  and  to  achieve  the  final  goal? 
Dr.  BALSIGER.  Senator,  I  don’t  know  that  our  lawyers  have 
looked  at  that  or  not.  I  have  made  some  notes  here.  I  would  say, 
though,  that  I  think  the  agency  will  still  work  hard  to  end  over-
fishing, even if there may be this loophole there. But I understand 
the question. We will take a look at that and get back to you. 

Senator SNOWE. I think that would be helpful and useful because 
I  know  that  Mr.  Odlin  cites  many  examples  in  his  testimony  as 
well.  So  I  think  it  would  be  worthwhile  to  really  evaluate  them, 
and  is  that  another  avenue?  Because  there  is  very  little  time,  in 
the final analysis, in order to absorb draconian cuts. Based on what 
has  happened,  based  on  the  fact  that  they  didn’t  have  the  assess-
ment  in  time,  and  for  all  of  those  reasons,  and  also  to  support  an 
industry because some of those species certainly have been rebuilt. 
And I think that we have got to find a way to mitigate this situa-
tion  so  that  we  just  don’t  impose  a  very  harsh  sentence  on  the  in-
dustry with no flexibility, with no means of minimizing the adverse 
impact  in  this  period  of  time.  There  is  no  way  to  rebound  from 
that. 

And  I  just  wonder  what  this  process  is  going  to  be.  Because  the 
agency,  as  you  are  suggesting,  is  obviously  going  to  come  up  with 
another  rule,  is  what  I  gather.  And  you  are  going  to  issue  it  for 
public  comment.  But  the  period—the  time  in  which  it  is  going  to 
turn  around  is  going  to  be  very  limited  and  how  can  the  industry 
respond  to  that  and  what  are  the  mitigating  measures  that  might 
be necessary to offset that? 

So  I  just  wonder  how  this  is  all  going  to  work  in  such  a  short 

period of time, not knowing what it is going to be. 

Dr. BALSIGER. I appreciate your concern, Senator Snowe. And we 
will  try  to  enhance  our  communication  with  you  and  with  the  in-
dustry as much as we can as we go through this process. There are 
no  great  solutions  to  this,  but  I  do  appreciate  your  comment  that 
this  is  a  way  to  get  to  the  next  management  regime,  and  we  have 
to keep that in mind. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Yes,  I  see  that  as  sort  of  a  bridge.  And  so,  the 
fact  that  it  is  an  interim  measure.  The  fact  is  that  we  didn’t  get 
the benefit of the report until recently from GARM on the stock as-
sessments,  there  was  very  little  time  in  which  to  respond,  and  the 
requirements—the  time  frame  in  which  you  are  required  to  re-
spond.  And  the  agency  has  rejected  the  Council’s  recommendation, 
at  least  ostensibly  by  the  fact  that  the  regional  administrator  did, 
which is another issue in the sense of what is the role of the Coun-
cil in that regard? 

I  mean,  if  you  have  a  15–1  decision  that  is  a  broad-based  deci-
sion  because  it  includes  many  stakeholders,  as  Ms.  McGee  rep-
resents environmental stakeholders, for example. It is broad-based. 
How  is  it  that,  unilaterally,  that  decision  can  be  rejected  and  ve-
toed? Because then you are not getting the input that is necessary 
to  make  these  decisions  and  build  confidence  in  the  decision  that 
is ultimately rendered. 

Dr.  BALSIGER.  Senator,  I  greatly  appreciate  that  and  Ms. 
McGee’s  comment  that  a  recommendation  that  goes  through  the 
public process is vastly superior to anything that the Federal Gov-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

ernment  is  going  to  make  up  on  its  own.  We  are  a  bureaucracy, 
and we suffer from the slowness therein. 

But—and  it  is  not  so  much  of  a  rejection  or  a  veto  of  the  Coun-
cil’s action, it is a question as to whether legally it accomplishes— 
whether it will accomplish what we believe we are legally required 
to  accomplish  by  the  Magnuson  Act.  If  it  doesn’t  accomplish  that 
and we get sued, we could lose. So if that would happen, the indus-
try would lose. 

So  we  want  to  make  sure  that  what  we  do  do  implementing  the 
interim  rule  is  defensible  so  that  we  can  have  some  way  to  bridge 
over to the new regime. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Yes,  and  I  understand  what  you  are  saying  be-
cause  it  has  to  be  sustainable,  the  decision.  I  just  wonder,  though, 
when  you  have  the  sort  of  wrenching  process  by  which  you  have 
something  established  with  the  Council  and  to  go  through  that 
whole public process. They have a broadly-based representation on 
the  Council.  Everybody  offers  their  views,  gets  the  input,  makes 
the decision 15–1, which is, you know, all of us would like to have 
those kind of decisions with such almost unanimity. 

So  that  suggests  to  me  that  a  consensus  was  reached  on  that 
question,  and  then  it  is  to  be  ultimately  rejected  because  it  was— 
in  her  view,  I  guess  it  was  insufficient,  too  complex,  or  whatever. 
But the point is it puts the industry in a very difficult position. 

And  it  seems  to  me  there  is  something  in  between  all  of  that.  I 
mean,  you  go  through  the  process  and  say,  well,  one  person  gets 
to veto it in the final analysis because she is obviously the regional 
administrator for the agency. But on the other hand, how does that 
build  confidence  for  the  overall  process,  and  what  is  the  point  of 
the process? 

I  think  that  is  one  of  the  issues  here  that  I  hope  that  we  could 
sort  of  resolve  at  some  point  because  I  think  we  have  to—not  to 
say that everybody is going to agree with every decision, but when 
you  get  a  15–1,  it  seems  to  me  that  should  really  be  the  basis  of 
a  decision.  I  know  you  have  the  issues  regarding  legal  interpreta-
tions  and  being  able  to  sustain  that  in  a  court  of  law.  And  the 
agency has been sued many times. So I understand all that. 

But  I  think  in  the  meantime  there  has  got  to  be  some  kind  of 
bridge  between  the  Council  and  the  agency  when  these  decisions 
are being made so that you don’t get to the end of the process and 
somebody says, ‘‘Well, sorry. It is not going to work that way.’’ And 
I  think  that  is  the  point  here  on  something  so  important,  so  crit-
ical,  and  ultimately  represents  some  grave  consequences  for  an  in-
dustry in a state of unknowing and uncertainty. 

Dr. BALSIGER. Thank you, Senator. 
I think that we could say that around the country, the instances 
where  the  Fisheries  Service  has  disregarded  or  rejected  rec-
ommendations  from  the  Council  are  very,  very  few.  And  they  are 
all  based  on  those  cases  where  we  believe  that  the  action  taken 
was  not—would  not  allow  us  to  put  a  regulation  in  place  that  al-
lowed us to meet our legal mandates. 

But  I  take  your  point,  and  it  is  excellent,  that  once  a  decision 
goes  through  that  great  public  process,  all  of  the  constituent  sub-
committees,  advisory  bodies,  that  that  is  the  way  we  want  rec-
ommendations  to  come  to  the  agency,  and  we  don’t  change  those. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

Senator SNOWE. Yes. 
Dr. BALSIGER. We accept them. We don’t actually have a legal ca-
pability  to  change  those  unless  they  don’t  stand  up  legally  and  let 
us  meet  our  legal  requirements.  We  don’t  get  to  add  to  the  rec-
ommendations  of  the  Council.  We  don’t  get  to  take  away  from  the 
recommendations  unless  they  don’t  achieve  what  we  think  the  law 
says we have to achieve. 

Senator  SNOWE.  But  isn’t  that  something  you  determine  before-
hand? I don’t know, Mr. Cunningham, you know certainly far more 
than  I  do  about  the  process.  I  mean,  all  of  you  have  been  involved 
in  that  process.  But  what  is  it  that  we  could  do  better  in  that  re-
gard so that we don’t get to this point and we are left not knowing, 
ultimately?  When  a  decision  is  made,  it  is  reflective  of  broadly- 
based interest for the groundfishery. 

Mr.  CUNNINGHAM.  I  am  actually  not  sure  how  to  answer  that 

question. 

gust? 

Senator SNOWE. I assume that you have to meet the same objec-
tives as are under the law in terms of being sustainable and meet-
ing the rebuilding requirements. So I think you are all governed by 
the same statute, the same requirements. So is there a different in-
terpretation,  or  is  there  no  interpretation  when  it  comes  to  a  legal 
analysis? 

Mr. CUNNINGHAM. Well, we—in a number of instances, we make 
recommendations  like  these  kinds  to  the  service,  and  the  service 
has  the  legal  staff  to  look  at  it.  We  don’t  have  our  own  legal  staff. 
We actually rely upon the service. 

Senator SNOWE. Does anybody else—yes, Ms. McGee? 
Ms. MCGEE. I think one of the problems that a number of people 
have pointed out already today is the timing issue and the problem 
with the new stock assessments coming out and the Council having 
to  make  a  decision  just  very  shortly  after  the  stock  assessments 
were published. 

Senator SNOWE. Which were in August, right? Wasn’t that in Au-

Ms.  MCGEE.  It  was  completed  in  August,  and  the  Council  re-
ceived  that  1,000-page  report  in  September.  There  is  not  enough 
time  for  anybody  to  be  able  to  make  good  sense  of  that.  But  the 
fact  was  that  Amendment  13—or  sorry,  Framework  42,  which  was 
subsequent to Amendment 13, set up that time line. We knew that 
was coming. 

And I argued several years ago that we needed to make sure that 
we  are  getting  the  science  and  giving  ample  time  for  the  Council 
to  develop  meaningful  measures  that  don’t  put  National  Marine 
Fisheries Service in the awkward position of saying, well, what you 
have done in a very short period of time isn’t going to cut it. 

So  it  has  been—everybody  has  been  in  a  bind  in  the  last  couple 
of  months.  The  council  has—that  vote  that  you  have  cited  a  num-
ber  of  times  I  know  was  not  comfortable  for  a  number  of  people, 
including  myself.  But  it  is  kind  of  like  what  are  you  going  to  do 
when  you  only  have  a  week  to  read  something  that  is  1,000  pages 
long? And the Council set it up that way, and that was a mistake. 
We  need  to  figure  out  a  way  to  get  the  science,  have  confidence 
in the science, build that monitoring system so that the confidence 
is  built  because  fishermen  are  having  more  direct  input  into  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

monitoring system that the stock assessments are based upon, and 
that  the  outputs  from  the  stock  assessments  are  done  far  enough 
in  advance—not  too  far  in  advance  so  you  are  not  using  old  infor-
mation, but far enough so that people can make sense of it. 

Senator SNOWE. Dr. Holland? 
Dr. HOLLAND. Yes, I think one reason or potential reason for sort 
of a difference of opinion is not necessarily purely legal. But it has 
to  do  with  the  fact  that  since  you  are  using  an  effort  control  man-
agement  system  rather  than  an  output  control  system,  there  is  a 
lot  of  uncertainty  about  whether  you  will  actually  accomplish  your 
objective in terms of fishing mortality. 

So  I  think  Jim  Odlin  mentioned  that  in  a  number  of  cases  for  a 
number  of  stocks,  the  catches  have  been  actually  well  below  what 
were  supposed  to  be  the  target  TACs.  We  come  to  find  later  on  or 
were told later on that there was overfishing occurring. 

So, to some extent, you could say, OK, we are going to take a cut 
that  the  model  does  not  tell  us,  the  model  that  they  are  using  for 
predicting what the catches are going to be. It doesn’t appear to get 
you  there  all  the  way.  And  you  might  get  there  anyway.  If  you 
don’t  get  there,  then  you  have  to  pay  it  back  the  following  year, 
which is, I think, what the Council was saying that they would pay 
that back, the overage back. So—— 

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  do  you  have  any—how  much  more  could 

the industry absorb and still be economically viable? 

Dr. HOLLAND. I am sure that is—— 
Senator  SNOWE.  Do  you  have  any  models  or  analysis  on  that?  I 

mean, I think that is the real question. 

Dr.  HOLLAND.  I  don’t.  I  think  the  economist  at  the  Northeast 
Fishery Science Center, they do have the wherewithal, the informa-
tion  on  costs  and  earnings  and  some  models  to  look  at  how  profit-
ability is going to be affected. My guess is that there are some fish-
ermen  that  are  going  to  survive  and  that  are  profitable  at  this 
point,  but  there  are  a  lot  that  are  right  on  the  margin  or  maybe 
have  been  making  losses  in  recent  years.  And  those  ones  will  go 
over the edge. 

Senator  SNOWE.  How  many  people  do  we  have—oh,  19?  Wow,  a 
lot  of  people  want  to  speak.  All  right.  I  think  we  might  as  well 
begin that process, and we can always—yes, Dr. Holland? 

Dr.  HOLLAND.  Before  we  do  that,  could  I  just  make  one  com-

ment—— 

Senator SNOWE. Yes. 
Dr.  HOLLAND.—related  to  your  earlier  question,  your  first  ques-

tion to Sally regarding the additional cost for monitoring. 

Senator SNOWE. Right. 
Dr.  HOLLAND.  We  hired  some  consultants  to  do  a  study  of  moni-
toring  costs,  and  they  came  up  with  an  estimate  in  terms  of  actu-
ally  building  the  system  and  implementing,  just  implementing  the 
system,  which  includes  buying  electronic  monitoring  equipment 
and such, of around $7 million for implementation. 

And then to actually operate the system, we are looking at poten-
tially  $800,000  to  $1.6  million  a  year  more  than  what  they  are 
doing now for dockside monitoring. And then when they implement 
an  at-sea  monitoring  component,  that  could  be  anywhere  from  an-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

other  $5  million  to  $10  million  more  annually  above  what  the  cost 
that the industry is bearing right now. 

So  they  may  be  able  to  absorb  that.  The  industry  may  be  able 
to  absorb  that  with  higher  profitability  down  the  road,  but  it  will 
be difficult. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Certainly  at  the  outset,  it  would  be  difficult  to 

Dr. HOLLAND. Right. 
Senator SNOWE. Not to mention the other costs that might be as-

sociated with it. So that would be on an ongoing basis? 

absorb. 

Dr.  HOLLAND.  On  an  ongoing  basis.  If  they  have  the  full  at-sea 
monitoring  program  that  has  been  proposed  by  the  Council,  it  is 
another  $5  million  to  $10  million  a  year,  and  that  is  on  a  fishery 
that  has  been  running  at  under  $100  million  a  year  recently.  So 
we are talking about 6 to 10, 12 percent of the value of the fishery, 
which is a significant amount. 

Senator  SNOWE.  So  would  that  money  have  to  be  in  place  before 
an alternative management system was in place? I mean, for exam-
ple,  in  the  sector  management,  would  that  not  have  to  be  in  place 
before? 

Dr.  HOLLAND.  Well,  the  current  model  is  that  the  industry  has 
to  build  this  themselves  and  pay  for  it  themselves.  So  right  now, 
the onus is on the industry to actually pull it together and pay for 
it  as  they  go.  So  we  were  hoping,  we  had  come  and  put  some  pro-
posals  earlier  that  it  would  be  helpful  to  have  some  additional, 
some Federal funding to help implement that in the first place and 
not put all those costs on the industry at the beginning. 

Senator  SNOWE.  OK.  One  other  question,  Dr.  Balsiger,  that  I 
want to make sure that I get in here because it was something that 
I mentioned in my opening statement about the secretarial declara-
tion  of  disaster.  I  am  concerned  about  that,  as  I  indicated  earlier, 
as  is  the  Governor  and  Senator  Collins  and  many  of  us  who  con-
tinue  to  write  to  the  Secretary  and  express  our  views  on  this  mat-
ter. 

Because we have now included $75 million in the continuing res-
olution, our concern is that that money is going to evaporate before 
he  ever  decides,  if  he  decides,  to  declare  a  disaster  for  the 
groundfishery.  And  I  don’t  understand  why  he  wouldn’t,  given  the 
circumstances.  I  know  that  recently  they  did  in  the  Maryland  and 
Virginia  crab  fisheries,  that  we  have  lost  a  value  of  5  to  6  times 
of that fishery. 

And so, I don’t understand what the standard is, and I know that 
NMFS is working, the agency is working on developing a standard 
to  put  into  law.  But  in  the  meantime,  we  want  to  make  sure  that 
we are not excluded from the opportunity, although it does depend 
on getting the Secretary of Commerce’s declaration that the fishery 
is a disaster or it has failed. 

So  what  can  we  expect  on  that?  Because  I  could  see,  this  money 
being  gone,  and  we  are  not  going  to  have  any  opportunity  because 
it  is  based  on  these  regulatory  restrictions.  And  I  want  to  make 
sure there is some consistency and fairness and equity in these ap-
propriations  and  the  declaration  that  obviously  has  to  occur  first. 

Dr. BALSIGER. Thank you, Senator. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

The  Governor  asked  for  a  similar  finding  of  disaster  in  2006, 
which the agency and the Secretary did not find a disaster. So they 
didn’t  support  that.  But  we  don’t—the  circumstance  is  reasonably 
close to the same in the current request for disaster from Governor 
Baldacci.  But  we  are  looking  at  that  very  closely,  particularly,  as 
you point out, in light of the other disasters we have declared. 

So we do have that fairly recently, that request to examine it. So 
we  are  looking  at  it.  There  are  two  things  we  have  to  find,  of 
course—a commercial fishery failure and the resource disaster. And 
so, those are the bars that we need to get over, and we have people 
working on it as we speak. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Yes,  well,  just  last  week—it  was  about  last 
week,  he  did  declare  the  Chesapeake  blue  crab  fishery,  citing  a  41 
percent  decline  in  landing  values,  a  drop  overall  of  $6.5  million. 
And  then  what  I  said  in  my  letter  to  the  Secretary  again  last  Fri-
day,  we  said  our  industry  has  experienced  obviously  a  32  percent 
decline in landings, more than $30 million shortfall in the same pe-
riod and $41 million from its peak. 

So  I  mean  we  have  lost  more  than  half  of  our  groundfish  land-
ings  in  10  years.  So  I  don’t  know  what  is  the  threshold  for  declar-
ing  a  disaster.  Frankly,  I  think  that  there  has  got  to  be  fairness 
involved  here  and  not  an  inconsistent  interpretation  of  what  con-
stitutes  a  disaster  when  it  is  clear,  abundantly  clear  that  Maine 
has  suffered  even  disproportionately  to  the  entire  fishery  in  New 
England, that, without question, it has been the hardest hit. 

So  I  want  to  be  sure  that  fairness  is  applied  in  that  declaration, 
and  I  don’t  want  the  money  to  disappear  and  then  the  Secretary 
decides to declare it and we have no money. 

Dr.  BALSIGER.  I  understand,  Senator.  And  we  are  looking  at  it 

now. 

Senator  SNOWE.  OK.  I  would  appreciate  that.  We  all  believe  the 
whole  New  England  groundfishery  is  in  jeopardy.  Maine  is  just 
even more so. So I think that is illustrative of the problem and the 
depth of the problem that we are facing here. 

Do you think it would be helpful to have a definition on the book 

what constitutes a disaster? 

Dr.  BALSIGER.  Senator,  we  are  working  on  a  proposed  rule  that 
would  identify  the  criteria  more  specifically.  I  look  forward  to  that 
point  in  time  when  we  have  that.  I  understand  there  is  a  debate 
about  how  useful  that  would  be,  but  personally,  I  think  that  we 
should have that and it would be helpful. 

Senator SNOWE. No, I think it would be, both for Maine and New 
England,  the  entire  industry.  And  we  want  to  make  sure  that  a 
portion of that funding is available for that declaration and for the 
New  England  groundfish  industry.  So  that  is  what  our  concern  is 
that,  all  of  a  sudden,  the  sectors  will  make  declarations  on  other 
industries, and we are going to be excluded. 

I just don’t understand why he is refusing to do so. I really don’t. 
Given  the  numbers,  given  the  dimensions  of  it,  this  should  be  a 
slam-dunk, frankly, and I just don’t understand it. 

But  we  are  going  to  continue  to  ask  for  it,  and  I  know  the  Gov-
ernor is, too, and the governors in New England. But we are going 
to  insist  on  it.  It  is  a  matter  of  fairness  in  analyzing  the  statistics 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

and the value of the loss certainly to Maine and to the entire New 
England region. OK? 

And  I  hope  that  I  can  hear  back,  and  we  have  all  sent  letters. 
We  are  going  to  keep  sending  letters  and  talking  to  him  about  it, 
but  I  hope  that  you  could  reinforce  that  view  with  the  Secretary. 

Thank you. I appreciate it. 
OK.  Why  don’t  we  begin  to  have  those  who  want,  more  impor-
tantly,  to  hear  from  the  public  here  and  the  industry.  So  I  will  be 
going  by  number.  Number  one.  Did  people  get  numbers?  Yes.  And 
up  in  the  balcony,  you  just  have  to  turn,  when  it  is  any  of  your 
turns, just turn on the microphone. 

Thank you. 

STATEMENT  OF  BILL  GERENCER,  MEMBER,  GROUNDFISH 
ADVISORY PANEL; MEMBER, ATLANTIC HIGHLY MIGRATORY 
SPECIES  PANEL;  COMMERCIAL  FISH  BUYER,  M.F.  FOLEY 
COMPANY, INC. 
Mr.  GERENCER.  Somebody  has  got  to  go  first.  Thank  you,  Sen-

ator. Thanks, everybody. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you. 
Mr. GERENCER. My name is Bill Gerencer. I have made my living 
in  the  seafood  business  for  28  years  as  a  lobsterman,  fisherman, 
and in seafood buying and sales. 

I  spent  10  years  on  the  board  of  directors  of  the  Portland  Fish 
Exchange, including 6 as treasurer and a term as president. I have 
also served on the Groundfish Advisory Panel for over 10 years and 
on  the  Highly  Migratory  Species  Advisory  Panel  for  more  than  8, 
giving  thousands  of  hours  of  my  time  at  AP  meetings,  attending 
committee  and  council  meetings,  and  making  visits  to  Woods  Hole 
to become better qualified to serve through ad hoc training sessions 
with  Northeast  Science  Center  staff.  I  still  serve  on  both  advisory 
panels. 

First  and  foremost,  I  want  to  say  about  the  employees  at  Na-
tional Marine Fisheries Service Woods Hole, those that I know per-
sonally, I believe to be decent, honest, dedicated, and hard-working 
public servants. However, I grow increasingly concerned with stock 
assessments,  lack  of  information,  critical  proper  fisheries  manage-
ment, and management itself. 

Back  in  June,  we  were  looking  toward  a  77  percent  cut  in  effort 
because  of  hake,  a  devastating  blow  to  the  industry.  Now,  a  few 
months  later,  hake  is  no  longer  the  issue,  and  months  of  work  on 
the  amendment  had  to  be  scrapped.  Flatfish  are  currently—some 
flatfish are currently the problem, a finding I do not disagree with. 
However, it is not only almost impossible now to run a business, 
given the rapidly changing nature of the scientific advice, it is now 
apparently  impossible  to  craft  a  management  plan.  We  spent  over 
a year developing a plan that had to be thrown out because the as-
sessment  report  came  out  late  and  nearly  at  the  same  time  as  the 
completed  plan  was  due.  The  over  900-page  GARM  report  has  yet 
to be fully digested. 

On  my  first  visit  to  Woods  Hole  as  an  AP  member,  then-chief  of 
the  Population  Dynamics  Branch  Steve  Murawski  impressed  upon 
me  that  the  random  stratified  design  for  collection  of  stock  assess-
ment  data  was  one  of  the  best  in  the  world,  in  part  based  on  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

continuous data collection time line stretching back to 1931. But he 
also stressed that while the system was an excellent tool for deter-
mination  of  relative  stock  abundance,  it  was  probably  not  a  great 
management tool. 

Perhaps this has been manifested in the increasing problems we 
currently  face,  some  of  which  include  the  following—and  I  will  try 
to gloss over the redundant ones—the pollock assessment, where a 
single data point was used as opposed to the 3-year center average. 
A  3-year  center  average  would  have  resulted  in  defining  the  stock 
as  not  overfished,  and  overfishing  not  occurring.  We  have  noticed 
that the best thing we can say about a stock is something negative. 
It is not overfished, and overfishing is not occurring. And even that 
sounds bad, even though it is good. 

[Laughter.] 
Mr.  GERENCER.  Using  the  most  recent  year,  the  stock  is  half  of 
that.  Overfished  and  overfishing  is  occurring.  And  I  question  how 
is  it  that  the  peer  review  either  did  not  comment  on  the  use  of  a 
single  year  or  that  those  comments  never  made  it  into  the  report? 
To  accept  the  northern  windowpane  flounder  assessment,  you 
must  believe  the  industry  discarded  over  800  metric  tons  of  these 
legally  saleable  fish  valued  at  close  to  $400,000.  The  peer  review 
comments  recommended  that  the  Gulf  of  Maine  winter  flounder 
stock  assessment  not  be  used.  It  was  used  anyway.  It  was  left  to 
the industry to point this out before any explanation was given. 

And  gray  sole  landings  are  a  third  of  the  recommended  total  al-
lowable  catch,  and  the  stock  dropped  by  two  thirds.  Gulf  of  Maine 
cod  was  routinely  overfished  by  large  amounts,  according  to  the 
data,  and  is  now  considered  not  overfished  and  close  to  be  recov-
ered.  How  are  we  supposed  to  follow  management  advice?  It  be-
comes very confusing. 

The  primary  modeling  tool  used  to  manipulate  data  collected  by 
the  random  stratified  design  survey  in  New  England  is  called  vir-
tual population analysis. VPA models are designed to assess single 
stocks that are fished without restrictions because landings are the 
primary  determinant  of  stock  size.  In  New  England,  we  use  them 
to  assess  an  interactive  multispecies  complex  stock  by  stock  as  if 
they  were  single  stocks,  with  fishing  effort  and  presumably  land-
ings  restricted  by  closed  areas,  mesh  sizes,  TACs,  trip  limits,  days 
at sea, et cetera. 

Not  surprisingly,  the  model  started  to  fail  about  the  same  time 
effort controls were put into place. This is important because these 
are meant—the model depends on complete access to the stock, un-
fettered  fishing  ability  throughout  the  time  of  the  year,  the  range 
of the stock, et cetera, and we are inputting data that is full of re-
strictions. So it is going to affect the model. 

I  recently  downloaded  the  VPA  model  used  by  the  National  Ma-
rine  Fisheries  Service  in  altered  landings  up  and  down  and  reran 
the assessments myself. And admittedly, my knowledge and experi-
ence with VPA modeling is preliminary, but the results were as ex-
pected.  Inputting  lower  landings  into  the  model  result  in  a  de-
creased stock estimate, and increased landings did the opposite. 

The  attempts  to  fix  the  VPA  models  include  a  retrospective  pat-
tern analysis, used a factor called ‘‘Mohn’s rho’’ developed by a Ca-
nadian, Bob Mohn. Bob sat in the meeting when the use of his rho 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

factor,  which  was  an  adjustment  factor,  was  discussed.  It  didn’t 
seem  to  bother  anyone  that  he  objected  to  the  way  it  was  being 
used. 

The  other  part  of  the  solution  of  the  VPA  problem  was  to  split 
the time series and essentially throw out all the data prior to 1994, 
when effort controls came into place. I am still trying to learn how 
this model accounts for the intentional reduction in landings when 
it uses landings as a primary determinant of stock size. 

The value assigned to natural mortality in the VPA models used 
is assumed to be the same for all stocks. In single stocks not inter-
acting  with  each  other,  this  assumption  may  hold  water.  But  with 
19  stocks  in  the  complex  interacting  with  each  other  and  inter-
acting  with  populations  of  many  other  species,  these  assumptions 
may require a second look. 

Intuitively,  if  fishing  mortality  is  lowered,  then  fish  are  going  to 
die  of  something  else,  we  call  that  natural  mortality.  If  we  are  as-
suming  that  every  stock  has  a  constant  natural  mortality  and  it 
doesn’t  change,  then  that  is  something  we  might  want  to  take  an-
other look at. 

In  order  to  compensate  for  reduced  fishing  effort  and  constant 
natural  mortality,  some  other  explanation  must  be  considered  to 
make  the  models  work.  That  explanation  apparently  assumes  sig-
nificant  additional  discards.  Based  on  private  conversations  with 
employees  at  the  Science  Center  and  in  Silver  Spring,  I  find  this 
assumption  to  be  widely  held.  To  my  knowledge,  although  our  re-
corded  and  estimated  discards  are  significant  and  point  to  a  se-
verely  mismanaged  fishery,  they  are  also  accounted  for  as  part  of 
fishing mortality. 

In  order  to  account  for  the  discrepancies  in  the  model,  consider-
able additional unobserved discards have to be assumed. When the 
fishing  industry  offers  that  kind  of  information,  it  is  usually  re-
ferred to as ‘‘anecdotal.’’ 

Both  the  monkfish  and  scallop  fisheries  perform  their  own  sur-
veys and assessments and use these to effectively manage their in-
dustries.  In  both  cases,  stock  assessments  improved  compared  to 
NOAA assessments, and both stocks seem to be well managed with 
concurrent NOAA and industry assessment and oversight. 

The  groundfish  industry  was  able  to  afford  to  hire  Dr.  Doug 
Butterworth to assess the Gulf of Maine cod and hake. He was able 
to change the cod assessment by showing it was significantly larger 
than the original GARM assessment. He made some impact on the 
hake  assessment  as  well.  Where  would  the  other  19  stocks  be  if 
fishermen could have afforded to pay him to do the rest? 

The Canadian DFO assessed the eastern Georges Bank cod stock 
using  the  same  data  that  we  used  and  concluded  there  was  twice 
as  many  cod  as  the  U.S.  assessment  found.  This,  of  course,  has 
caused  problems  with  the  transboundary  resource  sharing  agree-
ment. 

In  my  opinion,  there  is  also  several  key  pieces  of  information 
that we continue to do without. What is the actual size of the fleet 
in  1988  versus  what  exists  today?  That  information  is  there  but 
has never been tabulated and compared. 

I did get the impression that what exists today is assumed to be 
equally  powerful  as  what  existed  in  1998  because  of  advances  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

technology.  Again,  that  is  a  big  assumption,  and  I  would  be  much 
happier  to  see  that  actually  investigated.  We  need  more  than  as-
sumptions  here.  Without  an  accurate  accounting  of  how  much  ef-
fort  really  has  disappeared,  we  can  never  accurately  understand 
how  much  effort  has  actually  been  reduced  and  apply  the  correct 
adjustments we need to manage this fishery. 

What  is  the  total  biomass  today  versus  what  existed  in  1988? 
What  is  the  carrying  capacity  of  the  ecosystem?  Are  there  better 
assessment  models  we  could  be  using?  And  of  course,  how  much 
more can the industry take before we go out of business? 

I think the real problem is that we are using tools not suited for 
the job we are trying to accomplish. Dr. Brian Rothschild, professor 
of  marine  science  at  UMass  Dartmouth,  points  to  the  overfishing 
definitions  as  sometimes  arbitrary  and  overly  precise.  Not  a  prob-
lem  until  you  remember  that  once  we  cross  them,  we  have  to  act 
or we get sued. 

If  we  continue  to  accept  the  term  ‘‘best  available  science’’  as  a 
placeholder  for  staying  the  course  in  spite  of  correctable  short-
comings, then it doesn’t matter what tools are placed in our fishery 
management  toolbox.  Without  refinements  in  our  scientific  ap-
proach,  we  will  be  back  here  4  years  from  now,  crying  about  the 
failure of catch shares, LAPPs, and the like. 

Listening  to  some  of  the  scientific  advice  given  to  the  Council, 
one  could  easily,  but  incorrectly,  assume  that  each  stock  lives  in  a 
near  vacuum  and  is  minimally  affected  by  another.  Similarly,  we 
manage  the  same  way,  with  a  hammer.  It  is  no  wonder  we  failed 
to  catch  our  haddock  TAC  and  discard  more  cod,  haddock,  and 
yellowtails than we actually land from eastern Georges Bank. 

The  Magnuson-Stevens  Act  mandates  we  use  the  best  available 
science.  To  me,  that  means  using  stock  assessment  models  best 
suited  for  a  given  fishery  and  including  actual  facts  about  fishing 
power, discards, biomass, and economic viability over assumptions. 
The  every  species  at  optimum  yield  approach  of  Magnuson  com-
pletes  the  problem  puzzle.  In  a  recent  article  of  National  Fisher-
man,  Neil  Stopay  writes  that  while  effort  and  landings  have  de-
creased,  relative  total  biomass  in  the  Gulf  of  Maine  and  Georges 
Bank, as indicated by the trawl surveys, is now close to those seen 
in the 1980s. Yet we continue to cut effort. 

And  Mr.  Cunningham  said  the  same  thing,  and  when  I  was  vis-
iting with Paul Rago. If you just read the report, it looks bad until 
you  realize  that  all  these  stocks  are  moving  in  the  right  direction. 
And  effort  has  been  cut  severely,  but  all  we  can  think  to  do  is  cut 
it some more. So it is time to really think about that. 

The problem is we have an ecosystem that was once depleted and 
is  fast  returning  to  the  past  total  biomass  levels,  but  it  is  out  of 
balance. Dogfish, haddock, redfish are at historic levels. No one has 
ever  seen,  according  to  the  assessment,  as  many  haddock  as  we 
have in the ocean right now, and the dogfish stock is considered to 
be  60  percent  larger.  And  yet  other  stocks  aren’t  coming  back  in 
the same kind of balance. 

Well, it is entirely possible that some stocks are thriving in part 
at the expense of others. And when viewed in this light, the situa-
tion becomes more understandable. The problem is the fishery, sci-
entific,  and  regulatory  tools  we  have  aren’t  the  right  ones  for  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

job.  It  is  no  surprise  to  me  that  science  is  problematic.  Fishery 
management doesn’t work, and we are always getting sued. 

Thanks for your time. 
Senator  SNOWE.  Yes,  we  appreciate  that.  And  I  appreciate  your 
comments.  I  think  they  are  very  well  said,  and  that  is  one  of  the 
big  challenges  is  obviously  avoiding  what  Dr.  Balsiger  talks  about 
on the legal issues. But also what we have got to recognize is focus-
ing on the best science possible. 

I mean, I agree with you. I think that has been the source of our 
problem,  and  the  final  analysis  is  that  we  have  got  to  decide—we 
have  got  to  make  the  investments  in  the  research  that  gives  con-
fidence  to  the  fishing  industry  that  we  are  making  these  decisions 
based  on  the  best  science  available.  And  that  is  one  of  the  issues 
that I think would be even helpful to hear any of the panelists. 

Anybody  have  any  ideas  about  what  we  should  do  to  focus  our 

efforts? Yes, Mr. Odlin? Jim? 

Mr.  JAMES ODLIN.  Yes,  I  have  one  important  one,  and  I  think 
that  we  need  to  have  industry-based  surveys  side  by  side  with 
these Northeast Science Center surveys. That would do two things. 
It would take away the argument of catchability. It would give you 
the—make  sure  that  the  surveys  are  getting  a  good  cross-section 
of  the  year  classes,  put  scientists  on  the  fishing  boats.  The  survey 
ship  does  a  tow,  and  the  fishing  boat  is  there  doing  the  same  tow. 
It also will build confidence and give the industry the confidence 
it  needs  to  go  forward.  It  was  done  in  monkfish,  done  in  scallops. 
It needs to be done in multispecies groundfish. 

Thank you. 
Senator SNOWE. Yes, we have—yes, Dr. Holland? I think we cer-
tainly have to have continuity. This has been a longstanding issue, 
and  somehow  we  have  got  to  resolve  it.  I  would  agree.  Thank  you. 

Dr. Holland? 
Dr.  HOLLAND.  Yes,  no  matter  how  much  we  invest  in  stock  as-
sessments and surveys, there is still going to be a lot of uncertainty 
in stock assessments. Even the best stock assessments anywhere in 
the world have high degree of uncertainty. 

And  one  way  to  deal  with  that  or  to  try  to  deal  with  that  is  to 
use something called management strategy evaluations or manage-
ment  procedures,  which  are  you  design  rules  and  you  test  them 
with  simulations,  computer  simulations  to  come  up  with  rules  for 
changing total allowable catch over time that are robust to that un-
certainty and that directly try and meet objectives like keeping the 
TAC stable over time. 

And  that  is  an  area  I  think  that  it  would  be  wise  to  invest  in. 
I  know  that  there  is  interest  in  doing  that  at  the  Science  Center, 
but  a  lack  of  resources  to  do  that.  But  I  think  they  are  moving  in 
that direction. 

Senator SNOWE. Is that something that—yes? Yes, go ahead, Mr. 

Mr.  LIBBY.  Yes,  I  think  it  is  important  to  consider  that  I  know 
there  is  a  lot  of  talk  about  science,  and  there  is—I  have  some 
issues with some of it, like the pollock, for example. We couldn’t get 
away from the things all summer. 

But  it  is  important  to  consider  an  area  component,  too,  because 
there  are  vast  stretches  along  the  coast  of  Maine  where  there 

Libby. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

hasn’t been anything for a long time. So it is not just totally an as-
sessment  problem  that  is  hurting  the  industry  in  Maine.  It  is  the 
lack of fish. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you. 
Thank you. Yes? Oh, yes. Then I have to move on because there 

are so many others. 

Mr. GERENCER. I think it is interesting that there is considerable 
uncertainty  in  any  assessment,  but  we  have  little  uncertainty  of 
what we have to do once an assessment is actually delivered. 

Thank you. 
Senator  SNOWE.  Thank  you.  And  I  appreciate  that.  I  think  that 
is  something  that  we  certainly  have  to  look  at  and  do  something 
about. 

STATEMENT OF EDWARD BRADLEY, PRESIDENT AND 

MANAGER, VESSEL SERVICES, INC. 

Mr. BRADLEY. Good afternoon, Senator. 
Senator SNOWE. Good afternoon. 
Mr.  BRADLEY.  My  name  is  Ed  Bradley.  Senator,  I  can’t  think  of 
any  elected  official  who  has  done  more  for  the  groundfish  sector, 
the  industry  in  Maine  in  the  last  30  years.  So  thank  you  for  this, 
and thank you for your continued attention. 

Senator SNOWE. You mean I was here 30 years ago? 
[Laughter.] 
Mr. BRADLEY. Started. I have only been here 30 years. 
Senator SNOWE. Thank you. 
Mr.  BRADLEY.  I  am  here  representing  Vessel  Services.  I  am  the 
president.  I  am,  unfortunately,  currently  the  manager.  Since  May, 
I  have  gotten  a  close  look  at  the  microeconomics  of  the  groundfish 
fishery in a way that I had never fully appreciated before. 

And if we are talking about what is really going on on the water-
front—and  I  will  limit  it  to  Portland  because  that  is  truly  all  I 
know about—I checked our numbers before I came here so I would 
have  something  quantitative  to  say.  And  in  the  last  3  years,  we 
have had a 40 percent reduction in the gallons of fuel and the tons 
of ice we have sold to fishing vessels in the State of Maine. 

There  is  no  question  from  the  perspective  of  this  canary  that 
there  is  danger  in  the  mine,  that  the  collapse  is  imminent,  and 
whether we can survive the next spate of regulations I don’t think 
is  an  issue  for  us.  If  it  continues  to  go  the  10  or  15  percent  reduc-
tion  that  we  are  experiencing  without  the  next  set  of  reductions, 
were  they  to  occur  and  were  they  to  affect  Maine  vessels  the  way 
they  have  been  affecting  them  in  the  past,  then  a  critical  point  or 
component of the infrastructure in Portland will disappear. 

Two  or  3  years  ago,  I  was  a  member  of  the  fisheries  task  force 
that the Governor set up, and we dealt with all the issues affecting 
the groundfish fishery. To me, it is a little bit amazing that we are 
here asking what can we do when the groundfish industry has an-
swered that with 30 recommendations if you don’t take care of lob-
ster, but one if you do. 

And  I  know  nobody  wants  to  talk  about  it,  but  vessels  have  left 
Portland,  have  left  Maine  in  a  disproportionate  rate  because—in 
large part because of that issue. If you can’t deal with it politically, 
nobody can, and I understand you can’t, then you have to deal with 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

the  other  recommendations  that  would  support  the  groundfish  in-
dustry. 

They  didn’t  cost  $109  million  for  monitoring.  They  cost  $3  mil-
lion,  and  they  ran  the  gamut  from  things  like  subsidize  the  fuel 
tax,  take  care  of  permit  acquisition  in  the  State  of  Maine  so  that 
we don’t lose the right to the resources it recovers to Massachusetts 
and other states that are doing it. 

None of these things have been done by the State or by the Fed-
eral  Government.  So  we  are  essentially  an  industry  on  our  own, 
you  know,  subject  to  the  regulatory  process  that  you  have  all 
talked  about  in  great  depth.  But  economically,  there  is  very  little 
attention  being  paid  to  what  is  actually  happening  other  than  to 
say  it  is  a  disaster  and  to  what  specific  economic  steps  could  be 
taken  to  hold  the  fort  so  the  industry  is  here  still  when  the  thing 
turns. 

So my first recommendation would be get all these people who— 
at  the  Federal  level,  the  State  level,  and  in  the  industry  together, 
take  a  look  at  those  groundfish  task  force  recommendations,  ask 
which  ones  make  sense?  Which  ones  could  we  implement  in  this 
crisis situation to make sure that the industry stays? 

Senator SNOWE. Good point. 
Mr.  BRADLEY.  Unfortunately,  in  my  old  life,  I  was  a  lawyer.  So 
my ears were just ringing when I heard all the conversation about 
the  law.  And  if  you  are  looking  not  at  the  small  issues,  the  man-
agement  issues  that  are  in  front  here,  this  gentleman,  Mr. 
Balsiger,  is  absolutely  right.  I  mean,  he  has  no  choice  but  to  do 
what the courts have told him that that law says he has to do. 

So  if  he  can’t  make  in  good  faith  or  his  legal  staff  can’t  in  good 
faith  make  the  determination  that  Magnuson  permits  more  than 
the  18  percent—or  less  than  his  determination  the  18  percent  the 
Council has developed, then he is stuck. So, again, with an idea of 
hopefulness, what could be done? 

Well,  and  my  question  is  if  we  can  get  $700  billion  in  about  a 
week to bail out Wall Street, can’t we get a Senate resolution that 
authorizes  in  an  interim  period  the  National  Marine  Fisheries 
Service  to  adopt,  as  you  say,  this  publicly  developed  and  confident 
recommendation for an 18 percent or less reduction to get us to the 
point  where  all  of  these  great  ideas  that  these  people  are  coming 
up with can be implemented? 

I  know  I  am  taking  a  lot  of  time.  I  want  to  say  one  more  thing. 
This  year,  Vessel  Services  was  presented  with  a  lot  of  concerns 
raised  by  a  number  of  people  in  this  room  in  the  Maine  industry, 
and they have suggested that once you get beyond the basic deter-
mination as to what is MSY, what is the mortality, how many days 
at  sea,  the  basic  conservation  recommendations,  there  is  a  huge 
range  of  discretion  that  gets  exercised  with  respect  to  the  indi-
vidual rules. 

And that cumulatively over a period of 10 years, those rules have 
been adopted in a way that disadvantages Maine fishermen, Maine 
groundfishermen.  And  as  a  result,  our  attrition  has  been  greater 
than the attrition of other groundfish vessels in other states. 

I  thought  that  was  an  interesting  idea.  I  didn’t  know  whether  it 

was true or not. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

56 

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  what  are  the  reasons  why  it  is  dispropor-

tionate here in Maine? 

Mr. BRADLEY. The suggestion from the industry was that as you 
adopt rules and regulations to implement the conservation require-
ments that are set by Magnuson, those that are—you can’t change 
because the law says you can’t. But you have a lot of discretion as 
to what rules you use to implement them. And that over a long pe-
riod  of  time,  rules  have  been  adopted  to  disadvantage  the  Maine 
fleet. 

We  looked  at  three  different  specifics,  and  I  don’t  want  to  get 
into  it  because  it  is  technical  and  legal.  But  the  determination  of 
independent  counsel,  public  counsel—not  us—was  that,  yes,  you 
can look at the record of the Council and see over a period of time 
that  the  rules  that  have  been  adopted  have  disadvantaged  the 
Maine  fleet  and  put  them  in  a  situation  where  they  can’t  compete 
with Massachusetts and New Hampshire. 

And  there  are  a  lot  of  reasons  for  that.  I  don’t  say  that  they  are 
evil.  But  it  is  a  fact.  And  so,  all  I  would  suggest  is  we  go  forward 
and we talk about the things that are going to change this process, 
which  are  really  allocation  issues.  Once  you  start  talking  about 
area management, when you start talking about sectors, when you 
start  talking  about  almost  any  rule  within  the  confines,  you  are 
talking about who gets the pie. 

And  given  the  fact  that  Maine  has  been  disadvantaged,  as  dem-
onstrated  by  the  current  situation,  that  everybody  pay  close  atten-
tion to the fact that we have been. You are starting with Maine un-
derwater,  and  as  you  adopt  rules,  make  sure  we  don’t  go  further 
underwater.  When  you  adopt  the  rules,  you  have  discretion  to 
adopt within the range of discretion you are given. 

So thank you for the hearing. 
Senator SNOWE. That was very helpful. I thank you. On all those 

issues, very helpful. 

And  I  think  it  just  illustrates  the  problem  you  are  talking 
about—40  percent  less  in  fuel,  40  percent  less  in  ice.  I  mean,  it  is 
just  the  breadth  of  the  problem  that  we  are  experiencing  right 
here,  which  is  certainly,  I  think,  stark.  And  we  recognize  it,  and 
we have got to do something to turn it around. 

I  think  the  real  question  is,  is  how  do  you  get  this  process  that 
seems  to  be  consolidated  in  a  very  short  period  of  time,  very  little 
time  to  review  the  assessments,  the  stock  assessments  that  were 
given back in August of, what, you are saying like a week for 1,000 
pages. Much of which, I think, is an indication that it is an unreal-
istic timetable, time-frame to make these very difficult, intractable 
decisions because they are irreversible. I mean, certainly the impli-
cations  and  the  consequences  are  irreversible  once  they  are  im-
posed. 

And  if  Dr.  Balsiger,  as  he  said,  is  constrained  by  the  legalities 
in  upholding  the  law,  and  obviously,  it  is  up  to  one  lawyer’s  inter-
pretation  versus  another.  But  in  the  final  analysis,  you  end  up  in 
court. I mean, so much of what we have done has been determined 
by  the  courts  in  the  final  analysis.  It  has  been  one  of  our  greatest 
sources of frustration, and we have just got to figure it out. 

I  am  just  thinking  about  2010.  Well,  we  are  here  doing  the  in-
terim,  how  are  we  going  to  get  to  this  2010  with  an  alternative 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

management process and all that that requires is what I am think-
ing.  I  am  sure  you  are  all  thinking  it  because  you  are  there.  But 
how are we going to put that together? 

It  is  a  very  difficult  process,  to  say  the  least.  And  I  just  don’t 
know  that  there  has  been  any  room  for  flexibility.  There  may  be 
flexibility  somewhere  in  that  law,  but  it  doesn’t  seem  like  the  way 
in  which  it  has  been  implemented  that  it  is.  But  the  rules,  that  is 
an interesting point. 

Mr. BRADLEY. Thank you for listening. 
Senator SNOWE. Thank you. 
OK. Next? Number three. I am sorry. It is number three. We will 

move faster. That is right. 

STATEMENT OF CYRUS HAMLIN, AUTHOR, PRELIMINARY 

DESIGN OF BOATS AND SHIPS 

Mr.  HAMLIN.  My  name  is  Cyrus  Hamlin.  I  am  a  naval  architect. 
I  came  to  Maine  in  1939  to  work  for  Henry  Hinckley.  I  have  been 
here ever since. 

Although  my  specialty  is  naval  architecture,  about  a  half  of  my 
time  has  been  spent  in  fisheries  matters,  both  in  this  country  and 
in various countries around the world. 

Are you getting the signal OK? 
And  for  a  time,  I  was  involved  with—I  had  a  corporation  called 
Ocean  Research  Corporation,  which  did  several  things.  Among 
them,  it  was  the—did  the  layout  for  the  fish  pier  here,  which  we 
worked with Parsons Brinkerhoff, and I think at the time that fish 
pier  was  built,  it  was  the  best  in  the  country.  I  don’t  think  there 
was  anything  like  it.  And  it  saddens  me  to  see  it  ignored  by  such 
low throughputs of fish. 

I am here because about 3 years ago, I began to question the fact 
that  so  little  progress  was  being  made  by  the  Magnuson-Stevens 
Act and the bureaucracy that it spawned. And it seemed to me that 
with  generations  of  the  fish  being  around  3  or  4  years  that  in  30 
years,  there  should  have  been  considerably  more  progress  than 
there has been. 

So  I  have  spent  3  years  examining  the  Magnuson-Stevens  bill 
and  the  present  bureaucracy,  which  is  trying  to  carry  out  its  dic-
tates,  its  mandate.  Oddly  enough,  the  first  problem  I  ran  into  was 
that  there  is  no  name  for  this  huge  project,  which  is  extending— 
I  don’t  know  how  many  people  know,  but  there  is  a  4.5  million 
square  miles  contained  in  our  EEZ  along  with  the  shore.  We  have 
to manage that. That is part of the management process. 

So the name is a small one, but a small item here. If people have 
the  handout,  I  left  a  few  of  them  around.  It  has  nine  items  in  it, 
which I will briefly go through, if that is OK? 

Senator  SNOWE.  Yes,  just  not  too  long  because  I  have  got  so 

many people. So if you can go through it quickly, yes, please. 

Mr. HAMLIN. It will be quite short. 
Senator SNOWE. OK, thank you. 
Mr. HAMLIN. The first item is that it has no name. It should have 
a  name.  It  should  have  something  like  ‘‘New  Deal’’  or  ‘‘Manhattan 
Project.’’ 

There  is  no  clear-cut  statement  of  goals  and  purposes.  There  is 
one  in  the  published  book,  but  it  doesn’t  go  far  enough.  It  doesn’t 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

specifically cover all the areas in which this important work should 
be aimed. 

There are no baselines or specific goals established. There are no 
numbers,  no  quantification.  There  are  no—they  say  this  stock  is 
improving  or  this  stock  is  not  improving,  or  it  is  not  as  big  as  it 
was  in  1996  or  it  is  bigger  than  it  was  in  1996.  Those  are  really 
not very useful ways to describe progress or lack of it. 

Leadership is required. There is, so far as I know, not one person 
who  is  in  charge  of  this  or  one  person  that  we  would  recognize. 
How  many  in  this  room  would  know  who  the  leader  was  of  this 
whole  big  venture?  Maybe  there  isn’t  one  leader.  Maybe  it  is  just 
an  amalgam  of  all  these  small  efforts.  It  seems  to  be  very  ineffi-
cient. 

Governors are important. The governors, we must not forget that 
all  the  people  in  the  State  own  the  resources.  These  are  common 
resources.  The  governor  is,  therefore,  the  one  who  should  be  inti-
mately  involved  in  all  negotiations,  all  work  such  as  this  being 
done here. 

Maintaining  the  fishing  industry  is  a  big  one  that  has  been 
touched  on  here.  We  are  going  to  have—we  have  had  and  we  will 
have  more  downtime  of  the  fishing  industry.  What  do  you  do  with 
these? Do you just sell everything off? Do you get rid of it? Do you 
get rid of the industry? 

It  has  been  pointed  out  this  is  one  of  the  oldest  manufacturing 
industries  in  the  country.  It  is  the  oldest,  as  a  matter  of  fact.  So 
there  has  to  be  something  done  to  keep  fishing  vessels  and  their 
infrastructure  viable,  to  keep  them  going,  so  that  when  the  fish 
come  back  to  the  levels  of,  let  us  say,  1900  that  there  will  be  a 
structure  there,  both  the  infrastructure  on  shore  and  the  vessels 
and gear required to catch them. 

The council’s makeup should be improved. It should include some 
private  citizens  who  are  not  otherwise  associated  with  the  fishing 
industry.  I  think  the  Council  has  done  a  very  fine  job,  but  I  think 
it is focused in such a way that it does not include the actual own-
ers of the resource. 

In  Maine,  when  there  are  a  million  pounds  of  sea  urchins,  one 
pound  of  that  belongs  to  me.  And  one  pound  belongs  to  the  potato 
farmer and so forth. That should not be forgotten. Because they are 
the ones who issue the licenses to the fishermen. 

A  major  flaw  is  to  increase  the  use  of  graphics  in  all  the  work 
that this nameless body does. They turn out loads of texts, reports. 
Reading  one  of  those,  reading  anything  from  the  Federal  Register, 
it  is  very  difficult  to  make  any  sense  of  it  without  some  kind  of 
graphics. 

In  this  handout  of  mine—I  think  there  are  a  few  out  there— 
there  is  a  graph  here.  Nobody  else  got  one  of  these?  There  is  a 
graph  here,  which  shows  the  progress  of  fishing  after  World  War 
II,  and  this  is  important  to  know  how  this  all  came  about.  This 
starts  down  here.  This,  by  the  way,  this  line  across  here  is  the 
maximum sustainable yield curve. It is not—who knows whether it 
is accurate or not, but it would be somewhere in there. 

So  the  Canadian  and  the  United  States  fishermen  went 
gangbusters  after  the  war  and  caught  fish  very  busily.  And  they 
got up and pretty soon they started having the foreign vessels come 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

in  and  help  them  catch  the  fish  so  that  we  have  this  one  curve 
here,  which  shows  the  catch  by  the  Canadian  and  United  States 
vessels, and then the foreign vessels added onto that. I don’t know 
if those quantities are anywhere near right, but it is close enough. 
It shows what happened. 

And  right  there,  where  that  crosses  the  maximum  sustainable 
yield curve, is a vital point because from that point on, all the fish 
caught are coming out of the brood stock. And what happens when 
they  come  out  of  the  brood  stock?  The  egg  supply  is  smaller.  They 
do  not  reconstitute  the  resource  so  that  your  maximum—the  num-
ber of fish drops, declines. So that it is very important for the fish-
ermen to be stopped when they get to that point and level out their 
fishing  effort  so  that  they  stay  below  that  maximum  sustainable 
yield. 

This  is  obviously  an  idealized  version.  This  goes  up  and  down 
like  that.  Excuse  me.  But  the  principle  is  the  same.  You  can’t  ex-
ceed  the  maximum  sustainable  yield  and  maintain  a  sustainable 
industry. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Excuse  me.  I  am  going  to  have  to  move  on  be-
cause I have got so many other people that want to talk. One more 
point? OK. 

Mr. HAMLIN. I have one more. 
Senator  SNOWE.  Yes,  and  we  are  glad  to  have  a  copy  of  that  as 

well. 

Mr.  HAMLIN.  Yes.  I  would  like  to—one  more  point  is,  where  am 
I? One more point is I think that the—I would like to relate a brief 
story to you, which you are all familiar with. 

During  World  War  II,  Franklin  Roosevelt  was  told  about  the 
atom  bomb.  And  he  was  told  that  if  he  didn’t  get  it  quickly,  Ger-
many  would  have  it  first,  and  we  would  lose  the  war.  So  being  a 
man  of  action,  he  set  it  up,  and  he  set  it  up  within  the  Beltway 
in the Washington style. 

And after a short while, he realized that at that rate of progress, 
they were going to lose. So that he cut that off and set up the Man-
hattan Project, which was a semi-military operation under General 
Groves. It was probably the biggest and most complicated and most 
sophisticated  industrial  effort  this  country  ever  undertook.  And  in 
3 years, General Groves was able to drop 2 bombs on Japan. 

Our  fisheries  are  in  this  State  now.  We  should  be  treating  fish-
eries  as  something  that  is  more  urgent  than  having  the  typical 
Beltway of doing it. 

Thank you very much. 
Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  thank  you.  And  I  appreciate  your  com-
ments,  and  I  hope  to  have  a  copy  of  your  paper.  OK,  thank  you. 
Mr.  HAMLIN.  Yes,  I  have  some  copies  here.  Incidentally,  this  is 
my full report of what I have been doing, and there are a few cop-
ies  here  I  have.  And  I  will  be—if  somebody,  anybody  leaves  their 
name, I will be—— 

Senator SNOWE. Well, thank you very much. 

STATEMENT OF CRAIG PENDELTON, FORMER COORDINATING 
DIRECTOR,  NORTHWEST  ATLANTIC  MARINE  ALLIANCE 
(NAMA); OWNER, F/V OCEAN SPRAY 
Mr. PENDLETON. Good afternoon, Senator Snowe. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

60 

I  am  Craig  Pendleton,  and  I  am  from  Saco.  I  came  here  to  talk 
to you today because of my friendship and my deep respect for you. 
I  came  here  today  to  testify  as  a  casualty.  I  currently  am  under 
contract  to  sell  my  permit,  and  I  have  four  individuals  looking  to 
buy my boat. 

I  will  be  the  last  Pendleton  fishing  out  of  Saco.  And  while  that 
may  not  be  economically  important,  from  a  heritage  point  of  view, 
it is a big deal. 

My  business  has  been  regulated  down  to  a  small  window  of  op-
portunity.  During  that  window  of  opportunity,  we  faced  mediocre 
prices.  Forty  cents  for  pollock  is  near  criminal.  My  48  days  were 
actually 24 days because my backyard is in the middle of the 2-for- 
1 area. 

Add  that  to  the  high  cost  of  doing  business,  where  fuel  prices 
rose to $4.68 a gallon at our fuel facility, and low inventories in the 
repair  shops  actually  caused  us  to  lose  more  valuable  time  every 
time  we  have  a  breakdown.  At  the  end  of  the  day,  there  was  no 
money.  My  family  and  I  got  tired  of  living  one  breakdown  away 
from a disaster. 

And similar to some of the symptoms the current economic crisis 
in front of us has, I had no confidence to invest in more equipment 
for  other  fisheries  or  my  own  fishery.  I  am  not  allowed  to  operate 
at a deficit like some of the big banks. 

One  of  the  things  I  wanted  to  talk  to  you  about  today,  as  I 
worked  closely  with  your  staff  and  Congressman  Allen’s  staff  dur-
ing the reauthorization, one of the things we talked about a lot was 
accountability.  That  seems  to  have  turned  into  accountability 
measures  for  fishermen.  I  just  wanted  to  remind  you  that  a  lot  of 
the discussions were around accountability to the agency and to the 
managers. 

This  is  not  a  one-sided  equation.  It  is  not  only  my  fault  that 
there aren’t any fish. In a recent letter that I sent and is probably 
the  last  letter  I  sent,  I  actually  asked  for  resignations  of  some  of 
the managers. No longer should it just be us. 

Ultimately, I did not agree with the way management was head-
ed, and my efforts over 20 years had far more losses than victories. 
And  so,  I  have  chosen  to  leave.  I  couldn’t  wait  for  a  buyback.  I 
couldn’t  wait  for  a  disaster  declaration.  And  hopefully,  some  day 
this  profession  will  be  turned  back  to  being  the  honorable  profes-
sion that it used to be. 

Thank you. 
Senator  SNOWE.  I  deeply  regret  that  you  are  a  casualty  of  all 
this,  and  I  want  to  say  because  I  know  you  have  been  so  hard- 
working,  as  I  have  known  you  over  the  years  and  about  your  fam-
ily’s generations. It is truly a tragedy that you are at this point and 
having  to  make  that  decision,  given  the  circumstances  of  the 
groundfishery today. 

Yes? 

STATEMENT OF JENNIFER LITTERAL, DIRECTOR, 

MARINE PROGRAMS, ISLAND INSTITUTE 

Ms. LITTERAL. Thank you, Senator Snowe. Jennifer Litteral from 

the Island Institute. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

61 

I think you really put your finger on the pulse of this today that 
it  is  very  overwhelming.  Which  piece  do  you  tackle?  Do  you  tackle 
the interim action or the plans for 2010 or the transition packages? 
And it is really all of it. 

I  really  commend  you  for  recognizing  what  happened  at  the  re-
cent  council  meeting.  That  decision,  seeing  it  firsthand,  was  very 
surprising  to  know  that  not  only  the  Council  was  in  support  of  it, 
but  behind  the  scenes  as  well,  the  industry  and  other  interest 
groups that were there. 

And  a  credit  to  the  Council,  in  addition  to  that,  for  being  able 
to balance that tightrope between rebuilding the goals of the stocks 
in addition to working with the fishing communities. 

The thing I wanted to highlight was that not to get stuck in this 
band-aid  year,  and  I  do  not  mean  to  slight  that  term  for  the  2009 
fishing year, but we really hope that this 2009 fishing year doesn’t 
turn  into  a  band-aid  year  for  2010  because  that  will  be  even  more 
devastating. 

We  are  moving  toward  output  management.  Sectors  is  just  one 
of those that the Council is and just recently, last week, has moved 
forward.  I  know  that  looking  at  the  uniqueness  of  Maine,  sectors 
may  not  be  the  only  output  management  that  is  going  to  suit  ev-
erybody  in  Maine.  It  is  the  first  one  coming  up  the  dock,  and  it  is 
ready to be implemented in 2010. But it is a big transition, and we 
are  going  to  need  help  with  the  transition,  transition  packages, 
transition assistance. 

And I just wanted to leave it with bringing it back to Maine and 
our  ports.  And  I  think  it  is  really  a  critical  thing  that  the  gen-
tleman from Vessel Services highlighted the loss of people in Maine 
not  only  due  to  lobsters,  but  I  think  that  looking  at  other  states 
and why is it it is so enticing, outside of the lobster realm, for fish-
ermen to move to a different state or to fish in a different state and 
land there? 

What is it that we can bring them back with and keep them here 
and  keep  them  viable?  The  fuel  tax  is  a  perfect  example.  We  had 
that  up  until  July  of  this  year.  How  do  we  find  money  to  bring 
things  like  that  back?  And  again,  additionally,  supporting,  having 
permits available to keep fishing in Maine. 

And I just thank you for all of your support. 
Senator  SNOWE.  I  appreciate  that.  And  thank  you  very  much. 

Great suggestions. 

Who’s next? That’s six? 

STATEMENT OF TERRY ALEXANDER, 
FISHERMAN AND OWNER, F/V JOCKA 

Mr. ALEXANDER. Hi, I am Terry Alexander from Cundys Harbor. 

I am a fisherman. 

tion directly? 

I have a question for Dr. Balsiger. Is that OK to ask him a ques-

Senator SNOWE. Yes. 
Mr.  ALEXANDER.  When  you  are  talking  about  the  interim  meas-
ures  and  you  are  talking  about  implementing  new  ones,  are  you 
talking  about  basing  those  measures  on  the  old  numbers  or  the 
newly defined overfished fish? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

62 

Dr.  BALSIGER.  I  am  not  certain  where  we  are  in  that  process.  I 
think  that  we  have  to  adopt  a  new  status  of  stocks  document.  So 
I  think  that  we  have  framed  it.  We  are  looking  at  the  new  over-
fishing definitions that we are going to have to live with. 

Mr.  ALEXANDER.  But  according  to  the  law,  the  Council  actually 
has  a  year  to  develop  a  plan  on  the  new  stock.  So  you  would  have 
to  basically  base  it  on  the  old—old  defined  overfishing  stocks?  Am 
I correct in that or—— 

Dr.  BALSIGER.  There  may  be  a  nuance  here  that  I  am  missing, 
but  I  would  be  more  than  happy  to  get  back  to  you  on  very  short 
notice  to  say  what  we  are  doing  in  that.  I  don’t  want  to  misspeak 
just now. 

Mr. ALEXANDER. OK. All right, thank you. 
Senator  SNOWE.  We  will  get  the  name  and  address  so  that  you 

can respond to him. Yes, thank you. 

Go ahead, number seven. 

STATEMENT OF JOHN WILLIAMSON, MANAGER, 

FISH CONSERVATION, NEW ENGLAND OCEAN CONSERVANCY 
Mr.  WILLIAMSON.  I  think  I  am  next.  This  is  John  Williamson 
with  the  Ocean  Conservancy,  and  I  am  speaking  also  as  a  former 
fisherman,  9  years  as  a  council  member,  now  working  for  an  envi-
ronmental organization. 

I attended portions of the GARM III meeting over a couple of dif-
ferent  sessions.  It  was  very  impressive,  a  total  of  20  meeting  days 
over  a  10-month  period,  dozens  of  top  section  scientists  from 
around  the  world,  working  on  various  aspects  of  the  plan.  I  talked 
to people in the Ocean Conservancy’s Fish Conservation Team from 
around the country. We have never seen anything like it anywhere 
in this country. 

It was very impressive. It was unprecedented, and there is every 
reason  we  should  have  faith  that  it  is  the  best  science  that  can  be 
available for managing groundfish at this point. 

The science is not our problem here. It is how we use the science. 
I  think  Dan  Holland  made  a  very  good  point  in  that  the  task  of 
fishery management, the challenge for fishery management is man-
aging  risk.  It  is  managing  the  inevitable  uncertainty,  the  inherent 
uncertainty in the data. 

And so, it falls to management to make the science work, to use 
the science and make it work for the fishing communities. And un-
fortunately, we have seen groundfish play out as a tragedy over 20 
years. It is just that—and that responsibility falls to management. 
We have some of the best science in the country here in the North-
east  for  managing.  But  managers  are  human,  and  we  have  made 
mistakes over the years. 

For  all  the  communities,  fishing  communities,  groundfish  com-
munities  in  the  region  have  suffered  from  groundfish  management 
as  the  way  it  has  played  out  over  the  20-year  period.  Geographic, 
economic,  ecological  reasons—the  burden  seems  to  have  fallen  dis-
proportionately heavily on the Maine groundfish communities. 

I think if we were looking at this in retrospect and we would say 
that 20 years ago, at least in the early 1990s when the overfishing 
problem  first  was  identified,  if  the  Council  had  taken  decisive  ac-
tion  then,  we  wouldn’t  be  talking  about  the  loss  of  Maine  ground-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

63 

fish  communities  now.  The  burden  would  have  been  much  more 
equally  shared  because  the  history  of  groundfish  fishing  in  times 
of  abundance  would  have  been  the  history  that  you  would  have 
been managing around. 

Instead,  depletion  has  settled  heavily  on  these  Maine  commu-
nities. And you know, Glen Libby has identified that problem in his 
testimony this afternoon. And that depletion is what has gradually 
over the years compounded and used up his resources, used up peo-
ple’s  borrowing  power  and  has  compounded  the  problem  of  dealing 
with the loss of fishing opportunity to the point where people have 
simply dropped out of the business. 

The  longer  we  delay  groundfish  rebuilding,  the  more  likely  that 
management  is  going  to  continue  to  select  against  Maine  fishing 
communities.  Ocean  Conservancy  supports  staying  the  course  on 
rebuilding for this reason. We do recognize that there are some im-
provements  in  biomass  that  we  are  seeing  in  the  numbers,  and 
that is not—but that is not a reason to back off of a strong rebuild-
ing program. 

We  support  NMFS’s  strong  interim  action  this  coming  fishing 
year.  I  was  at  the  Fishery  Management  Council  meeting  last 
month when the Council requested interim action and put forward 
an  industry-developed  plan  built  around  an  18  percent  cut  in  days 
at  sea.  I  wanted  to  support  that  plan  because  it  was  an  industry 
plan, but there were some obvious faults with it. 

The one is that it was a long way from tackling overfishing, and 
at  this  point,  in  the  law,  that  is  illegal.  We  have  to  address  over-
fishing. We have to eliminate it. 

And two, even if there was a technical loophole to be followed to 
get  through  that  for  2009,  the—falling  that  far  short  in  taking  ac-
tion  in  2009  would  compound  the  challenge  for  managers  in  2010. 
Compound it to the point where to address the overfishing problem 
in  2010  would  probably  mean  that  any  action  the  Council  took 
would  be  a  virtual  shutdown  of  the  fishery  certainly  in  southern 
New England and very possibly in the Gulf of Maine. 

That  has  to  be  avoided.  The  way  to  avoid  that  is  to  take  strong 
interim  action  in  2009,  and  that  responsibility  is  now  on  the  serv-
ice. 

I  will  say  that  one  of  the  mistakes  I  think  that  has  been  made 
in the past is that in attempting to do a rebuilding program, it was 
not  also  a  requirement—there  was  a  requirement  for  rebuilding 
stocks.  It  is  a  biological  requirement.  The  managers  did  not  have 
the same mandate required to—for a rebuilding program for the in-
dustry as well. 

So  when  Amendment  13  was  done,  it  was  an  attempt  to  rebuild 
stocks, but there was not a commensurate plan for rebuilding com-
munities,  for  distributing  the  rebuilding  of—the  biological  benefits 
of  rebuilding  and  designating  to  whom  those  benefits  would  flow. 
What I see happening now is the development of sectors, programs 
for  catch  shares,  and  other  possible  programs  are  an  after-the-fact 
attempt to deal with this economic distribution of these benefits. 

And  for  that  reason,  I  think  there  is  a  need  to  make  an  invest-
ment.  The  costs  that  have  been  identified  for  monitoring  and  for 
administration  are  going  to  be  substantial,  the  startup  costs  to 
make  the  transition,  and  I  think  that  that  is  something  that  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

64 

Senator  could  be  very  constructive  in  helping  to  address.  Ocean 
Conservancy  pledges  to  work  with  your  office  and  other  organiza-
tions to make that happen as well. 

Thank you. 
Senator SNOWE. How do you maintain a viable industry, though, 
if the measures are so drastic? I mean, for example, you are saying 
very strong interim measures—— 

Mr.  WILLIAMSON.  How  do  you  maintain  a  viable  industry  if  peo-
ple’s resources have been completely exhausted? The longer we pro-
long  rebuilding  this  resource,  the  less  likelihood  that  the  people 
that are in it now will make it through to the end. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Do  we  have  to  paint  a  broad  brush  with  all  of 

the stock? For those that had been rebuilt? 

Mr.  WILLIAMSON.  I  think  there  are  some  real  deficits  in  the 
groundfish  plan’s  use  of  days  at  sea  that  have  created  this—that 
have  exacerbated  this  management  for  the  weakest  stock.  I  think 
it  is  very  difficult  for  people  to  take  advantage  of  the  stocks  that 
are  now  strongly  rebuilding,  the  few  that  are  strongly  rebuilding, 
such as haddock. But in the end, Georges Bank cod is at 12 percent 
of its target biomass, and we are in danger of losing that stock. 

So  making  that  balancing  act  happen  effectively  under  days  at 
sea  has  proven  to  be  an  insurmountable  challenge  for  managers 
using  the  days  at  sea  system.  Now  it  is  very  possible  that  there 
may  be  other  systems  other  than  days  at  sea  that  could  facilitate 
access to haddock. But unfortunately, that is not on the books right 
now. 

Senator SNOWE. OK. Thank you. 
Any questions, anybody? No? 
Number eight? All right. Number nine. 

STATEMENT  OF  SEAN  MAHONEY,  VICE  PRESIDENT  AND 
DIRECTOR,  MAINE  ADVOCACY  CENTER,  CONSERVATION 
LAW FOUNDATION 
Mr. MAHONEY. Good afternoon, Senator Snowe. My name is Sean 
Mahoney. I am from Falmouth, Maine, and I am Vice President of 
the  Conservation  Law  Foundation,  which  is  often  the  proverbial 
skunk  in  the  woodpile  when  it  comes  to  the  legal  compliance  con-
versations we have been having earlier today. 

But I am here today to talk about our focus on sustainable man-
agement of the resource. I think one thing that is important to rec-
ognize  is  we  are  here  today  because  the  resource  was  fished  too 
hard historically. We are not here because of a regulatory problem. 
The basic fact is that we fished the resource too hard, and we need 
to rebuild the resource. 

There  is  no  dispute  that  the  current  days-at-sea  system  is  bro-
ken.  It  is  the  worst-case  scenario  for  fishermen  because  it—in 
terms  of  the  economics  and  in  terms  of  the  safety,  and  it  is  worst 
case for the resource, particularly the failure to address the critical 
issues of bycatch and discards. 

As  Glen  Libby  and  Craig  Pendleton  talked  about  earlier,  chal-
lenging  the  science  of  the  GARM  won’t  change  that  reality.  Even 
if  the  current  days-at-sea  system  doesn’t  change  at  all  and  we  are 
left  with  48  days  or  24  days,  depending  on  where  you  fish,  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

65 

groundfish industry, particularly here in Maine, will still be in cri-
sis mode. So we need to do something. 

I  am  not  really  sure  what  to  do  about  the  interim  measures.  It 
is  a  problem.  The  Magnuson-Stevens  Act  was  recently  reauthor-
ized. Everybody in this room was part of that process, and the law 
is what the law is unless Congress chooses to change it. 

But I think our focus should be on 2010 because we can’t put off 
changing the regulatory system for Amendment 17, which is antici-
pated but undefined. We have to look at the new management pro-
posals  that  are  being  tested  by  the  Midcoast  Fishermen’s  Associa-
tion, or put out there by Ms. McGee’s organization, or the research 
that Dr. Holland has been doing, supports. 

But we cannot put off a new direct management structure as op-
posed to the indirect method that hasn’t worked. If we do put it off, 
then  I  predict  if  we  have  an  Amendment  17  that  deals  with  this, 
we are going to be in this room again in 3 or 4 years dealing with 
the  same  issues,  but  likely  with  fewer  groundfishermen  who  still 
have a stake in the industry and with little to show for it in terms 
of resource protection. 

So  we  would  strongly  urge  that  the  focus  be  on  how  we  revise 
the management structure, and the Council is making a good start 
on that, and we would urge the Congressional delegation to support 
that. 

Senator  SNOWE.  I  think  the  real  issue  is  not  having  sort  of  an 
either/or. No one is saying abandon the process. We understand we 
have  to  live  by  the  laws,  and  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Act  does  de-
pend on interpretations of how you implement it, frankly. Whether 
or  not  there  is  flexibility  in  how  you  go  about  it  so  that  you  don’t 
ultimately affect an industry that has no ability to survive. 

I  mean,  we  want  to  preserve  an  industry  so  that  they  are  there 
on  the  other  side  of  this  regulatory  process  at  some  point,  but  you 
are  going  to  maintain  their  viability  in  some  way  because,  other-
wise,  then  it  makes  it  virtually  impossible  for  its  survival.  And  I 
think that is the question. 

Year  to  year,  they  are  working  right  now,  month  to  month,  day 
to  day,  on  the  margins.  I  mean,  you  heard  what  Craig  Pendleton 
spoke  to  earlier.  That  is  a  very  weighty,  mighty  decision  to  have 
made  when  you  have  been  doing  it  for  generations  in  a  family.  So 
these  are  people  on  the  margin.  So  what  is  it  that  we  can  do?  So 
we  think  of  outside  of  the  box  within  the  wall.  It  is  just—I  think 
that is the issue here. 

And  to  get  over  the  hump  of  the  interim  measure  to  get  to  2010 
for  Amendment  16,  I  think  that  is  the  issue.  Do  you  have  to  treat 
every  stock  similarly  under  the  law?  I  don’t  know.  We  know  that 
Dr. Balsiger is going to work on that process and so on. But if you 
say have it the most stringent process possible, irrespective of what 
it does, the law doesn’t say that. The law says you have got to take 
into account the socioeconomic effects, too. 

Mr. MAHONEY. I agree. 
Senator  SNOWE.  Which  has  gotten  the  short  end  of  the  stick 
these days. And for many years now this has been one of my major 
arguments, OK? So we talk about the past and the overfishing and 
so  on,  the  point  is  we  can’t  discard  the  industry.  I  mean,  that  is 
it. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

66 

We  have  got  to  do  something  to  preserve  the  industry.  In  the 
meantime, what can we do? What is that bridge that makes it pos-
sible? And I don’t think we have lived up to our obligation to offset 
those  issues  in  terms  of  what  the  adverse  consequences  have  been 
and will be. 

Mr. MAHONEY. One of the things that we would urge is that, and 
I  think  Dr.  Holland  noted  it,  that  any  sort  of  assessment  of  a  re-
source  this  large  has  inherent  weaknesses  to  it.  And  the  focus  on 
challenging  the  science  underlying  the  GARM  takes  some  of  the 
focus away from the issues that you are concerned with and we are 
concerned with, which is bridging that 2009 and getting to a man-
agement structure that works for everyone. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Yes.  Yes,  well,  it  is  interesting  about  that  be-
cause on the science question, from my experience in working with 
the  industry  and  with  the  men  and  women  in  the  fishing  commu-
nity,  you  have  got  to  have  confidence  in  what  is  being  imposed  on 
you  and  what  it  is  exacting  from  your  industry,  which  has  been  a 
way of life and a livelihood. So you have to have confidence in that 
science. 

So I see it as a building block and a foundation in order to accept 
what the hardship will be or what the regulation is going to be that 
represents  and  imposes  some  serious  restrictions  on  their  way  of 
life and their livelihood. That is the point. 

So  you  have  got  to  build  the  confidence,  and  that  is  something 
that  we  have  not  been  as  successful  as  we  should  be.  I  have  been 
one  who  has  advocated  that  we  really  should  devote  far  more  re-
sources  to  the  research  and  to  make  sure  that  we  preserve  that.  I 
mean,  that  is  really  a  jewel  in  this  process,  if  the  fishermen  can 
have any confidence at all in what the outcome will be. 

We  have  got  to  build  it.  That  is  our  responsibility,  frankly.  So 
when  the  questions  are  raised  about  the  assessments,  I  think  it  is 
because they do see it. So you have to treat it as a reality and fig-
ure  out,  OK,  what  can  we  do  better  so  that  it  doesn’t  undermine 
their confidence? 

I  understand  what  you  are  saying.  I  think  we  are  all  there.  It 
is just in a different way and, at the same time, preserving this in-
dustry so that they are there. One year is a lifetime for this indus-
try right now because they are operating on the margin. 

So Craig Pendleton wouldn’t be making the decision he did, when 
you are not operating on the margins and given all the other extra-
neous  costs  he  has  that  are  huge  when  it  comes  to  fuel,  for  exam-
ple.  And  it  is  just  that  alone  or  bait  or  whatever  the  case  may  be, 
and that is what I have heard. 

So, thank you. 
Mr. MAHONEY. Thank you. 
Senator SNOWE. Thank you. 
OK, who is next? What number are we on? Are we on nine? OK. 

We will move on because I know everybody has a time frame. 

STATEMENT OF SAM VIOLA III, COMMERCIAL FISHERMAN 
Mr.  SAM VIOLA.  Thank  you  for  coming  and  for  letting  me  speak. 
Senator SNOWE. Yes, thank you. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

67 

Mr.  SAM VIOLA.  Sam  Viola,  commercial  fisherman  out  of  Port-
land, 30 years. It is just I have a few things that I want to say that 
some Jimmy mentioned before. 

We  need  some  kind  of  time  schedule,  not  just  a  2-year  plan  or 
a  60-day  plan  or  30-day  plan.  Every  time  we  turn  around,  it  is 
something  new  we  have  to  do.  We  have  to  jump  through  another 
hoop. We never know what the next hoop is going to be. 

When  you  came  out  with  the  regulations  for  the  whale  protec-
tion, to protect the whales, the large tankers in the shipping indus-
try,  it  was  a  5-year  plan.  We  don’t  have  any  of  that.  We  don’t— 
don’t we get any kind of consideration for that ourselves? 

And  the  other  was  what  Ed  Bradley  touched  on.  Everything 
seems to be stacked against the State of Maine in the National Ma-
rine  Fisheries  Service.  42  20’  and  below,  fishing  down  there,  we 
lost  our  steaming  time.  We  lost  our  dock  to  go  down  off  the  cape 
and steam from Portland down to Cape Cod and go fishing. 

Now we have to actually return into a port to change your clock, 
even  though  we  are  monitored.  They  can  tell  exactly  what  we  are 
doing  every  minute  of  the  day,  whether  we  are  steaming,  whether 
we  are  fishing,  or  what  is  going  on  with  the  monitors  we  have  on 
the boats. 

Senator SNOWE. But you had to return to port? 
Mr. SAM VIOLA. Pardon me? 
Senator SNOWE. You have to return to port? 
Mr.  SAM VIOLA.  We  have  to  return  to  port.  If  we  want  to  go  to 
another  area,  we  not  only  have  to  return  to  port,  we  have  to  re-
quest for an observer to go into these areas where the big haddock 
concentrations are 3 days in advance. 

So if my brother is fishing down on Georges, calls me up, the way 
we  traditionally  fish,  and  says,  ‘‘Hey,  I  am  getting  10,000  pounds 
of  haddock  every  tow.’’  I  can’t  just  steam  down  there  and  catch 
those  haddock.  I  have  to  return  to  port,  call  for  an  observer,  wait 
3 days, and then I can go if I get an observer. 

I  mean,  this  is  National  Marine  Fisheries  Service.  They  are  not 
helping us to even get by with what we are doing today. And it just 
seems  to  be  them  against  the  fishermen,  and  one  of  the  enforce-
ment  agents  told  me  that  you  are  guilty.  We  can  see  that  you  are 
guilty  with  the  black  box.  If  you  are  steaming  across  an  area  or 
anything,  they  don’t  like  the  way  it  looks,  you  have  to  prove  your-
self innocent before they will accept it. 

It  is  just  they  seem  to  be  very  antagonistic  toward  fishermen.  I 

don’t know why that is. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Yes,  Dr.  Balsiger,  is  there  a  way  of  correcting 
some  of  these  issues  or  making  it  more  efficient  and  less  arduous 
and bureaucratic? 

Mr. SAM VIOLA. I don’t know what you are looking for when you 
need  an  observer  on  these  trips,  every  trip,  and  you  have  10,000 
of them in the Gulf of Maine. 

Dr. BALSIGER. Well, we aren’t against fishermen. Without fisher-
men, we actually don’t have a job. So we are in favor of having the 
fishermen there and having them, an ability to prosecute their live-
lihood economically. 

We  have  check-in  and  checkout  requirements  and  observer  re-
quirements that are at all the different councils that are developed 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

68 

with good reasons. And of course, some of those good reasons cause 
problems  for  fishermen,  and  we  should  look  at  those  if  they  do.  I 
am not saying we can fix this, but we will look at it. 

I  am  sure  the  3-day  requirement  for  an  observer  is  based  on  a 
good  reason.  There  may  be  some  way  we  can  work  around  it.  I 
don’t know, but we will look at that. 

Senator SNOWE. I appreciate that. We will look into that. 
Thank you. 

STATEMENT OF MAGGIE RAYMOND, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

ASSOCIATED FISHERIES OF MAINE 

Ms.  RAYMOND.  Good  afternoon,  Senator  Snowe.  Thank  you  for 

holding this hearing. 

I am Maggie Raymond. I am the Executive Director of Associated 
Fisheries  of  Maine.  I  was  not  going  to  speak  today  because  as  Mr. 
Odlin  told  you,  he  is  speaking  for  Associated  Fisheries  of  Maine 
today.  But  I  heard  an  overwhelming  theme  in  some  of  the  testi-
mony  from  some  of  the  people  on  the  panel  as  well  as  some  of  the 
people  in  the  audience,  which  is  that  days  at  sea  is  a  failure,  de-
spite the fact that all our stocks are growing and fishing mortality 
is  the  lowest  it  has  been  in  30  years,  and  that  somehow  if  we  can 
just get through 2009, we will get the magic bullet of sectors. 

And  I  am  not  convinced  that  sectors  are  the  magic  bullet,  and 
the  reason  is  because  I  don’t  think  sectors  are  going  to  solve  some 
of  the  problems  like  the  one  that  Mr.  Odlin  explained  with  witch 
flounder,  where  3  years  ago,  the  assessment  said  it  was  rebuilt. 
The  industry  caught  a  third  of  the  TAC,  and  yet  now  it  is  consid-
ered overfished, and overfishing is occurring. 

Also,  today,  we  have—since  2004,  we  do  have  three  stocks  that 
are  controlled  by  hard  TACs—Georges  Bank  cod,  haddock,  and 
yellowtail.  In  2005,  the  industry  caught  the  Georges  Bank 
yellowtail TAC for the first time under a hard TAC, and next year 
it  was  determined  to  be  overfished,  and  overfishing  was  occurring. 
It did not exceed the hard TAC. They achieved it for the first time 
in many years. 

We have not reached the haddock. We reached just a very small 
fraction  of  the  haddock  hard  TAC,  and  it  is  because  the  cod  TAC 
shuts the fishery down before we can achieve the haddock TAC. 

So sectors are going to have those same problems. Every species 
will then be under a hard TAC, and it is not going to be any easier 
to  catch  the  haddock  TAC  because  you  are  still  going  to  be  con-
trolled by the hard TAC of Georges Bank cod. 

On top of that, sectors impose an enormous cost on the industry, 
which  is  why  Associated  Fisheries  of  Maine  2  years  ago  submitted 
a  comprehensive  ITQ  proposal  for  the  Council,  which  the  Council 
had to abandon because of the referendum requirement, which they 
decided  would  be  too  stringent  to  try  to  impose.  But  Dr.  Holland 
talked  about  the  cost  of  sectors,  $10  million  to  $15  million  a  year 
just for the monitoring on a fishery that grosses less than $100 mil-
lion. 

That  is  something  that  the  industry  cannot  absorb  at  this  time. 
ITQs, I believe, would be a lot less expensive because there is a cap 
on how much can be charged for those. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

69 

So  I  just  want  to  make  it  clear  that  2010,  we  may  still  be  in  a 
lot of the problems that we are in today because I am not convinced 
that  the  industry  is  going  to  be  able  to  afford  sector  management. 
On top of the monitoring requirements, you have to pay for a sector 
manager. You have to develop an environmental assessment. All of 
those are very costly that the industry cannot afford right now. 

We  also  put  forward—the  Associated  Fisheries  of  Maine  put  for-
ward  an  industry-funded  buyout  proposal,  which  we  have  asked 
you  and  other  Congresspeople  to  support.  I  understand  that  there 
are  some  people  who  don’t  want  to  pay  back  the  fee,  but  what  is 
the  alternative?  To  go  out  of  business  slowly,  painfully,  or  to  per-
haps  be  able  to  pay  a  fixed  fee  that  you  know  what  it  is  going  to 
be  and  it  depends  on  how  much  fish  you  catch  and  to  be  able  to 
stay  in  business?  We  think  that  that  is  a  proposal  that  needs  to 
go forward. 

In  other  parts  of  the  country  where  the  industry  has  funded 
buyouts, they have prospered in a very short amount of time. Their 
TACs have increased. Their days at sea have increased. Their catch 
has  increased.  And  they  have  been  able  to  pay  back  that  funding. 
So  if  you  are  not  going  to  put  forward  the  industry-funded  pro-
posal, then Congress needs to come up with the money themselves 
because  there  is  no  other  choice.  People  are  going  out  of  business. 
The industry is consolidating. People with money are buying up ev-
erything,  and  people  who  don’t  have  that  money  are  not  able  to 
compete. 

So those are the points that I wanted to stress today. And again, 

thank you very much for your time. We appreciate it. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Thank  you.  Thank  you,  Maggie,  very  helpful. 

Thank you. 

STATEMENT OF MATTHEW THOMPSON, FISHERMAN AND 

LOBSTERMAN, F/V STRIKER 

Mr.  THOMPSON.  My  name  is  Matthew  Thompson,  and  I  am  a 
groundfisherman  and  a  lobsterman,  and  I  hail  from  Monhegan  Is-
land. And I have got three things that I think are pretty important. 
One  is  I  think  the  buyback  is  something  that  ought  to  happen, 
but  I  think  that  if  this  country  can  round  up  $700  billion  to  bail 
out a few banks, it can come up with some money to bail out some 
groundfishermen. 

I  think  we  have  got  a  resource,  the  dogfish  in  the  ocean,  that  is 
an  elephant  in  the  room.  Nobody  wants  to  talk  about  it.  I  don’t 
know how fish can live in between the dogfish. And we are not al-
lowed to catch any of them. 

And  that  brings  us  to  the  third  thing  with  the  National  Marine 
Fisheries  Service.  I  think  the  whole  science  behind  the  National 
Marine  Fisheries  Service  and  the  accountability  is  a  complete  fail-
ure.  I  think  if  we  can’t  make  a  boat  payment,  somebody  doesn’t 
come down and give us a peer review and set us up at another fish-
ery. We lose the boat. 

And  I  don’t—who  gets  spoken  to  in  the  National  Marine  Fish-
eries  Service?  I  mean,  this  guy,  he  can’t  answer  one  question  in 
five that you ask him. It really bothers me. 

And  it  is  the  same  thing  with  this  VMS  problem.  I  live  on 
Monhegan Island. I have got a VMS that says I live—I am outside 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

70 

the  VMS  line.  They  think  I  am  fishing  when  my  boat  is  home  on 
the mooring and I am lying in bed. I have called the National Ma-
rine  Fisheries  Service  I  don’t  know  how  many  times  to  move  the 
VMS  line,  move  it  3  or  4  miles  down  below  the  island  where  it 
ought to be. Nobody calls me back. Nobody—— 

Senator SNOWE. Who have you called? 
Mr. THOMPSON. National Marine Fisheries Service. 
Senator SNOWE. In where? Boston? 
Mr. THOMPSON. Gloucester, Massachusetts. 
Senator SNOWE. In Gloucester. OK. 
Mr.  THOMPSON.  So  I  would  like  to  see  some  accountability  is 

what I would like to see. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  I  can  understand  your  frustration.  If  you 

are not getting any returned calls. So, Dr. Balsiger, I think—— 

Mr.  THOMPSON.  Well,  if  someone  would  call  you  back  and  say, 

‘‘Well, we are working or we are trying to——’’ 

Senator SNOWE. No, well, no, you deserve to have a response and 
action.  Dr.  Balsiger,  could  you—is  that  something  you  could  follow 
up with and for—— 

Dr. BALSIGER. Yes. I am sorry I don’t have the answer right now. 
We  have  the  ability  to  generate  the  answers.  I  don’t  have  them.  If 
you  have  a  question  about  halibut  in  Alaska,  I  bet  I  can  get  it, 
though. 

Mr. THOMPSON. Well, thanks a lot. I appreciate you——— 
Senator  Snowe:  No,  I  think  we  need  to—we  are  going  to  get  in-
formation from you, sir? Yes. We will get his address? OK. Yes, we 
have got your address. We will follow up with you. 

Dr.  BALSIGER.  And  if  you  have  contacts  with  our  people  in 

Gloucester, we will cross link that and find out. 

Mr. THOMPSON. All right. 
Senator  SNOWE.  Absolutely.  Absolutely.  You  should  have—you 

should not go through that. I am sorry. 

Mr. THOMPSON. All right. Thank you very much. 
Senator SNOWE. Yes. No, I am sorry that you are, frankly. 

STATEMENT OF ANGELO CIOCCA, PRESIDENT, 

NOVA SEAFOODS LTD. 

Mr.  CIOCCA.  Good  afternoon,  Senator  Snowe.  And  thank  you  for 
finding  the  time  to  come  to  Portland  today  and  hold  this  hearing. 
My  name  is  Angelo  Ciocca,  president  of  Nova  Seafoods  here  in 
Portland and a local boat owner. 

This afternoon, you have heard much about the proposed interim 
measures  and  how  these  measures  could  seriously  damage  our  in-
dustry  or  will  seriously  damage  our  industry,  I  should  say.  I  am 
concerned  about  how  the  incomplete  results  of  the  GARM  III  will 
be  used  against  the  industry,  and  I  do  believe  the  GARM  III  re-
sults were incomplete. 

Also how one man, Dr. Butterworth, and his small staff halfway 
around the world, on a very tight budget and a short period of time 
was  able  to  redirect  the  Northeast  Science  Center’s  viewpoint  on 
two critical species here in the northeast. This, after our scientists 
at  the  Science  Center  have  spent  countless  hours  and  months  pre-
paring  a  model  which  has  proven  to  be 
flawed  by  Mr. 
Butterworth—by  Dr.  Butterworth,  like  I  said,  in  a  very  short  pe-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

71 

riod of time on a very tight financial budget. I personally, as a cit-
izen of the United States, find that appalling. 

Instead,  I  am  asking  you  to  consider  the  fact  that  the  way  the 
survey  data  is  collected  is  seriously  flawed.  I  believe  we  need  to 
hire  the  highliners  of  our  fleet,  place  scientists  and  observers  on 
the  commercial  fishing  boats,  and  allow  this  group  to  do  our  sur-
veys. 

Mr. Odlin recommended a side by side, which I guess is OK. But 
I really believe that our boats should be doing the surveys with the 
scientists  and  the  observers  onboard  to  get  a  real  feel  for  what  is 
out there, a true feel for what is out there. 

If this approach is taken and implemented properly, there should 
be no doubt about the survey results, which these days we have all 
kinds  of  doubt  about  the  survey  results  and  have  for  years  and 
years and years. This would simplify that problem, that issue, and 
would save us countless millions of dollars a year at the same time. 
Now  the  hard  part,  though.  If  we  agree  to  let  the  commercial 
fishermen  do  the  surveys,  what  do  we  do  with  the  good  survey 
data? Because that will be good survey data. 

The  models  need  to  be  thoroughly  tested  by  an  international 
group of fishery scientists who have modeling experience in a fish-
ery  similar  to  ours.  In-depth  discussions  must  be  conducted  with 
respect to the variables which impact the fisheries, such as changes 
in  natural  mortality  for  different  species  that  can’t  happen  on  a 
yearly basis and probably do happen on a yearly basis, water tem-
peratures, et cetera, et cetera. 

So  what  I  am  saying  there  is  that  it  should  not  just  be  the 
Science  Center.  And  I  know  we  have  had  peer  reviews  and  sci-
entists from different countries come and help with the GARM III. 
But  as  Mr.  Odlin  said,  I  believe  there  was  one  scientist,  the  lead 
scientist  was  the  only  scientist  that  sat—as  far  as  peer  reviewers, 
that  sat  in  on  all  the  meetings,  which  I  find  disturbing,  and  why 
that would happen is beyond me. 

And  we  need—as  far  as  the  scientists  are  concerned  that  are 
going  to  be  hired  for  this  work,  we  need  the  best  of  the  best  to  do 
this  work.  It  has  been  too  long.  We  have  been  getting  bad  science 
for  too,  too  long.  It  is  time  to  hire  the  best  of  the  best  out  there, 
the most dedicated scientists we can possibly hire. 

They  must  work  in  concert  with  the  industry  every  step  of  the 
way. The man who spends his life on the water has a different kind 
of  knowledge  than  the  scientist.  The  fisherman  must  be  fully  en-
gaged  in  the  process  from  beginning  to  end.  This  is  crunch  time. 
There  is  no  tomorrow  for  the  Maine  industry,  the  Maine  fishery. 
As  you  are,  I  am  sure,  aware,  Senator  Snowe,  the  chaos  we  are 
experiencing  right  now  with  the  meltdown  on  Wall  Street  is  pri-
marily  caused  because  of  a  faulty  modeling  system  designed  by 
Wall  Street  Ph.D.s.  They  are  just  realizing  that  when  it  comes  to 
modeling—this  is  the  Wall  Street  Ph.D.s  are  just  realizing  that 
when  it  comes  to  modeling,  a  relatively  small,  but  early  mistake 
entered into the model can or will produce a large error on the out-
come. 

However, it is too late for businesses and tens of millions of peo-
ple  worldwide  who  have  been  irreparably  harmed  through  these 
bad  decisions.  We  who  work  in  all  aspects  of  the  fishing  industry 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

72 

believe  we  have  been  living  the  same  type  of  mistake  in  our  fish-
ery. Senator, it is time to correct this process before the fishery im-
plodes like Wall Street did. 

Of course, the Science Center, National Marine Fisheries Service, 
and  certain  other  groups  will  claim  that  their  models  mostly  work 
fine,  except,  of  course,  for  the  two  that  Dr.  Butterworth  had  the 
time and funding to examine. He found flaws in both of them, and 
the Science Center agreed with his conclusions. 

We  have  had  some  discussion  about  Magnuson-Stevens  Act.  The 
Magnuson-Stevens  Act  as  written  today  cannot  work  and  does  not 
work. It needs to be changed for the industry to survive. That also, 
the  models  as  designed  and  used  are  not  working.  I  mean,  sci-
entists  can  say  that  these  things  are  the  best  available  science. 
They are not working. Our numbers are lower by their estimation, 
which I am not sure I agree with. 

I  believe  we  are  placing  too  much  pressure  and  faith  on  the 
Science  Center  and  the  complex  models  it  has  created.  From  my 
perch,  the  outcome  in  both  cases  is  the  same.  That  is  our  fishery 
and  Wall  Street,  a  disaster,  as  you  mentioned  earlier  this  after-
noon. 

Wall  Street  has  turned  to  the  Treasury,  the  Fed,  and  the  White 

House. Senator, we are turning to you. 

Senator SNOWE. I thank you very much. 
Mr.  CIOCCA.  And  if  I  could  also,  just  during  the  afternoon  here, 

there are a couple other comments that I would like to make? 

Senator SNOWE. Yes. 
Mr.  CIOCCA.  One  thing,  sitting  here  this  afternoon  one  thing 
strikes me is that through the years we have found multiple errors 
coming  out  of  the  National  Marine  Fisheries  Service.  And  as  John 
Williamson said earlier, we are human, right? People make errors. 
Well,  that  we  should  always  keep  in  mind,  OK?  Because  when 
we  get  numbers  thrown  at  us,  as  far  as  biomass  numbers  or  these 
targets,  they  throw  them,  and  then  all  of  a  sudden,  that  is  gospel. 
We forget we make errors, as Mr. Williamson originally stated. 

So  I  mean,  how  could  we  just  input  this  information  into  these 
models  that  are  questionable,  get  numbers  thrown  out,  and  then 
say,  ‘‘hey,  that  is  the  number.  We  know  what  we  are  doing.  That 
is gospel.’’ I mean, it is a faulty—to me, it is a flawed system. 

Mr.  Odlin  has  mentioned  on  the  pollock  that  it  was  peer  re-
viewed  and  then  actually  fishery  staff  found  the  error  after  a  peer 
review.  I  mean,  it  doesn’t  sound  like  good  business  to  me.  But  yet 
we  still  come  back  to  the  table,  and  that  is  what  we  have  to  live 
by. 

And when we have to live by it, the ‘‘we’’ is the industry. Nobody 
else, science they might—a scientist might put his name on it, but 
his  paycheck  comes.  The  industry  is  the  one  who  has  to  live  with 
those final results and gets penalized. There is only one group that 
gets penalized when there is bad work done out of National Marine 
Fisheries  Service.  That  is  the  industry—the  fishing  industry,  the 
shoreside industry. 

One  gentleman  stated  that  we  are  in  this—I  think  I  can’t  re-
member  the  young  gentleman  that  spoke  just  recently,  stated  that 
we  are  in  this  because  we  fished  the  resource  too  hard.  Well,  the 
haddock  stock  that  we  have  today,  which  is  at  historical  levels, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

73 

came out of a severely depleted haddock biomass. So I would really 
like everybody to really think that if we—as human beings, I think 
we know how the ocean works. 

Because  in  that  haddock  resource,  we  had,  if  I  am  not  mis-
taken—Maggie  or  Jimmy  could  help  me—there  was  a  time  not  too 
many  years  ago  when  there  was  a  zero  haddock,  there  was  a  zero 
possession  limit  on  haddock  because  there  were  no  haddock  left  in 
the  ocean  10,  12  years  ago.  Now  there  is  a  biomass  that  is  at  his-
torical levels. Came out of nowheres. 

And the cod will do the same some day, but it won’t do it on our 
terms.  It  will  do  it  on  the  ocean’s  terms.  When  the  cod  does  that, 
very  good  chance  that  the  haddock  is  at  a  much  lower  level.  The 
gentleman from Monhegan Island said it very, very well before. His 
three comments were right on the money. 

Maggie  mentioned  the  yearly  observer  cost,  and  I  believe  the 
yearly observer cost, depending on how you—if it is 100 percent ob-
servers or anything like that, but I think the rates are from $7 mil-
lion to $10 million or $12 million a year? 

Senator SNOWE. Yes. 
Mr.  CIOCCA.  Yes,  a  year.  OK.  And  Maggie  stated  on  a  $100  mil-
lion  fishery.  Senator,  I  believe  this  groundfishery  today  is  about  a 
$60 million fishery. So $7 million to $10 million, $12 million to ob-
serve a $60 million fishery? It is impossible. 

And  this  one  is  for  Dr.  Balsiger.  Jimmy  Odlin  mentioned  some 
numbers  earlier  about  in  Magnuson-Stevens  Act  that  was  a—I 
shouldn’t  say  an  out,  but  it  allowed  National  Marine  Fisheries 
Service  a  little  flexibility  in  reading  the  act,  OK,  by  not  going  to 
the  extreme  of  considering  the  stock  overfished,  but  giving  a  little 
bit of time, a little flexibility in there to allow the regional adminis-
trator to do something less than calling the stock overfished, which, 
in turn, would give a little more leniency to the industry. 

And  Dr.  Balsiger,  and  I  realize  he  is  interim,  but  he  doesn’t 
think  his  attorney  has  looked  at  it.  Well,  I  would  say  that  the  at-
torneys probably should look at that and report that to Pat Kurkul. 
Because if that is going to save this industry this much pain and 
suffering for 12 months, and it is allowed by law, and I would have 
to say that the Congress put it in there for exactly this kind of situ-
ation  when  an  industry  was  possibly  in  a  little  flux  and  needed  a 
little  extra  time,  that  is  what  that  is  there  for.  That  is  what  the 
Congresspeople  who  wrote  the  law  gave  you  guys  the  flexibility  to 
do. 

But  it  sounds  to  me  like  the  National  Marine  Fisheries  Service 
doesn’t  want  to  use  that  flexibility.  Instead,  they  would  rather  go 
to  the  extreme.  And  for  what  reason,  I  don’t  have  a  clue.  But  you 
should look into that. 

Senator SNOWE. We will. 
Mr. CIOCCA. And I think that is it for me. 
Senator SNOWE. Well, thank you very much. 
Mr. CIOCCA. I appreciate your time. 
Senator SNOWE. No, I thank you. And I think your points under-
score  the  fact  how  critical  it  is  to  have  confidence  in  the  science 
and engaging, you know, the men and women, the fishing industry 
as  part  of  that  process  and  having  cooperative  research.  I  mean,  I 
think  that  is  absolutely  right  and  something  that  I  have  been  a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

74 

strong  proponent  of,  and  we  have  got  to  really  try  to  make  this  a 
coherent, comprehensive, sustainable approach. 

So  that  those  of  you  in  the  industry  that  have  to  live  by  these 
rules and regulations can have confidence in the outcome and what 
is  required.  And  right  now,  that  isn’t  the  case,  and  it  is  unfortu-
nate.  And  frankly,  I  just  think  it  is  very  difficult.  I  am  sure  this 
effort  in  GARM,  they  know  a  lot  of  issues  that  have  been  raised 
about  it,  and  the  fact  that  they  are  not  addressing  them,  I  think, 
again erodes confidence in the process and in the outcome. 

And we have just got to do a better job in figuring it out and tak-
ing  more  time  to  evaluate  it,  frankly.  I  mean,  just  my  point  which 
you were mentioned, Ms. McGee, just to evaluate 1,000-page report 
in  a  week  and  the  complexities  involved  in  this  issue.  For  those  of 
you who really understand it certainly appreciate that there are so 
many  complexities  and  dimensions  to  this  question  that  it  really 
takes much more than that. 

And  unfortunately,  time  didn’t  allow  it  for  all  the  reasons  we 
know,  and  that  puts  you  in  an  untenable  situation.  These  are  the 
issues  to  avert  when  I  think  about,  yes,  in  the  2010.  I  mean,  you 
get  in  this  2009,  2010,  but  you  have  to  live  by  these  assessments 
or  that  process  as  well  and  depending  on  what  alternatives  de-
velop. So I appreciate it. 

Mr. CIOCCA. Yes, I agree. It is very, very unfair that a 12-month 
period is going to cause so much pain when it does seem that with-
in  Magnuson-Stevens  there  is  that  little  flexibility  built  in  there 
that  I  would  think  is  to  be  used  for  a  time  like  this  that  will  give 
us that 12 months and let us live, hopefully live compared to time. 

Senator SNOWE. Exactly. Survive it. 
Mr.  CIOCCA.  Another  thing,  too,  is  the—I  mean,  I  am  not  a  sci-
entist, obviously. But I think if you get a scientist and sit down and 
have a cup of coffee with him or something, the numbers that they 
are—that they finally set for biomass targets or the actual biomass, 
I  mean,  they  are  estimates.  I  mean,  we  have  to  realize  that  they 
are estimates. 

Senator SNOWE. Right. 
Mr.  CIOCCA.  They  are  not—no  one  is  counting  every  fish  in  the 

Senator SNOWE. Exactly. 
Mr.  CIOCCA.  And  the  also  very  important  thing  that  I  think  to 
remember  is  that  the  haddock  that  we  are  harvesting  right  now 
was  spawned  from  a  very,  very  low  biomass  number,  which  tells 
me that the ocean is going to do what it wants to do when the time 
is  right  for  it,  and  man  is  not  the  overriding  influence,  especially 
since  natural  mortality  in  many  species  is  killing  more  fish  than 
man  is  killing  today,  which  I  don’t  know  if  you  are  aware  of  that? 

Senator SNOWE. OK. Thank you. Thank you. 

ocean. 

STATEMENT OF AARON DORITY, PROJECT DIRECTOR, 

DOWNEAST INITIATIVE, PENOBSCOT EAST RESOURCE CENTER 
Mr.  DORITY.  Good  afternoon,  Senator  Snowe,  and  thank  you  for 

the opportunity to speak here today. 

My name is Aaron Dority, and I work for the Penobscot East Re-

source Center in Stonington, Maine. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

75 

I  want  to  mention  two  main  points  today.  One  is  our  concern 
with the proposed buyback, and two is the current scale of manage-
ment. 

First, a buyback is not the best way to reduce effort in New Eng-
land’s  groundfish  fishery.  We  have  acknowledged  today  that  we 
have lost numerous fishermen and much of our infrastructure. You 
can  see  that  here  on  the  Portland  waterfront,  and  you  can  see  it 
very clearly in eastern Maine, where I am from. 

You  mention  that  there  was  only  one  fisherman  left  east  of  Pe-
nobscot  Bay.  Even  he  is  no  longer  fishing  this  year  because  it  is 
no longer viable for him to fish. Our concern is that a buyback will 
erode fishing livelihoods even further. However, I acknowledge that 
we  need  to  bring  effort  in  line  with  the  current  groundfish  stocks. 
As  one  example  of  how  to  do  this,  I  strongly  encourage  you  to 
look  to  Port  Clyde  because  they  have  clearly  shown  that  they  can 
make  more  money  with  less  fish.  They  haven’t  asked  fishermen  to 
stop fishing. They have simply fished more sustainably. 

Second,  and  even  more  importantly,  I  encourage  you  to  explore 
area  management  in  this  fishery.  The  basic  premise  of  this  ap-
proach  is  to  bring  the  scale  of  management  in  line  with  the  scale 
of  our  groundfish  stocks.  Since  there  is  strong  evidence  that 
groundfish stocks exist at a finer scale than is currently recognized, 
the area management proposes managing at a finer scale. 

The  benefits  of  this  would  be:  (1)  greater  attention  paid  to  full 
stock  recovery  at  the  local  level;  (2)  attention  paid  to  the  need  to 
preserve the critical coastal shelf, including protection for spawning 
and juvenile fish; and (3) a greater opportunity for fishermen to be 
engaged in the management process so that they may become stew-
ards of the resource and we can look to Maine’s lobster zone council 
as one example of the stewardship. 

Since  there  are  still  many  questions  regarding  fine-scale  stock 
structure of groundfish, the Penobscot East Resource Center is cur-
rently planning a fine-scale groundfish stock workshop in collabora-
tion  with  the  Gulf  of  Maine  Research  Council,  Research  Institute, 
and Maine’s DMR. This will be held on April 2 and 3 at a location 
still to be determined. I will share the details of this workshop with 
your staff, and I encourage you or your staff to attend. 

In  sum,  I  want  to  say  that  area  management  is  an  alternative 
to  sustained  groundfishing  and  rebuild  depleted  stocks  in  New 
England,  but  our  fishery  managers  need  to  give  this  approach  a 
chance.  It  can  work  in  an  output  control  system,  and  it  can  work 
with sectors. 

The  best  way  to  explore  area  management  may  be  through  a 
pilot program. And I know that Port Clyde fishermen would gladly 
try a pilot program. They have already demonstrated that they can 
do  this.  The  remaining  permit  holders  in  eastern  Maine,  all  27  of 
them,  though  none  currently  fish  under  the  restrictive  days-at-sea 
system, they would also be willing to pilot area management. 

We  have  willing  fishermen.  Now  we  need  willing  fisheries  man-

agers. 

Thank you. 
Senator  SNOWE.  Thank  you  very  much.  Appreciate  it.  We  will 

have staff at that session. Thank you. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

76 

OK, who is next? We are on, what, 13, 14? What? Fourteen? No. 
Fifteen? Who is next? Because I know Dr. Balsiger has to leave for 
the airport in 5, 10 minutes. 

STATEMENT OF WILLARD H. VIOLA, COMMERCIAL 

FISHERMAN; PRESIDENT, BLACK BEAUTY, INC. 

Mr.  WILLARD VIOLA.  Hi,  I  am  a  commercial  fisherman,  Willard 

Viola. I have been about 35 years. 

It  seems  like  it  is  just  getting  harder  and  harder  to  operate  all 
the  time.  And  when  you  look  around  this  room  here,  there  are 
more  conservationists,  conservationist  groups,  lawyers,  and  other 
people  than  there  are  fishermen  here.  And  I  thought  the  days-at- 
sea system was working. When it came out in the first place, I in-
vested some money into buying days at sea. And then all of a sud-
den,  a  small  group  of  people  down  off  of  Cape  Cod  started  sectors. 
And I think they are in bed with the conservationist groups, too, 
getting  money  from  them,  able  to  buy  permits  and  stuff.  And  all 
of  a  sudden,  what  they  are  getting  looks  better  than  what  I  have 
because  I  am  working  under  days  at  sea.  And  a  lot  of  people,  like 
if  she  said  Rhode  Island,  she  has  been  to  a  meeting  in  Rhode  Is-
land, and they said the days at sea isn’t working. Well, if I had 48 
days, like most of Rhode Island guys have, I would say the system 
isn’t working, too. 

And so, these people form their sector with the help of one of the 
conservationist  groups,  getting  money  from  them.  So  their  sector 
all of a sudden looks a lot better than my days at sea because they 
can  go  out  fish  in  areas  that  are  closed  to  normal  fishing.  Like  in 
May,  there  is  an  area  closed,  and  all  of  a  sudden,  they  can  go  in 
there  and  fish.  So  I  am  saying,  ‘‘Hey,  I  am  under  days  at  sea.  I 
want  to  be  under  a  sector  because  they  have  got  special  rules  and 
regulations that I don’t have.’’ 

And  all  of  a  sudden,  we  are  going  to  all  go  to  sectors.  The  only 
reason  there  were  17  or  19  sectors  was  they  said  we  are  going  to 
go  to  sectors,  and  if  you  are  not  in  a  sector,  you  are  going  to  be 
left  in  the  common  pool,  which  isn’t  going  to  have  anything.  They 
kind of scare you into the sector thing. 

I  was  doing  fine  in  the  days  at  sea  because  we  bought  permits 
to be able to fish, which I thought was the way to go at that time. 
And  then  it  doesn’t  get  a  chance  to  work  out,  we  are  going  to  go 
to  sectors  because  this  group  here  has  formed  this  sector  down 
there  that  is  working  so  much  better  for  them,  but  it  is  for  them 
because  they  are  being  supported  by  these  other  groups  that  buy 
permits and everything. 

And they get special rights that I don’t think we are going to get. 
When they finally do form the sectors, I don’t think that I am going 
to  be  able  to  fish  in  the  2-for-1  area  with  1-day  or  have  no  rolling 
closures, stuff like that, and be able to land all the cod history you 
have or all the whatever history you have. 

And  I  just  go  to  these  meetings  and  I  see  more  and  more  less 
fishermen  and  everything.  It  is  just  discouraging,  the  whole  thing. 

Senator SNOWE. How long have you been fishing? 
Mr. WILLARD VIOLA. About 35 years. 
Senator SNOWE. Thirty-five years. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

77 

Mr. WILLARD VIOLA. Yes, I used to work at O’Hara’s for 15 years. 
Then I worked for Roger Woodman for 10 years. And finally, I went 
during  the  first  buyback,  I  said,  well,  Roger  was  selling  out  to  the 
Government,  and  I  said,  ‘‘Well,  if  I  don’t  buy  my  own  boat  now,  I 
may  end  up  working  for  somebody  I  don’t  want  to  work  for  or 
something.’’  So  that  is  when  I  bought  my  boat  in  1996.  And  been 
pretty  successful  up  until  now  with  it,  and  it  just  gets  every  move 
you  make,  it  seems  like  they  are  putting  up  a  roadblock  against 
you. 

Like  they  took  away—used  to  be  if  I  was  going  to  fish  Georges, 
I  could  steam  down  off  Nauset,  Cape  Chatham,  clock  in  down 
there.  Like  my  brother  was  saying,  you  can’t  do  that  anymore. 
Asked  why  they  were  doing  it,  you  asked,  call  up  the  VMS  people 
in  Gloucester,  the  law  enforcement  office,  and  they  said,  ‘‘Well, 
don’t ask us. It is the law. They made the law, and we are just en-
forcing it,’’ and stuff like that. 

And  recently,  I  just  installed  an  ice  machine  on  the  boat  to  try 
to  stay  in  business,  have  a  better  product.  I  was  trying  to  sell— 
that is supposed to be how we can get the business back into Maine 
today—and  was  trying  to  sell  at  the  Portland  fish  auction,  but  I 
just wasn’t getting the bids on the fish. 

There  are  not  enough  buyers  there  now  because  so  many  boats 
have left. I think some of the buyers have left. There are more buy-
ers in Gloucester, and so you just have to go there. 

Because  we  would  get  down  to  a  price  for  like  large  haddock 
would go for $1.15, and one of the buyers would jump in there and 
bid  $1.15  on  it  when  I  would  be  better  off  when  they  just  didn’t 
bid.  Because  when  they  do,  I  have  to  scratch,  and  it  costs  8  cents 
to  scratch  that  fish.  I  have  to  pay  their  fee.  And  so,  I  am  thinking 
why did you bid that bid when you know I am going to scratch it? 

And just things like that would help out. 
Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  thank  you  for  sharing  your  experiences 
and sorry for what you are going through. Hopefully, we can avoid 
some of this, and thank you for taking the time for being here and 
testifying. It is really important for all of us to hear it, frankly, be-
cause it is very helpful to us in this process. So we thank you. 

And on the sector management, how is consistency established in 
that?  Is  it  up  to—in  developing  sector  management,  when  he  was 
talking—when  he  was  mentioning  some  of  the  options  and  how  it 
was decided which areas and so on, who makes that decision? How 
is that constructed on a sector management area? 

Mr. STOCKWELL. Sectors are self-selecting, and—— 
Senator SNOWE. You say self-selecting by the industry? 
Mr. STOCKWELL. By the industry members, and there are—— 
Senator SNOWE. I see. 
Mr. STOCKWELL.—no areas attached to them at this point. 
Senator SNOWE. And so, they establish their own rules? 
Mr. STOCKWELL. One of their charges is to develop an operations 

plan, which is then reviewed by the agency. 

Senator SNOWE. I see. I see. Thank you. 
OK, where are we, 16? Seventeen? Sixteen, yes, thank you. 
And  Dr.  Balsiger,  you  feel  free—I  know  you  have  to  leave  for  a 

plane. So feel free. 

Dr. BALSIGER. You must be keeping closer track than me. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

78 

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  I  just  want  to  make  sure  you  don’t  miss 
your  plane  because  I  know  you  adjusted  your  schedule  to  be  here 
today, and I truly appreciate it. And I just want to thank you, and 
we  will  follow  up.  And  I  appreciate  your  staying  to  listen  to  the 
comments that are so critical in this key process. 

Dr. BALSIGER. Senator, this opportunity was good for me, person-

ally and for the agency. So I appreciate the invitation. 

Senator SNOWE. No, I thank you and thank you for being respon-
sive.  And  we  appreciate  it,  and  thank  you  for  taking  the  time  for 
being here because I know you did alter your schedule today to be 
here. Thank you. 

Yes? 

STATEMENT OF BERT JONGERDEN, GENERAL MANAGER, 

PORTLAND FISH EXCHANGE 

Mr. JONGERDEN. Senator Snowe, Members of the Committee, my 
name  is  Bert  Jongerden.  I  am  the  General  Manager  at  the  Port-
land Fish Exchange. 

The fish exchange has been the back-around for commercial fish-
ing  in  the  State  of  Maine  for  the  past  22  years.  Conceived  in  the 
1980s  by  a  partnership  of  the  city  and  the  State,  fishermen,  and 
processors,  the  all-display  fish  auction  has  been  a  wonderful  suc-
cess  until  Amendment  13.  From  1988  to  2005,  the  exchange  aver-
aged over 22 million pounds of groundfish per year coming through 
this port. 

The  economic  benefit  of  that  22  million  pounds  is  over  $90  mil-
lion  into  this  local  economy.  The  landings  created  numerous  sup-
port  industries  for  vessels,  processors,  fuel  and  gear,  gear  shops, 
shipyards,  insurance,  finance,  berthing,  lumping,  trucking,  trans-
portation, packaging, equipment. That is just to name a few. 

Along with all those wages, the Port of Portland had the distinc-
tion  of  being  the  most—handling  the  most  groundfish  in  the  New 
England  States.  After  Amendment  13  in  2005,  the  landings 
dropped  15  percent.  In  2006,  47  percent.  In  2007,  another  11  per-
cent. We have lost over 76 percent of our landings in 4 years. Four 
years. 

We have gotten to a point now where we have reached a critical 
mass  on  the  port  of  Portland.  We  have  one  ice  supplier,  one  fuel 
supplier,  one  hydraulic  gear  yard,  one  electronics  dealer.  We  just 
cannot afford to lose another part of our infrastructure. 

The regulations have dropped our fleet of over 350 vessels in that 
22-year  period  to  70.  Well,  it  is  closer  to  69  with  the  loss  of  Craig 
here.  Along  with  that,  we  are  losing  our  buyer  and  our  processor 
base. All the buyers and processors are moving themselves to Mas-
sachusetts and New Bedford. 

There  is  one  trucking  company  left  in  the  State  of  Maine  that 
brings  fish  from  Portland  to  the  markets.  There  used  to  be  four. 
There  is  just  one  now.  The  processors  now  are  all  sorting  fish  out 
of  New  Bedford,  Gloucester,  and  Canada.  That  is  depressing  the 
prices at the fish exchange. 

I also conservatively estimate that in December of every year, we 
lose  15  fishing  boats  to  the  Gloucester  port.  That  is  over  5  million 
pounds  of  fish  that  we  lose  off  our  docks  down  here.  I  am  very 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

79 

deeply  concerned  that  in  May  of  2009,  with  whatever  interim  ac-
tions they provide, the exchange could possibly close. 

We  are  at  a  critical  mass  of  9  million  pounds  a  year,  where  we 
can barely break even. Any more days in sea reductions, we are not 
going  to  be  around  anymore.  We  lose  the  exchange,  we  are  going 
to  lose  Vessel  Services.  We  are  going  to  lose  our  last  hydraulics 
shop. We are going to lose our whole fish pier complex. 

I  beg  and  I  plead  that  we  not  cut  any  more  days  at  sea.  If  we 

lose our infrastructure here, it is never going to come back. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  those  numbers  are  staggering,  and  I  am 
truly  sorry.  I  mean,  I  think  we  all  are  about  what  is  happening  to 
the Portland Fish Exchange. And you are absolutely right. We need 
to preserve this infrastructure. It is part and parcel of the industry, 
and we need to keep it to preserve the industry, and hopefully, we 
can avert that. 

Mr. JONGERDEN. I appreciate it. 
Senator  SNOWE.  And  that  is  a  very—those  are  very  serious  sta-
tistics, without question. I know the role that the fish exchange has 
played, and it is pivotal. So, thank you. 
Mr. JONGERDEN. We have to survive. 
Senator  SNOWE.  I  appreciate  you  being  here  and  sharing  those 

Seventeen? Eighteen? Anybody else? Yes? Yes, oh, you are 19? Of 

unfortunate statistics. 

course. 

STATEMENT OF CAPTAIN ROBERT M. ODLIN, COMMERCIAL 

FISHERMAN AND OWNER, F/V MAINE LADY III 

Mr.  ROBERT ODLIN.  Thank  you,  Senator  Snowe,  other  distin-

guished guests. 

My  name  is  Robert  Odlin.  I  grew  up  here  in  south  Portland.  I 
now live in Scarborough. I am 39 years old, second-generation com-
mercial fisherman, and I have been participating in State and Fed-
eral fisheries for 25 years. 

I  served  for  10  years  and  still  serve  on  the  State  of  Maine  Sea 
Urchin Zone Council and serve on the Maine Commercial Fish and 
Safety Council. 

I  own  and  operate  two  vessels,  one  of  which  groundfishes,  and 
my  access  to  the  Federal  fishery  cost  me  $123,000  3  years  ago. 
That  bought  me  a  boat,  bought  me  a  permit.  The  boat  was  pretty 
small.  I  used  to  fill  the  boat  up  in  about  2  days.  So  the  problem 
with not being enough fish I don’t buy. We are catching fish. 

I recently invested another $110,000 in the fishery. I bought an-
other boat. My access to the fishery is 88 days, 88 days I can catch 
fish in Federal waters. Only 48 days is what everybody talks about 
because  those  are  the  A  days.  Those  are  the  days  we  can  target 
cod.  And  we  also  have  B  days,  which  we  can  target  fish,  but  not 
cod. 

Guys  were  talking  about  not  being  able  to  get  clear  of  the  pol-
lock?  Great,  I  can  go  catch  pollock  on  the  B  days.  That  is  a  good 
thing. 

My  intention  was  to  lease  days  this  year  and,  hopefully,  afford 
to  buy  another  permit.  Buying  another  permit,  hopefully,  will  give 
me  more  access  so  I  can  catch  more  fish  and  make  more  money. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

80 

With the sector ghost hanging over our heads, don’t know if buy-
ing another permit is going to be the right move or not. So one per-
mit is not sufficient. A cut in 18 percent on my A days will be two 
less trips. I make short trips. It will be two less trips, and my mar-
gins  are  pretty  small.  You  mentioned  the  margins  right  now,  and 
they are not huge. But we are surviving. 

I  am  not  a  great  speechwriter.  My  speech  was  written  while  I 
was  sitting  upstairs,  and  I  am  kind  of  going  to  jump  around  a  lit-
tle. There are hundreds of square miles of our EEZ that are closed, 
closed  areas.  We  can’t  fish  there.  The  fish  in  those  areas,  I  think, 
thrive.  They  spill  over  into  the  areas.  So  we  fish  along  the  edges, 
and we catch our fish. 

There are so many fewer boats, I fished—well, when I finally got 
my  permit  from  National  Marine  Fisheries,  which  took  a  lot  of 
phone calls and a lot of time, I have seen five boats since July 2nd. 
I  have  fished  about  50  days.  Seen  five  other  boats.  One  was  my 
friend. We fish together. 

The  term  ‘‘ghost  town’’  is  used  to  describe  the  City  of  Portland 
and  the  fishing  industry.  It  used  to  be  a  robust  community.  You 
would  always  know  people,  see  people.  There  were  taverns  you 
could visit and find crewmembers, and it was a good feeling of com-
munity.  But  now  it  is  a  ghost  town,  especially,  like  Bert  said,  in 
December when everybody goes to Gloucester. 

We  are  down  to  70  boats  from  350.  That  alone  right  there  is 
enough to scream there is a problem. If we shrink much more, the 
struggle  will  grow  greater.  The  confusion  we  have  to  deal  with  in 
trying  to  understand  the  regulations  right  now  with  National  Ma-
rine Fisheries is huge. I can’t imagine what more confusion is com-
ing, but it is certainly there. 

Because the fleet has shrunk so much, and a lot of it has shifted 
to Massachusetts, it is almost impossible sometimes to find experi-
enced  crew.  There  are  not  enough  boats  around,  not  enough  crew 
around.  Fuel  is  the  ultimate  enemy,  basically.  It  makes  or  breaks 
you. So when we had a tax relief from the fuel, it was very appre-
ciated. I can’t believe it went away, but it did. 

One  question  is  why  have  my  fellow  groundfishermen,  who  are 
accessing the same resources as me, been given a Government sub-
sidy  and  I  have  got  nothing  from  the  Government  because  I  am  a 
Maine fisherman? There was a time when I thought about moving 
to  Massachusetts.  I  can’t  believe  I  am  saying  that.  If  I  had  done 
it  2  years  ago,  I  would  have  got  about  50,000  bucks.  Instead,  I 
stayed in Maine and paid my taxes. 

With the shrinking of the fishery, less shoreside support. No lob-

ster sales here in Maine, so it is more difficult. 

We  talked  all  about  science,  and  basically,  this  whole  meeting 
was  about  science,  it  seemed  like.  And  the  science  is  not  perfect. 
You know, there are a lot of flaws. There are mistakes. They found 
the  flaws  in  the  science.  It  has  been  brought  to  our  attention.  So 
let us not make us pay for these flaws when you reassess our time 
to fish, let us make sure that those flaws are out in boldface. 

To  stay  in  this  business,  you  need  to  adapt,  travel,  reinvest  in 
days.  You  can’t  just  fish  in  your  backyard  anymore,  you  know?  A 
100-mile  run  is  standard  sometimes.  An  88-day  permit  allows  you 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

81 

to  lease  up  to  88  more  days,  and  you  can  double  your  effort.  It  is 
going to cost you, but you can double your fishing effort. 

So  I  am  going  to  close  now.  We  were  once  overfished.  OK,  a  few 
species  are  still  on  the  overfished  line.  But  I  think  the  fire  is  out. 
I mean, we put the fire out with so many cuts and so many closed 
areas, and we did have buybacks in the past. We shrunk the fleet. 
I  remember  they  were  taking  boats  and  cutting  them  up.  So  don’t 
let us die because of just the ashes that is remaining. 

You  mentioned  the  socioeconomic  effects,  and  that  is  part  of  the 
Magnuson-Stevens  Act  that  needs  to  be  considered.  I  want  to  call 
that the halo over this whole thing. Maybe that can save us. 

Guys mentioned dealing with National Marine Fisheries. Calling 
them  on  the  phone  results  in  recordings  most  of  the  time,  run- 
around,  getting  bounced  from  department  to  department,  voice- 
mails, and very few returned calls. It is very, very frustrating deal-
ing with NMFS down in Gloucester. 

The  dogfish  in  the  Gulf  of  Maine  are  released  in  near  shore 
waters  are  in  a  plague-like  proportion.  There  are  so  many  dogfish, 
you can almost walk on the backs at times. If I could take you out 
fishing  on  my  boat  in  July,  we  will  put  30,000  pounds  of  dogfish 
on  in  a  day.  We  can  keep  600  pounds  for  the  trip  of  dogfish.  We 
can  keep  800  pounds  of  cod  for  the  day.  It  seems  to  be—it  doesn’t 
really seem to be balanced out. 

And I guess that is it for me right now. 
Senator SNOWE. Well, I thank you very much, sharing your expe-
rience and also what you endure and have to overcome and the ob-
stacles,  to  be  resilient  in  the  face  of  all  of  that.  But  I  appreciate 
what you are having to say. 

And  yes,  I  agree  with  you.  Like  Massachusetts,  Maine  ought  to 
be  able  to  have  the  benefit,  and  that  is  something  we  are  going  to 
work  on  in  terms  of  the  appropriations  that  we  have  been  talking 
about and arguing about. And it is not fair. It is a matter of equity. 
It  is  similar  to  what  we  are  talking  about  in  the  disaster  declara-
tion. We absolutely agree with you totally. There is no rationale for 
that. 

Mr.  ROBERT ODLIN.  Do  you  think  we  might  get  a  check  in  the 

near future? 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  SNOWE.  The  ‘‘near’’  is  the—but,  no,  I  hear  you.  I  hear 
what  you  are  saying,  and  you  raise  some  very  valid  points,  and 
that  is  what  it  is  all  about.  We  have  got  to  make  sure  you  stay  in 
business  and  you  stay  in  Maine.  That  is  what  it  is  all  about.  And 
that  is  the  cause  and  effect,  and  you  are  describing  the  ripple  ef-
fect, the ramifications of every decision that is made or isn’t made, 
by default. 

And  that  is  what  it  is  all  about,  and  that  is  what  we  have  got 
to  prevent  and  avert.  So  hearing  your  stories  is  so  critical  to  this 
process  and  to  all  of  us.  Some  obviously  part  of  the  industry  are 
seeing,  but  it  is  certainly  important  for  me  to  hear  and,  hopefully, 
for Dr. Balsiger at the Federal level, administering these programs, 
because there are always ideas that are emanating from all of you 
because you live it. You feel the practical effects of it. And we need 
to  hear  it  and  know  it,  and  hopefully,  we  can  go  about  doing  it  in 
a different way and a better way. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

82 

I always think, you know, can we solve this problem differently? 
Is  there  a  way?  And  that  is  what  we  have  got  to  find  out  here.  So 
we  can  improve  your  lives  and  do  what  you  do  best  and  want  to 
do. 

I  often  think  about  the  fishing  industry.  There  aren’t  many  in-
dustries that have to live with the interference of the Federal Gov-
ernment.  I  mean,  that  is  saying  an  awful  lot  that  you  have  to  en-
dure.  That  is  a  stark  truth  and  adds  so  much  complexity  to  your 
lives  each  and  every  day,  not  to  mention  it  has  some  adverse  con-
sequences. It is what it is because we have a resource that we have 
to  protect,  but  it  doesn’t  make  it  any  easier  for  you  to  go  out  and 
do your jobs every day. That is the point here. It doesn’t. 

There are very few industries that have to endure what you have 
to  endure  in  terms  of  that  regulatory  process  and  the  bureaucracy 
that  results  from  it.  So  we  have  got  to  be  responsive.  That  is  the 
other  thing  we  have  got  to  make  sure.  I  think  the  calls  that  you 
make  to  Federal  offices,  they  have  got  to  be  responded  to.  And  we 
have  got  to  hear  that,  and  we  have  got  to  do  something  about  it 
to make sure. It is just not right. 

So  we  will  take  care  of—we  will  work  on  that  as  well.  I  just— 
I  think  we  feel  for  what  you  are  going  through,  and  we  have  just 
got to do something to make sure that we can avoid the worst con-
sequences here. 

Anybody else who cares to comment? OK. 
Dr. Balsiger, if you have to leave, you go right ahead. Thank you 

so much. Yes, thank you for being here. 

Dr.  BALSIGER.  Again,  thanks  for  the  invitation.  I  am  sorry  I 
didn’t have more time to spend in Portland. It is a wonderful town, 
and I look forward to seeing—— 

Senator SNOWE. Oh, no, thank you. Yes, thank you. 
Dr. BALSIGER. Anyone in the audience should feel free to send me 

an e-mail because I don’t intend to drop these issues. 

Senator SNOWE. OK, I appreciate that. Thank you for being here 

and, again, adjusting your schedule. I appreciate it. Thank you. 

And  I  know  others  have  to  go,  too.  But  we  want  to  make  sure 

we get in any other comments here. You go right ahead. 
Ms. ODLIN. I think I am the last one. I am number 20. 
Senator SNOWE. Oh. 
STATEMENT OF AMANDA ODLIN, CO-OWNER, F/V LYDIA AND 

MAYA, F/V BETHANY JEAN 

Ms. ODLIN. Another Odlin up to bat here. Amanda Odlin. I have 
the  fishing  vessel  LYDIA  AND  MAYA  and  the  fishing  vessel 
BETHANY JEAN. 

And  I  guess  somebody  kills  another  individual,  isn’t  that  consid-
ered  breaking  the  law?  I  mean,  that  is  a  pretty  upfront  obvious 
one. You drink and drive. You get caught. That is breaking the law. 
There  are  consequences  that  go  with  breaking  the  law,  am  I  not 
correct, pretty well defined. 

The  Magnuson-Stevens  Act  is  a  law  that  governs  the  industry, 

the fishing industry. Correct? We are all together? 

Well,  it  seems  to  me  one  of  the  national  guidelines,  one  that 
comes  to  my  mind  is  a  balance  of  conservation  and  economy,  and 
that I haven’t seen the economy side of it yet, just the conservation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

83 

In  essence,  isn’t  that  breaking  the  law,  and  where  is  the  account-
ability for that? Where is the consequence? 

I have seen letters of warning from you, yourself, Senator, to Pa-
tricia  Kurkul,  who  is  in  charge  of  NMFS,  warning  about  these 
emergency  interim  rules  that  she  seemingly  to  the  common  guy, 
which  is  all  of  us,  reels  with  no  consequence  or  no  accountability, 
even  with  warnings  from  somebody  like  yourself,  but  a  warning 
without consequence. 

So I would hope that NMFS would have to become more account-
able  because  I  see  it  as  breaking  the  law.  If  I  break  the  law,  my 
boat  goes  into  a  closed  area  even  accidentally  or  doesn’t  declare 
into  the  correct  area  properly,  if  I  have  been  fishing  in  a  different 
one,  they  are  going  to  either  call  me  back  to  port  or  I  am  going  to 
get  a  fine.  I  am  going  to  pay  for  that.  I  am  going  to  have  a  con-
sequence. 

I  haven’t  seen  the  consequence  for  NMFS  as  of  yet,  and  there  is 
no  balance  in  conservation  and  economy.  We  have  only  seen  the 
conservation.  You  have  said  it  yourself.  That  is  what  I  have  heard 
the whole time. That is breaking the law. 

Senator  SNOWE.  That  is  why  I  inserted  it  in  the  law  back  in 

Ms. ODLIN. But it is breaking the law, is it not, if it is not being 

Senator SNOWE. I know. 
Ms. ODLIN. And there needs to be a consequence. 
Senator SNOWE. You are absolutely right. 
Ms.  ODLIN.  And  so  far,  we  haven’t  seen  the  accountability  for 

1996. 

adhered to? 

that. 

Another thing is we are questioning the science at this juncture. 
How  can  we  go  into  a  new  round  of  regulations  when  it  is  being 
investigated or supposedly investigated at this point in time? That 
to  come  up  with  a  new  set  of  rules  without—and  the  basis  for  all 
the rules, a lot of it is the science that none of us believe in. 

Even  our  own  Dr.  Butterworth,  who  AFM  had  to  hire,  for  the 
best available science. I believe that is part of the law as well. We 
actually  had  to  go  hire  it  at  huge  expense  to  our  small  group.  It 
was  proven  codfish  and  witch  hake  or  the  white  hake,  whatever  it 
is called. The ‘‘W’’ hake, the ‘‘whack’’ is what I call it, because that 
is what is on the little statistic sheets as having been rebuilt when 
we  paid  a  huge  price  for  supposedly  those  being  overfished  for  the 
last 5 years ago Dr. Butterworth conducted this survey. 

And  lo  and  behold,  there  was  a  mistake  made,  and  how  many 
people  went  out  of  business  for  that  mistake?  So,  again,  decent 
science,  best  available,  according  to  the  law—quote,  unquote—is 
what I read. I don’t think we are using the best available. We had 
to hire the best available, a worldwide recognized real scientist. 

And that is the extent of my comments. And as far as the Maine 
fisheries  go,  really  the  only  answer  to  that  is  to  level  the  playing 
field.  It  isn’t  level.  We  can’t  land  the  offshore  lobsters.  Eliminate 
the  fuel  tax.  I  averaged  my  two  boats  out  just  on  fuel  tax  alone, 
based  on  a  $3.30  per  gallon  price,  that  is  $24,562.  That  is  my  in-
surance  payment  on  one  boat.  That  is  not  counting  the  other  one. 
You take—but that is not enough. You take the revenue from the 
offshore  lobsters  on  top  of  that,  I  can’t  afford  to  throw  that  back 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

84 

and then land my species of concern and then drive the balance of 
the  fish  left  to  Portland.  It  doesn’t  make  sense.  You  will  never  get 
those  boats  back  here  unless  you  level  the  playing  field,  and  our 
legislators  didn’t  really  want  to  do  that.  There  are  however  many 
thousand lobstermen not wanting that. 

So  you  are  not  going  to  have  a  groundfish  industry.  Even  if  you 
were  to  do  any  number  of  things,  I  mean,  it  just  seems  to  me  the 
boats  already  went  to  Massachusetts,  where  there  is  no  fuel  tax 
and you can land your offshore lobsters as long as you are licensed 
for it. What would be the lure? I don’t see it. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  hopefully,  we  can  do  something  that  is 

going to make a difference. 

Ms.  ODLIN.  There  is  no  creative  solution.  According  to  Michael 
Conathan; he was hoping that we could find another creative solu-
tion.  That  is  the  solution.  It  is  not  creative.  It  is  what  it  is.  When 
all the other New England States allow you those offshore lobsters, 
and  this  is  the  only  one  that  doesn’t,  and  then,  at  least  in  Massa-
chusetts,  you  are  going  to  eliminate  the  fuel  tax.  I  don’t  know 
about  the  others.  That  is  the  only  way  you  are  going  to  level  the 
playing field. 

So that is all I have. 
Senator SNOWE. How long have you been fishing? 
Ms.  ODLIN.  We  have  had  the  LYDIA  AND  MAYA  since  the  year 
2000, but my husband has fished for Jimmy for over 30 years. And 
they are all generational. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Yes,  all  generational.  Well,  we  want  to  keep  it 
that way for those who are in the industry at the minimum. I think 
it  is  so  crucial  to  this  State,  not  to  mention  to  all  of  you  who  are 
in it and want to be in it as well. 

Ms.  ODLIN.  And  the  families  that  we  support  through  the  crew 

we hire, the taxes we pay, I mean—— 

Senator  SNOWE.  Absolutely.  Maintaining  the  small  communities, 

and that is why it is so important. 

Ms.  ODLIN.  Especially  in  an  economically  stressed  time  for  the 

whole United States, let alone the State of Maine. 

Senator SNOWE. No question. 
Ms. ODLIN. It just seems ridiculous. 
Senator SNOWE. But mentioning about the socioeconomic impact, 
that  is  true,  and  that  is  why  we  included  it,  I  did  back  in  1996  in 
the  reauthorization  of  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Act  because  there 
was  an  imbalance  in  the  way  we  were  approaching  the  fisheries 
law.  And  so,  that  is  the  point:  We  have  to  look  at  mitigating  the 
effects.  I  just  don’t  think  there  is  any  question  about  it.  We  have 
that  obligation,  but  there  has  not  been  the  same  kind  of  invest-
ments in that dimension of the law that there has been on the con-
servation.  You  have  got  to  do  both  if  you  want  to  maintain  it.  It 
shouldn’t be mutually exclusive—— 

Ms. ODLIN. Absolutely, and I understand that. But the pendulum 
never swung. It is stuck on conservation like a magnetic hold there. 
However, at some point in time, maybe some flexibility in the time 
frame?  As  long  as  those  stocks  are  being  rebuilt,  what  is  to  say 
they have to be done in a year, 2 years, 10 years, 50 years? As long 
as they are rebuilding to allow that balance of that pendulum. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

85 

legal? 

Because  if  you  put  that  strict  of  a  time  frame  on,  of  course,  it 
is  going  to  magnetize  toward  conservation  at  the  expense  of  econ-
omy,  and  it  is  breaking  the  law.  Quite  simple.  I  mean,  that  is  a 
simplistic approach to it, but there has got to be accountability for 
that  as  well,  just  like  I  would  be  if  I  were  to,  I  don’t  know,  run 
you over right now. 

Senator SNOWE. Well, don’t do that. 
[Laughter.] 
Ms. ODLIN. I am just saying—but wouldn’t that be considered il-

Senator SNOWE. I hope so. But anyways—— 
Ms. ODLIN. Well, it is no different for this. 
Senator SNOWE. Some might not think so. 
Ms.  ODLIN.  No  different  with  an  imbalance  of  that  national 

guideline that you said yourself—— 

Senator  SNOWE.  I  appreciate  it.  But  you  are  right.  Absolutely. 
The  point  you  are  making  is  you  have  got  to  uphold  the  law,  and 
that is the law. 

Ms.  ODLIN.  And  there  has  got  to  be  a  consequence  for  breaking 

that law. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Exactly.  I  appreciate  that.  And  accountability. 

You are absolutely right. 
Ms. ODLIN. Absolutely. 
Senator SNOWE. Yes. 
Ms. ODLIN. The driver, so to speak. 
Senator  SNOWE.  I  appreciate  it,  but  accountability.  Absolutely 

correct. And agencies have to be held accountable as well. 

Yes? OK, who else is there? Go ahead. 

STATEMENT OF CAPTAIN BILL LINNELL, LOBSTERMAN 

Mr.  LINNELL.  I  am  going  to  get  the  last  word.  I  am  Bill  Linnell. 
And  I  am  a  licensed  lobster  catcher,  and  I  have  also  been 
groundfishing,  gill  netting,  long  lining,  and  urchin  diving.  And  I 
have just a thought for you. 

I  would  like  to  see  an  analysis.  In  lobstering,  one  of  the  things 
that  has  served  lobstering  real  well,  a  conservation  measure,  has 
been  that  in  lobstering  the  owner/operator  has  to  be  on  the  boat. 
The guy with the lobster license is on the boat. I can’t sub out, hire 
somebody to run my boat, OK? 

So  I  would  like  to—I  wonder  if  that—if  groundfishing  adopted 
that  policy,  I  suspect  that  that  would  take  a  huge  amount  of  pres-
sure  off  the  fishery.  And  if  you  have  a  family  that  has  a  fishing 
boat and they are supporting that family out with that fishing boat 
from Port Clyde or Portland or whatever, that they could probably 
have a lot more days at sea. And the sort of the factory operations 
that  are  sort  I  would  say  roughly  analogous  to  the  big  box  stores, 
they would have to—the pressure that they exert would fall off. 

And  I  would  just  like  to  see  somebody  do  an  analysis  to  say  if 
there  were  owner/operators  only  in  the  groundfishing,  as  they  are 
in lobstering, if that would take care of the problem. So that a fam-
ily with a—one family with one fishing boat supporting themselves, 
I suspect that maybe they could have as many days at sea as they 
want. And that would be the end of the problem. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

86 

Senator  SNOWE.  Has  there  been  anything  like  that,  Mr.  Stock-

well? Do you know? Any analysis? 

Mr. STOCKWELL. Not that I know of. 
Senator  SNOWE.  It  has  been  helpful,  though.  Thank  you  very 

much. Thank you. 

Anyone else? 
I  guess  I  have  to  wrap  up  because  they  are  getting  ready  for  a 
city  council  meeting.  Is  that  what  you  are  trying  to  tell  me?  Oh, 
OK. They are giving me the heave-ho, I guess. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator SNOWE. But listen, I just want to, first, thank the panel-
ists for taking the time, for your very thoughtful substantive state-
ments here on a very critical matter that goes without saying. And 
I  thank  all  of  you  for  participating  and,  most  especially,  staying 
here  to  listen  to  the  comments,  and  I  know  that  you  have  gone 
through  many  processes  and  procedures  in  the  course  of  this  deci-
sionmaking, as we will in the future. 

But  I  appreciate  your  willingness  to  be  here  today,  on  such  a 
critical  matter  that  is  so  vital  to  this  State  and  to  the  region  and 
to  the  industry  and  to  the  men  and  women  who  are  a  part  of  it 
and  the  families  who  depend  on  it.  So  I  truly  thank  you  for  being 
here and taking the time. 

And  to  all  of  you  and  those  who  also  gave  their  statements  and 
testifying  and  expressing  their  views  and  describing  their  experi-
ences during this time of hardship for the industry, they persevere 
and  endure,  and  that  is  certainly  the  Maine  way.  But  we  need  to 
do all that we can to help and assist in this process. Hopefully, we 
can  avoid  some  of  the  worst-case  scenarios  so  that  we  can  get  you 
to  do  what  you  do  best,  and  that  is  to  be  out  there  fishing,  what 
you want to do and what generations of families have done. It has 
been a way of life here in this State. 

So I appreciate the fact that you have taken the time to be here, 
to listen, to participate. Please feel free to follow up with other, ad-
ditional  comments.  This  is  a  formal  hearing  of  the  Subcommittee 
of  the  Commerce  Committee,  and  we  will  include  that  in  the 
record. We are going to review what has been said because, again, 
I  draw  so  much,  and  I  am  sure  many  of  the  panelists  here  today 
and  Dr.  Balsiger  will  learn  a  lot  from  what  has  been  offered  here 
today  and  specific  and  concrete  ideas  on  how  to  look  at  this  and 
how to evaluate it in different ways. 

There is never only one way. I have always believed that in solv-
ing problems. There are many ways. And so, I appreciate the time 
that  you  have  taken.  I  truly  mean  that,  that  so  many  of  you  are 
going  through  so  much  in  an  industry  that  means  so  much  to  this 
State. 

So, with that, this hearing is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 4:41 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:53 Apr 24, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\46471.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

